OVERSIGHT  OF  FEDERAL  EFFORTS  FOR  RAIL 
AND  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  SECURITY 

S.  HRG.  110–1058 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JANUARY  18,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

38–932 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Deputy  Republican  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on January 18, 2007  .........................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barrett,  Thomas  J.,  Vice  Admiral  (Ret.),  USCG;  Administrator,  Pipeline  and 
Hazardous Materials Safety Administration, DOT  ...........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Berrick, Cathleen A., Director, Homeland Security and Justice Issues, GAO  ...
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Boardman,  Hon.  Joseph  H.,  Administrator,  Federal  Railroad  Administration, 
DOT  .......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Can˜ as, Hon. Richard L., Director, Office of Homeland Security and Prepared-
ness, State of New Jersey  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hawley, Hon. Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’, Assistant Secretary, Transportation Security 
Administration, DHS  ...........................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hill,  Hon.  John  H.,  Administrator,  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administra-
tion, DOT  ..............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
63 
50 
61 
1 
56 
3 
58 
2 
3 

24 
26 
30 
31 

11 
13 

46 
47 

4 
5 

21 
22 

75 
75 
76 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
McCain, Hon. John, U.S. Senator from Arizona, prepared statement  ................
National School Transportation Association, prepared statement  ......................
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

VADM Thomas J. Barrett  ................................................................................ 102 
Cathleen A. Berrick  .......................................................................................... 105 
97 
Hon. Joseph H. Boardman  ...............................................................................
79 
Hon. Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’ Hawley 
.......................................................................
Hon. John H. Hill  .............................................................................................
98 
.....

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg to: 

VADM Thomas J. Barrett  ................................................................................ 103 
Hon. Joseph H. Boardman  ...............................................................................
97 
Richard L. Can˜ as  .............................................................................................. 106 
Hon. Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’ Hawley 
89 

.......................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Mark Pryor to: 

VADM Thomas J. Barrett  ................................................................................ 104 
.......................................................................
Hon. Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’ Hawley 
94 
99 
Hon. John H. Hill  .............................................................................................
Rockefeller  IV,  Hon.  John  D.,  U.S.  Senator  from  West  Virginia,  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................

76 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  FEDERAL  EFFORTS  FOR  RAIL 
AND  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  SECURITY 

THURSDAY,  JANUARY  18,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:05  a.m.  in  Room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building. Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Welcome all, we’re going to get started and 
I first welcome all of you to the hearing. I’ve been asked to conduct 
the  hearing  this  morning  by  Senator  Inouye  who  is  detained  for 
other  things,  and  I’m  pleased  to  do  it.  It’s  an  odd  assignment  for 
a freshman. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Anyway, people look at my face and they’ll 

know I’m not a freshman. 

And I’m pleased to sit alongside Senator Stevens, with whom I’ve 
worked  for  many  years.  Unaccustomed  as  I  am  to  having  Senator 
Stevens  sit  at  the  right  of  me,  but  we’re—I’m  pleased  to  be  here 
with him. 

Today  we’re  going  to  be  discussing  legislation  to  provide  ade-
quate  security  protections  for  rail  and  highways.  And  we  all  know 
about  the  billions  of  dollars  dedicated  to  aviation  security  every 
year.  But,  we’re  neglecting  the  security  of  our  surface  transpor-
tation systems. 

At  the  outset,  I’d  like  to  recite  a  few  facts  that  we  ought  to  con-
sider.  More  people  travel  through  Penn  Station  in  New  York  City 
in  a  day  than  those  who  use  the  three  major  airports  in  the  same 
day.  That’s  the  volume  of  traffic  that  we’re  talking  about.  Every 
day  over  11  million  people  ride  rail  in  this  country.  And  prior  to 
9/11,  the  two  major  terrorist  attacks  on  our  Nation  came  in  the 
form  of  truck  bombs:  the  first  attack  on  the  World  Trade  Center 
was  in  1993,  and  in  1995,  the  Oklahoma  City  bombing  killed  168 
people. 

In  September  2006,  the  Senate  added  provisions  to  the  SAFE 
Port Act, to improve rail, pipeline, hazmat, truck and bus security. 
But,  the  House  removed  these  important  provisions  and  replaced 
them with a measure on Internet gambling. 

We  now  have  an  opportunity  to  finally  enact  these  provisions, 
and  close  the  lingering  security  holes.  Two  weeks  ago,  Senators 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

Inouye, Stevens, and many of us on this committee, introduced the 
Surface  Transportation  and  Rail  Security  Act  of  2007,  also  known 
as the STARS Act. 

The  STARS  Act  included  $1.2  billion  for  rail  and  surface  trans-
portation  security.  The  bill  will  improve  the  safety  of  passengers, 
and protect us against cargo attacks—cargo used for attacks on our 
society—as  they  travel  by  train,  truck  or  bus,  and  improve  the  se-
curity of pipelines as well. 

So,  I’m  hopeful  that  the  Committee  will  act  quickly  on  this  im-
portant security legislation, as it had already been approved by the 
Senate in the last Congress. 

To go over a few housekeeping matters, the hearing’s going to op-
erate  under  the  policy  adopted  by  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chair-
man  Stevens.  Senators  will  be  allowed  seven  minutes  for  the  first 
round  of  questions,  up  to  two  minutes  of  which  may  be  used  for  a 
brief  opening  statement.  And  if  time  permits,  members  may  ask  a 
second round of questions. 

And  that—Chairman  Inouye  is  scheduled  to  arrive  here  soon, 

and he’ll take back his earned chair. 

So, I now turn the floor over to Senator Stevens, for any opening 

statement he wants to make. 

Senator Stevens? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I  do  welcome  all  of  these  witnesses  and  Mr.  Hawley;  it’s  nice  to 
have  you.  I  offered  you  a  bunk  in  case  we  have  another  one  next 
week, but 2 days in a row is heavy duty. 

But,  I  do  think  it’s  very  appropriate  that  we  take  a  long  look  at 
improving  the  security  of  ground  transportation,  particularly  rail 
and  pipeline.  And  I’m  interested  in  hearing  from  each  one  of  you 
about the ways you guess we can enhance security. 

Accidents  like  the  train  derailment  that  we’ve  just  learned  of  in 
Kentucky,  on  Tuesday,  that  sparked  a  chemical  fire  demonstrate 
the difficulties in securing and ensuring safety of surface transpor-
tation.  I  do  hope  that  we  can  study  that  unfortunate  accident.  As 
I  understand  that  local  interstate  highways  were  closed  down  for 
11  hours,  and  the  National  Guard  troops  were  called  in  to  assist 
local  officials.  And,  apparently  there  are  still  fires  burning  this 
morning.  Nothing  really  good  comes  out  of  such  incidents,  but  we 
can  certainly  try  to  learn  from  them.  So,  I  hope  that  some  of  you 
may have some comments concerning that. 

I do appreciate what you all do to try and deal with the problem 
of  having  a  balance  between  security  measures  and  their  affect  on 
the traveling public. 

One  of  the  no-nos,  I  guess,  I  shouldn’t  even  mention  is,  is  that 
the air transportation passengers are paying substantially for their 
security.  I  haven’t  heard  anyone  mention  how  we’re  going  to  pay 
for  the  security  of  ground  transportation.  I  think  it  must  be  ad-
dressed by this committee. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. All right, thank you very much. 
Senator Thune? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Mr. Chairman, I too, want to thank you for hold-
ing  the  hearing,  and  I  look  forward  to  hearing  what  our  distin-
guished  panelists  have  to  say  and  appreciate  their  being  here  in 
what  I  know  are  very  busy  schedules  to  give  us  an  update  on  the 
work that they are doing to help ensure our surface transportation 
systems are safe and secure. 

And as, of course, Secretary Hawley knows—because he was here 
yesterday—we took a look at the aviation end of this. But obviously 
rail  and  other  surface  transportation  is  where  the  bulk  of  the 
freight  in  this  country  is  moved,  and  obviously  we  have  been 
blessed—knock  on  wood—that  we  haven’t  had  attacks  on  trains 
and  buses  and  subways  in  this  country  like  other  countries  have 
experienced,  but  that  should  not  impact  our  diligence  when  it 
comes to preparing for possible attacks on this part of our transpor-
tation  infrastructure  as  well.  So,  we  have  to  focus  on  aviation,  but 
we  also  have  to  focus  on  surface  transportation.  We  can’t  neglect 
either. 

And,  I  hope  that  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  the 
Department  of  Transportation,  along  with  other  relevant  agencies, 
are  up  to  that  task.  I  know  they’re  working  very  hard  at  it,  and 
if  they  need  anything  from  Congress,  I  hope  that  they  will  inform 
us  of  that  here  today.  Because  obviously,  we  want  to  make  sure 
that you all have everything you need to do your jobs, and so, I will 
look  forward  to  hearing  the  testimony  and  posing  some  questions 
later on. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  want  to  join  the  chorus  of  Senators  who  are  thanking  you  and 
the leadership of this committee for doing this very important—ob-
viously a very important—sector for our Nation’s economy. 

So,  I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here  today,  and  I 

look forward to hearing what they have to say. 

Thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
Now,  I’d  like  to  welcome  our  witnesses.  We’ve  got  six  members 
of  the  panel,  so  we’ll  try  to  deal  with  it  in  appropriate  form  to  get 
as much as we can from each of the witnesses. 

We  have  six  excellent  witnesses,  Kip  Hawley,  who  is  the  Assist-
ant  Secretary  for  Transportation  Security,  the  head  of  TSA.  He 
joined  us  yesterday,  we  welcome  him  again  today;  Joe  Boardman, 
the  Administrator  of  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration;  Mr. 
John  Hill,  who’s  the  Administrator  of  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier 
Safety  Administration;  and,  Admiral  Thomas  Barrett,  formerly 
with  the  Coast  Guard,  and  we  welcome  him—he’s  the  Adminis-
trator  of  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Material  Safety  Administra-
tion; and, Cathleen A. Berrick, who’s the Director for Homeland Se-
curity and Justice Issues at the GAO; and, I especially want to wel-
come  a  colleague  from  New  Jersey,  Richard  Can˜ as,  he’s  the  Direc-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

tor  of  the  Office  of  Homeland  Security  and  Preparedness  for  the 
State of New Jersey. He does a good job. 

Thank  you  for  traveling  down  to  Washington  today,  Director 
Can˜ as, I appreciate the local perspective that you’re going to bring 
to today’s hearing. 

And I want to thank all of you for joining us, and I will now ask 
you  to  present  the  summary  of  your  testimony.  I  would  appreciate 
it if you can complete your summaries within a 5-minute objective. 

Director Hawley? 

STATEMENT OF HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY, 

ASSISTANT SECRETARY, TRANSPORTATION SECURITY 

ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Thank  you  very  much.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chair-

man, Mr. Vice Chairman and members of the Committee. 

I’m please to appear before you today to talk about TSA’s efforts 

at reducing terrorist risks to surface transportation. 

It’s a pleasure to join my colleagues here today. And to save time 
for  discussion,  I’m  going  to  summarize  my  testimony  into  four 
major points. 

And they are: Number one, at TSA we look at the transportation 
system as a network. Aviation, rail, highway, transit, pipeline, fer-
ries  are  all  parts  of  the  network,  and  we  have  efforts  tailored  to 
each  one  of  them,  individually,  but  it’s  important  to  know  that  we 
recognize that America’s transportation network, as a whole, is im-
portant to the national economy and national well-being. And as an 
end in itself, we take security measures for that entire network. 

And  second,  as  we  discussed  yesterday,  our  security  strategy  is 
based  on  connecting  multiple,  flexible  layers—many  of  them  apply 
to  the  entire  transportation  system.  A  plot  that’s  broken  up  in  its 
early stages—especially before it comes to this country—is the best 
rail  security,  the  best  transit  security,  best  pipeline  security,  best 
for  everybody.  So,  efforts  directed  at  supporting  and  connecting 
with others in the Government of the United States, as well as our 
foreign partners, help all parts of the transportation network. 

My  third  point  is,  that  we  take  advantage  of  all  the  work  that 
was done before 9/11, even if it wasn’t originally done for security. 
This panel here, now, this morning, represents that point. 

TSA  isn’t  reinventing  the  wheel.  DOT  has  been  working  trans-
portation  safety  issues  for  a  long  time.  And  many  of  those  meas-
ures  form  a  very  solid  security  foundation.  Our  job  is  to  link  up 
with the safety activities, and add value on top of that where there 
are particular security-specific needs. 

Intelligence-sharing,  vulnerability  analysis,  technology  sharing, 
and  our  Visible  Intermodal  Protection  Response  (VIPR)  teams  are 
an example of that value-add. 

Fourth,  and  finally,  Secretary  Chertoff  has  a  risk-based  strategy 
for  DHS,  and  we  follow  that  at  TSA  and  apply  it  here,  in  surface 
transportation.  We  have  completed  risk  assessments  of  surface 
transportation,  and  identified  our  top  priorities  based  on  threat, 
vulnerability and consequence. 

And  they  are—the  top  two—(a)  high  density  passenger  transit 
systems  in  urban  areas  with  underwater  or  underground  tunnels; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

and, (b) highly toxic chemicals in rail cars that are standing, unat-
tended, in high-risk urban areas. 

Our  mitigation  measures  include  Federal  grant  priority  for  the 
passenger  systems—$171  million  in  Fiscal  Year  2007,  and  a  total 
of about $550 million since 9/11—and an innovative and immediate 
risk  reduction  approach  to  freight  rail  with  quantifiable  and 
verifiable performance standards. 

And, I’d be happy to answer any questions during the discussion. 

Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hawley follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY, ASSISTANT SECRETARY, 

TRANSPORTATION SECURITY ADMINISTRATION, DHS 

Good  morning  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  and  Members  of  the 
Committee. I am pleased to appear before you today to talk about our efforts in the 
field  of  rail  and  surface  transportation  security  at  the  Transportation  Security  Ad-
ministration  (TSA).  I  would  like  to  highlight  some  of  the  important  steps  that  TSA 
and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) are taking in partnership with the 
Department  of  Transportation  (DOT),  and  our  transportation  network  partners. 
Many of these important security steps are built upon and fortified by a solid safety 
foundation  that  has  been  developed  over  the  years  by  our  transportation  partners 
and DOT. 
Raising the Security Baseline of an Interconnected Network 

As we continue to strive to improve the security of these vital transportation sys-
tems,  we  must  not  forget  the  principles  that  make  them  viable  and  efficient.  Many 
of these systems were designed with mobility and ease of access as an enabling fun-
damental underlying their operational success. Our security efforts must work with-
in  the  framework  of  these  systems  and  not  hamper  them.  That  inherent  openness 
and mobility also presents us with our greatest security challenge. 
Intelligence 

Non-linear risk drives everything we do. Instead of focusing on predicting the next 
attack, TSA takes a flexible approach and uses a risk-based methodology to address 
risk. 

TSA pursues a layered approach to security in transportation, including passenger 
transit, highway, pipeline, and rail security. This approach starts by leveraging the 
work  of  other  U.S.  Government  entities  that  take  place  way  beyond  the  doors  of 
TSA and even beyond the soil of the United States through effective gathering, anal-
ysis, and dissemination of intelligence. As detailed below, we do this by working col-
laboratively  with  the  transportation  and  shipper  industries,  as  well  as  with  state 
and local officials. 

The  recent  disruption  of  the  terror  plot  in  the  United  Kingdom  and  of  the  devel-
oping plot targeting underwater tunnels connecting New York and New Jersey illus-
trate  the  necessity  of  this  approach.  The  best  defense  is  one  that  prevents  the  ter-
rorists from ever entering the United States. TSA complements other efforts by cre-
ating  visible,  unpredictable  deterrence  environments  to  disrupt  terrorists’  planning 
capabilities  and  operational  launching  of  their  missions.  For  example,  our  aviation 
system security measures provide a significant barrier to entry for potential terror-
ists coming to our country. Our government’s investments and improvements in ter-
rorism  watch  lists,  border  security  and  intelligence  networks  significantly  impact 
surface transportation security. 
Network Approach and Strategy 

To effectively address transportation security, we employ a network approach. The 
overall  transportation  system  is  a  network.  It  has  intersections  and  junctions;  and 
while  each  transportation  mode  has  its  own  security  challenges,  there  are  common 
vulnerabilities  and  mitigation  strategies.  In  an  effort  to  use  our  security  resources 
efficiently,  we  work  closely  with  transportation  networks  to  leverage  our  security 
impact and determine risk-based priorities. 

As  we  effectively  leverage  our  resources  and  set  security  priorities,  TSA  imple-
ments  a  comprehensive  strategy  that  applies  a  common  methodology  across  all 
transportation  networks,  regardless  of  mode.  That  strategy  is  simple  and  straight-
forward. It consists of five elements: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

• Assess industry threat, vulnerability, and consequence; 
• Develop baseline security standards; 
• Assess actual security status against baseline security standards; 
• Develop  plans  to  close  gaps  between  actual  status  and  baseline  security  stand-

ards; and 

• Develop enhanced systems of security. 
Next,  let  me  discuss  how  this  strategy  works  in  practice  for  the  freight  rail,  pas-

senger rail and rail transit, highway (trucking) and pipeline industries. 
Industry Threat Vulnerability and Consequence Assessments (TVC) 

The  purpose  of  threat,  vulnerability  and  consequence  assessments  is  to  focus  ef-
forts on and highlight risk areas. Since September 2001, many Federal agencies and 
industry  partners  have  been  involved  in  significant  efforts  to  identify  the  highest 
risk  areas  for  our  security  focus.  Those  efforts  have  centered  on  analyzing  threats, 
assessing vulnerabilities and calculating consequences of potential terrorist attacks. 
Based  upon  this  large  body  of  work  and  our  ongoing  analysis,  TSA  determines  the 
highest  areas  of  risk  for  each  mode  of  transportation  so  that  we  can  properly  focus 
on risk mitigation efforts. 

Freight  Rail–TVC.  Over  the  past  several  years,  TSA  has  completed  a  number  of 
freight  rail  corridor  assessments  in  high  threat  urban  areas.  The  point  of  the  cor-
ridor  assessments  is  to  focus  on  high  risk  areas  and  determine  the  vulnerabilities. 
We have completed regionally based assessments in New Orleans, LA; Washington, 
DC; Houston, TX; Buffalo, NY; Cleveland, OH; and several cities in New Jersey in-
cluding Newark, Elizabeth and Perth Amboy. We are currently assessing Los Ange-
les,  CA  and  plan  to  visit  additional  urban  areas  in  2007.  The  results  of  the  initial 
six  assessments  demonstrated  recognizable  trends  and  risks.  We  identified  railcars 
loaded with toxic inhalation hazard materials (TIH) sitting unattended as the high-
est  risk  potential  as  a  terrorist  target.  While  these  shipments  represent  less  than 
1 percent of all rail shipments, if attacked they could create an airborne hazard and 
potentially  endanger  the  lives  of  people  living  and  working  in  those  communities. 
Passenger  Transit–TVC.  (Amtrak  falls  within  our  passenger  transit  division.)  In 
assessing  security  in  this  area  TSA  is  building  upon  a  base  of  knowledge  derived 
from  37  assessments  of  readiness  to  prevent,  detect,  deter,  and  respond  to  terrorist 
incidents,  conducted  by  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA)  and  the  Federal 
Railroad Administration (FRA). TSA has a 100 person Surface Transportation Secu-
rity  Inspection  (STSI)  force  that  is  updating  these  earlier  assessments  and  con-
ducting  additional  field  rail  and  passenger  transit  readiness  assessments.  TSA  has 
utilized  its  inspection  force  to  conduct  assessments  over  the  past  year  and  a  half 
and will continue to conduct these assessments in partnership with the rail industry 
and DOT. 

The extensive field work conducted by TSA and FTA/FRA in conjunction with the 
industry has been utilized to set our priorities and identify industry baseline stand-
ards.  TSA  and  FTA/FRA  assessments,  in  addition  to  in-house  risk  analysis,  focus 
on passenger transit operating procedures and high risk/high consequence assets. 

Highway (Trucking)–TVC. TSA has been assessing the security risks of motor car-
riers through the Corporate Security Review (CSR) program, another form of assess-
ment of industry readiness and vulnerabilities. Based up on our analysis we are fo-
cused  on  Toxic  Inhalation  Chemicals  (TIH)  and  hazardous  chemicals  of  concern, 
which include explosives, flammables and other poisonous materials. 

Pipeline–TVC. Through the CSR program for pipelines, TSA has identified a num-
ber  of  pipeline  systems  that  pose  the  highest  security  risk.  TSA  will  also  conduct 
a pipeline infrastructure study to identify the highest risk pipeline assets. 
Baseline Standards 

The purpose of baseline standards is to create measurable risk reduction targets. 
Freight  Rail  Baseline  Standards.  Because  the  potential  risk  posed  by  unattended 
TIH  rail  cars  in  high  threat  urban  areas  was  identified  as  the  highest  risk  area  in 
rail,  TSA  developed  a  risk  reduction  goal  of  reducing  the  objectively-measured  risk 
of  TIH  cars  in  high  threat  urban  areas  by  25  percent  per  year,  starting  in  2007. 
That risk factor takes into account car hours, the population of urban areas and the 
proximity to residential and commercial structures. 

TSA  has  also  identified  24  other  focus  areas  as  security  action  items  for  the  rail 
industry  to  begin  to  address.  The  actions  items  were  released  to  the  industry  in 
June  and  November  2006.  The  action  items  focus  on  security  awareness  training, 
security  focused  inspections,  suspicious  activity  reporting,  control  of  sensitive  infor-
mation  and  employee  identification.  TSA  is  assessing  conformity  with  the  security 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

action items to evaluate how implementation of the action items reduces objectively 
measured risk. 

Passenger  Transit  Baseline  Standards.  Based  upon  extensive  assessments,  in- 
house  risk  analysis  performed  at  TSA  and  dialogue  with  the  industry,  TSA  has  de-
veloped baseline standards for the industry derived from six fundamental principles. 
Those principles are: 

tems; 

nerability assessments; 

• Protect  high  risk/high  consequence  underground/underwater  assets  and  sys-
• Protect  other  high  risk/high  consequence  assets  and  systems  identified  in  vul-
• Use visible, unpredictable deterrence; 
• Plan and conduct awareness and response training for key personnel; 
• Plan and conduct emergency drills and exercises; and 
• Plan and conduct public awareness and preparedness campaigns. 
Highway  (Trucking)  Baseline  Standards.  TSA  has  been  working  closely  with  a 
number  of  chemical  shippers  to  develop  a  series  of  baseline  security  standards  for 
both TIH and hazardous chemicals of concern. Those standards will address specific 
areas such as vehicle tracking, vehicle attendance, vehicle alarm systems, truck cab 
access  controls,  locking  fifth  wheel  on  tank  trailers  and  security  route  and  stop 
areas. 

Pipeline Baseline Standards. TSA has been conducting corporate security reviews 
targeting the top 100 pipeline operators. From the results of these reviews, TSA has 
developed  a  series  of  security  standards  based  upon  the  best  operating  practices  of 
those companies. The pipeline standards address areas including security plans, em-
ployee  security  training,  access  controls  and  physical  access  security  and  employee 
background investigation. 

Assess  Security  Status.  The  purpose  of  assessing  security  status  is  to  determine 
how individual operations compare to the baseline standards. The assessment proce-
dures vary depending upon transportation mode. Assessments in rail and passenger 
transit are conducted by TSA’s field inspector force, while highway and pipeline as-
sessments  are  conducted  by  TSA’s  subject  matter  experts  in  each  network  manage-
ment  division.  The  assessments  are  structured  to  target  key  areas  of  concern  and 
to capture essential data to evaluate current practice versus baseline standards. 

Freight Rail Status. In order to evaluate the security baseline in freight rail, TSA 
in cooperation with the rail industry is developing a comprehensive database driven 
system  to  identify  the  specific  locations  where  TIH  risk  is  the  highest.  TSA  inspec-
tors will verify attended/unattended status and proximity to high risk structures. In 
addition to identifying high risk locations, the database will give TSA the ability to 
identify TIH cars in near real time. This capability will allow us to more effectively 
respond to emerging threat situations. 

Further,  TSA  inspectors  have  conducted  field  interviews  with  key  rail  manage-
ment  and  personnel.  Over  2,600  interviews  have  been  completed,  focused  on  em-
ployee  security  awareness,  security  procedures  and  systems  to  locate  and  protect 
TIH cars. 

Passenger  Transit  Status.  The  TSA  inspector  force  has  been  conducting  assess-
ments  of  passenger  rail  transit  systems  (both  commuter  rail  and  other  transit  sys-
tems, including Amtrak). In addition to the TSA assessments, we expect self-assess-
ments  from  the  50  largest  transit  agencies  to  be  completed  by  the  end  of  January 
2007. TSA inspectors will then verify and confirm the assessment results. While the 
data gathered to date is preliminary, it does indicate varying security status among 
systems.  Once  data  is  confirmed  by  inspectors,  we  will  have  a  much  clearer  under-
standing of how passenger transit systems compare to the six fundamental security 
principles and guide our plan to help us close those gaps. 

Highway (Trucking) Status. TSA conducts highway corporate security reviews and 
assessments.  Those  assessments  are  targeted  at  companies  hauling  TIH  and  other 
hazardous chemicals of concern. TSA will compare actual practice to baseline stand-
ards. 

Pipeline  Status.  TSA  will  use  its  ongoing  corporate  security  review  process  to  de-
termine  the  implementation  of  baseline  standards.  TSA  will  continue  to  work  with 
individual companies to improve their security status. 

Closing Gaps. Once assessments have identified the gaps in actual practice versus 
baselines  standards,  TSA  develops  action  plans  to  close  the  gaps  and  takes  steps 
where  necessary  to  close  the  gaps  in  all  modes.  We  have  a  variety  of  capabilities 
at  our  disposal  including  industry  agreements,  voluntary  measures,  security  direc-
tives,  and  regulatory  action.  TSA  works  with  the  Office  of  Grants  and  Training 
(G&T)  through  the  Infrastructure  Protection  Program  (IPP)  grants  program  to  en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

able  transit  agencies  and  other  surface  transportation  entities  to  apply  for  Federal 
funding to address the highest identified risks. 

Freight Rail-Close Gaps. In order to reduce the gaps between actual practice and 
baseline  standards,  TSA  pursued  a  two-pronged  approach.  We  issued  a  Notice  of 
Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) on December 21, 2006, which includes several provi-
sions  to  strengthen  the  security  of  the  Nation’s  freight  rail  systems  in  the  highest 
threat  urban  areas.  The  proposed  rule  establishes  incident  reporting  procedures, 
codifies TSA’s inspection authority, requires rail company security coordinators, and 
most  importantly  creates  a  positive  chain  of  custody  from  beginning  to  end  which 
requires secure handoffs when cars change hands. 

While the proposed rule provides a number of important security initiatives, TSA 
was not satisfied with the timeframe of rulemaking alone. Risk reduction has a time 
component  and  we  wanted  to  reduce  the  risk  faster  than  rulemaking  would  allow. 
As  a  result,  we  reached  an  agreement  with  the  rail  industry  to  reduce  unattended 
TIH standstill car time in high threat urban areas beginning in early 2007. A com-
prehensive database will be used to identify highest priority risk reduction opportu-
nities  and  working  in  conjunction  with  TSA,  the  rail  carriers  will  develop  site-spe-
cific action plans to reduce or remove the TIH risks. In addition to reducing the TIH 
risks,  TSA  will  work  with  rail  carriers  to  improve  the  security  performance  in  the 
security training and security procedures baseline. TSA is also developing an impro-
vised explosive device (IED) training course for rail employees to be available in the 
second quarter of 2007. 

Passenger Transit-Close Gap. The strategies to close security gaps start with high 

risk/high consequence assets. 

As we know, an attack on underground, underwater, and other critical infrastruc-
ture can dramatically increase the consequences of an attack by magnifying the ac-
tual  impact,  complicating  the  response  efforts  and  substantially  prolonging  the  re-
covery time. 

We  must  be  focused  on  minimizing  high  consequence  risks.  TSA,  in  partnership 
with  G&T,  intends  to  leverage  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  funds  to  focus 
on  reducing  risk  and  increasing  security  capabilities  in  State  and  local  transit  sys-
tems  with  the  most  risk.  We  are  engaged  in  research  to  expand  our  understanding 
of the vulnerabilities and the consequences of terrorist attacks on our critical infra-
structure.  We  are  partnering  with  the  National  Laboratories  to  complete  assess-
ments  of  a  prioritized  list  of  transit  tunnels  and  are  pursuing  mitigation  solutions 
with our industry partners now. 

While  transit  agencies  cannot  harden  every  entry  point,  nor  screen  every  pas-
senger  coming  into  busy  stations,  they  can  deploy  visible,  unpredictable  mobile 
teams  that  disrupt  terrorists’  planning  capabilities  and  provide  high  levels  of  secu-
rity.  We  are  accomplishing  this  by  expanding  our  canine  program  and  leveraging 
our security network to create surge capacity with Visible Intermodal Protection Re-
sponse (VIPR) Teams. 

VIPR Teams, consisting of Surface Transportation Security Inspectors (STSIs), ca-
nine teams, Federal Air Marshals (FAMs), and advanced screening technology, pro-
vide TSA the ability to leverage a variety of resources quickly and effectively. These 
deployments are designed to raise the level of security in any mode of transportation 
across the country in heightened security environments. The teams work with local 
security  and  law  enforcement  officials  to  supplement  existing  security  resources, 
provide  deterrent  presence  and  detection  capabilities,  and  introduce  an  element  of 
unpredictability  to  disrupt  potential  terrorist  planning  activities.  More  than  25 
VIPR  exercises  have  been  conducted  at  key  commuter  and  regional  passenger  rail 
facilities, and more are planned throughout 2007. 

Explosives  detection  canine  teams  are  being  trained,  certified,  and  deployed  by 
TSA to passenger transit systems. Since late 2005, TSA’s National Explosive Detec-
tion  Canine  Team  Program  has  worked  in  partnership  with  passenger  transit  sys-
tems  to  train,  certify,  and  deploy  53  explosives  detection  canine  teams  to  13  major 
systems in a risk-based application of resources. Forty of these teams are currently 
in  place  and  the  other  13  are  projected  for  training,  certification,  and  deployment 
in the coming months. 

I  want  to  emphasize  that  our  STSI  workforce  and  the  canine  teams  we  fund  for 
passenger  transit  are  just  the  point  of  the  spear.  There  are  literally  thousands  of 
transit and rail law enforcement and security officers on duty night and day to pro-
vide  security  where  they  are  needed  for  these  segments  of  the  transportation  net-
work.  Furthermore,  each  rail  and  passenger  transit  system  makes  a  deliberate  and 
strategic  decision  when  they  develop  their  annual  budgets  as  to  where  they  should 
apply  their  revenues  to  close  security  vulnerabilities.  This  approach  creates  a  more 
effective network of local security rather than deploying a far greater Federal work-
force to perform these same functions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

Since  the  security  of  these  systems  is  a  shared  responsibility  among  Federal, 
State,  and  local  partners,  the  Administration  has  provided  significant  resources  to 
bolster  these  security  efforts  since  9/11.  Funds  from  DHS  grants  programs  may  be 
used for planning, training, exercises, equipment, and other security enhancements. 
DHS has provided roughly $18 billion in awards to State and local governments for 
programs and equipment that help to manage risk. 

In addition to visible unpredictable deterrence, TSA believes that training for key 
personnel  is  essential  to  rail  as  its  baseline  of  security.  There  are  numerous  pas-
senger transit training courses available today. TSA is working with FTA to identify 
the  specific  type  of  training  required  for  employees  (i.e.,  train  operators,  station 
managers, and control system personnel, among others) in order to provide guidance 
to systems. 

TSA  and  G&T  are  using  the  Infrastructure  Protection  Program  (IPP)  grants  pro-
gram to drive improvement in the six security fundamental areas mentioned earlier, 
including  training  for  key  personnel,  drills  and  exercises  and  public  awareness  and 
preparedness. 

The  $175  million  IPP  security  grant  program  is  the  centerpiece  of  DHS’s  inter-
agency  strategy  to  close  gaps  in  operator  security  status  and  baseline  standards. 
Within  the  transportation  sector  the  program  covers  transit,  inter-city  buses,  and 
trucking security. For purposes of the IPP, ‘‘transit’’ includes Amtrak, which is eligi-
ble  for  $8.3  million,  and  commuter  ferry  systems  that  are  eligible  for  $7.8  million. 
The  IPP  transit  grant  guidance  emphasized  the  six  fundamentals  and  we  expect  to 
direct  transit  grants  awards  based  on  our  system  assessments  and  security  funda-
mental  baselines.  We  use  the  grants  program  to  close  the  gaps  at  high  risk  prop-
erties. 

Highway  (Trucking)-Close  Gaps.  TSA  is  working  on  a  number  of  strategies  to 
close  gaps  in  performance  versus  actual  standards.  We  are  currently  considering  a 
number of voluntary incentive programs and regulatory options. 

Pipeline-Close  Gaps.  TSA  has  had  an  extensive  working  relationship  with  the 
pipeline  industry.  TSA  has  prepared  an  employee  security  awareness  training  pro-
gram for all pipeline employees, worked with operators to prepare or improve secu-
rity plans, conducted site specific visits to evaluate security practices, and developed 
risk  mitigation  strategies  for  high  risk  assets.  This  cooperative  relationship  has  re-
sulted in improved conformity to baseline standards. 
Enhanced Systems of Security 

The  final  part  of  our  strategy  is  to  enhance  the  systems  of  security.  As  we  take 
actions to close gaps, we also need to improve security technology and practices that 
many of these technologies apply to multiple modes of transportation. 

DHS is developing a number of screening techniques and technologies which may 
be implemented or deployed quickly to systems facing a specific threat, or in support 
of  major  events  such  as  National  Special  Security  Events  (NSSEs).  Pilot  programs 
to  test  these  technologies  are  already  underway  in  several  major  American  cities. 
Through the DHS Science and Technology (S&T) Directorate’s Rail Security Pilot 
(RSP), DHS has field tested the effectiveness of explosives detection techniques and 
imaging technologies in partnership with the Port Authority of New York and New 
Jersey. 

The  Systems  Support  Division  (SSD)  of  G&T  has  conducted  operational  tests  to 
evaluate  manufacturer  claims  on  ballistic  resistant  trash  receptacles  and  published 
a report of its findings to help ensure mass transit systems, among others, have the 
facts  needed  to  guide  critical  procurement  decisions.  Similarly,  SSD  has  published 
a  closed  circuit  television  (CCTV)  technology  handbook  to  provide  a  reference  point 
on current CCTV technologies, capabilities and limitations. 

Finally,  we  maintain  mobile  security  equipment,  which  can  fit  into  two  standard 
size shipping containers, for rapid deployment for use in screening and detection at 
any major system in the country should the need arise. 

In  addition  to  technologies  that  may  apply  primarily  to  passenger  modes,  TSA  is 
working  closely  with  a  number  of  parties  to  develop  advanced  railcar  tracking  sys-
tems with geofenced event-notification capabilities. TSA is also cooperating in efforts 
to  develop  next-generation  hazardous  materials  rail  cars  designed  to  better  with-
stand terrorist attacks and operating accidents. 

TSA  is  working  with  selected  hazardous  material  carriers  to  test  truck  tracking 
and  control  technologies.  We  are  also  in  the  early  stages  of  security  technology  ap-
plications  to  the  pipeline  industry.  Two  specific  areas  TSA  is  involved  in  are  blast 
mitigation and unmanned aerial surveillance vehicles. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Presidential  Action  and  TSA’s  Objectively  Measured  Risk  Reduction 

Process 

On  December  5,  2006,  the  President  issued  Executive  Order  13416,  which  builds 
upon the improvements made in surface transportation security since September 11, 
2001,  specifically  actions  taken  under  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  7, 
‘‘Critical Infrastructure Identification, Prioritization, and Protection’’ (HSPD–7). Ex-
ecutive  Order  13416  requires  the  strengthening  of  our  Nation’s  surface  transpor-
tation  systems  by  the  facilitation  and  implementation  of  a  comprehensive,  coordi-
nated, and efficient security program. As the Federal official with principal responsi-
bility for protecting surface transportation infrastructure, Secretary Chertoff has the 
lead in implementing this policy in coordination with the Secretary of DOT and the 
heads of other relevant agencies. The order sets deadlines for key security activities 
including  security  assessments  of  each  surface  transportation  mode  and  an  evalua-
tion of the effectiveness and efficiency of current Federal Government surface trans-
portation security initiatives. We continue to build upon current security initiatives 
to  develop  a  comprehensive  transportation  systems  sector  specific  plan,  as  defined 
in  the  National  Infrastructure  Protection  Plan  (NIPP).  The  five-part  strategy  cited 
earlier in my testimony is meeting the requirements of the Executive Order. 
Annexes to DHS–DOT Memorandum of Understanding 

Three  annexes  to  a  September  2004  Memorandum  of  Understanding  between 
DHS and DOT have been completed and signed, evidencing the close and continuous 
cooperation between TSA and DOT to leverage resources. 

The  first,  between  TSA  and  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  (FRA),  memori-
alizes how we will coordinate our programs and initiatives at an agency level to bet-
ter  secure  passenger  and  freight  railroad  transportation,  and  improve  stakeholder 
relationships, and to include assisting railroads in prioritizing assets and addressing 
current  and  emerging  threats  and  vulnerabilities.  While  TSA  is  responsible  for  rail 
security  and  FRA  is  responsible  for  rail  safety,  the  annex  provides  detailed  oper-
ational guidance to enable the two agencies to avoid duplication and maximize effi-
ciency  and  cooperation  in  their  planning,  inspection,  training  and  enforcement  ac-
tivities. 

The  second  annex  is  between  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Ad-
ministration  (PHMSA)  and  TSA.  This  annex  delineates  our  respective  roles  and  re-
sponsibilities  regarding  pipelines  and  hazardous  materials  transportation  security. 
It  discusses  sharing  data  and  compliance  information  between  the  agencies,  coordi-
nating  research  and  regulatory  activities,  providing  joint  public  information  and 
emergency  response  materials,  collaboration  in  inspection  and  enforcement  activi-
ties, and sharing technical support and budgets. 

The  third  annex  is  between  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA)  and  TSA. 
It  similarly  provides  for  close  and  continuous  cooperation  between  the  two  respec-
tive agencies in matters relating to security of the Nation’s transit systems. 

Together,  these  annexes  allow  much  more  efficient  use  of  the  government’s  time 
and  money,  while  maximizing  the  value  of  what  these  agencies  can  achieve  for  in-
dustry and the traveling public. 
Summary 

TSA has a clear strategy to address surface transportation security. That strategy 
focuses first on identifying areas of high risk and then establishing baseline security 
standards to address those risks. Once baseline standards are established, we assess 
the actual status of security in the transportation industries, and in close coordina-
tion  with  stakeholders,  devise  strategies  for  bringing  actual  practices  up  to  the 
standards  we  have  established.  Finally,  we  are  developing  advanced  systems  of  se-
curity through a coordinated research and development program, to further enhance 
security beyond the baseline standards. In furtherance of this strategy, I have estab-
lished  an  Office  of  Transportation  Sector  Network  Management  specifically  to  ad-
dress  the  cross-cutting  issues  that  affect  all  aspects  of  the  transportation  sector  as 
a  unified  whole.  They  are  implementing  this  strategy  through  cooperation  with 
stakeholders  where  appropriate,  regulation  and  inspection  where  necessary,  and 
through  the  distribution  of  grants  to  assist  the  industry  to  implement  these  objec-
tives we have set forth. 

I understand that the Committee is considering new legislation to address further 
security  measures  for  surface  transportation.  The  Department  and  TSA  look  for-
ward  to  working  cooperatively  with  the  Committee  as  we  have  done  since  you  first 
took  up  the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA)  in  2001.  We  appre-
ciate your leadership in this area and the support that you have given to TSA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  inform  you  of  our  efforts  in  freight  rail,  com-
muter  rail  and  other  transit,  trucking  and  pipeline  security.  I  would  be  happy  to 
answer any questions that you might have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
Mr. Boardman? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, 

ADMINISTRATOR, FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION, DOT 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  members  of 

the Committee, thank you for having me here this morning. 

I’m  here  representing  Secretary  Peters,  and  my  oral  testimony 
this  morning  will  be  focused  on  FRA’s  working  relationship  with 
TSA, and our efforts in the passenger railroad security area. 

In  September  of  2004,  DOT  and  DHS  entered  into  a  Memo-
randum of Understanding concerning their respective roles on secu-
rity  issues.  The  MOU  notes  that  DHS  has  primary  responsibility 
for security, in all modes of transportation, but also recognizes that 
DOT has responsibilities in the area of transportation security. 

TSA and FRA have signed an annex to that memo of agreement, 
concerning  coordination  of  the  two  agencies  on  rail  security  mat-
ters.  The  annex  provides  for  close  cooperation  between  two—the 
two  agencies  on  railroad  security  regulations,  legislation,  research 
and  development,  inspection  activities,  and  response  to  threats  on 
railroad security. 

The agreement provides that if an FRA inspector observes a sig-
nificant security issue, the information will be provided to TSA and 
the  railroad.  And,  similarly,  if  a  TSA  inspector  observes  a  signifi-
cant rail safety issue, the information will be provided to FRA and 
the railroad. 

In  addition  to  coordinating  day-to-day  railroad  inspections,  FRA 
has  assisted  TSA  in  conducting  security  assessments  in  high- 
threat,  urban-area  rail  corridors  carrying  significant  volumes  of 
TIH  materials;  and  in  developing  the  27  voluntary  security  action 
items that the railroads have agreed to implement to improve secu-
rity on rail movements of TIH materials. 

FRA has one full-time employee addressing rail security matters, 
and  all  of  our  71  hazmat  inspectors  and  specialists,  along  with  17 
State inspectors devote a portion of their time to reviewing railroad 
shipper  and  security  plans  for  compliance  with  FMSA’s  security 
regulations. 

FRA’s Security Director works on a daily basis with Government 
agencies  and  the  railroad  industry  to  facilitate  communication  on 
security  issues,  and  also  participates  in  security  training,  reviews 
security  plans,  and  performs  other  activities  to  promote  rail  secu-
rity. 

Today at FRA, personnel have reviewed more than 6,000 security 
plans, and conducted over 4,000 inspections for compliance with se-
curity training requirements of the FMSA regulations. 

In  2007,  FRA  will  work  with  the  American  Short  Line  and  Re-
gional  Railroad  Association  to  provide  hazmat  security  training, 
and  conduct  security  reviews  at  approximately  125  short-line  rail-
roads,  and  conduct  at  least  15  security  training  sessions  for  rail 
labor  organizations,  as  well  as  four  sessions  at  the  FBI  Academy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

on  railroad  security  and  emergency  response  for  law  enforcement 
personnel. 

FRA  will  explore  leveraging  the  National  Labor  College,  George 
Meany Training Campus, to assist in providing security awareness 
training  for  railroad  employee,  who  are  not  receiving  the  security 
training  under  FRA’s  Emergency  Preparedness  Regulation,  or  the 
FMSA security regulation. 

FRA  requires  each  railroad  that  operates  intercity  or  commuter 
passenger  train  service,  or  hosts  that  operation  of  such  service,  to 
adopt and comply with written emergency preparedness plans pre-
pared by the FRA. The regulation requires railroads providing pas-
senger  service  to  periodically  conduct  full-scale  passenger  train 
emergency  simulations,  and  conduct  a  debriefing  and  critique  ses-
sion after actual simulated passenger train emergencies. 

The FRA will continue monitoring passenger railroads for compli-
ance  with  this  regulation,  and  will  attend  each  full-scale  simula-
tion, and follow-up review session such as the one that’s scheduled 
for  Long  Island  Railroad  this  March  with  the  New  York  City  Fire 
Department. 

In  2003,  the  FRA  initiated  a  review  of  existing  passenger  train 
safety needs. This lead to an emergency systems NPRM in August 
2006. Emergency communications is one of the main focuses of this 
particular  NPRM.  Under  the  proposal,  all  existing  passenger  cars 
will  be  required  to  be  equipped  with  public  address  systems  by 
2012, that provides a means for a crew member to communicate to 
all  train  passengers  in  an  emergency  situation.  And  all  new  pas-
senger  cars  would  be  required  to  be  equipped  with  intercom  sys-
tems  that  provide  a  means  for  passengers  and  crew  members  to 
communicate with each other in an emergency situation. 

The  proposed  rulemaking  would  also  enhance  requirements  for 
emergency  window  exits  in  passenger  cars,  and  mandate  that  all 
passenger  cars—including  existing  cars—have  rescue  windows  for 
emergency responder access. 

FRA  is  in  the  process  of  preparing  the  final  rule,  and  we  expect 

to do so by the middle of the year. 

Moreover, a separate regulatory proposal is also in development, 
focusing  on  passenger  car  emergency  signage,  low  location  exit 
path marking and emergency lighting. This proposal is expected to 
be  published  by  the  end  of  2007.  Complementing  this  regulation, 
Amtrak and commuter railroads have instituted their own security 
plans  and  conduct  security  training.  FRA  assisted  in  the  develop-
ment  of  its  security  plan,  and  specifically—in  coordination  with 
Amtrak’s Inspector General—FRA contracted with RAND Corpora-
tion to conduct a systematic review and assessment of Amtrak’s se-
curity posture, corporate strategic security planning, and programs 
focusing  on  the  adequacy  of  preparedness  for  combating  terrorist 
threats. FRA’s Security Director is currently working with Amtrak 
to implement the recommendations of that RAND study. 

FRA  inspectors  conducted  basic  security  reviews  of  Amtrak  and 
commuter  railroad  security,  both  after  the  2004  train  bombings  in 
Madrid,  and  with  TSA  inspectors  after  the  2005  transit  bombings 
in London. In both cases, FRA inspectors and TSA inspectors were 
deployed  immediately  after  the  bombings  to  assess  the  security 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

posture  of  passenger  railroads,  based  on  a  checklist  of  major  secu-
rity criteria. 

Together,  DOT,  TSA  and  the  rail  industry  are  helping  to  ensure 
that  security  initiatives  and  programs  are  directed  at  potential 
threats  to  the  Nation’s  railroad  network.  And  as  rail  employers, 
employees and others responsible for security are prepared to iden-
tify  and  address  such  threats,  FRA  looks  forward  to  working  with 
this committee in furthering the safety and security of our Nation’s 
railroad  network,  and  including  the  drafting  of  safety  and  security 
legislation. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Boardman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION, DOT 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and other members of the Committee, 
I  am  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  testify,  on  behalf  of  the  Secretary  of  Transpor-
tation,  about  the  security  of  our  Nation’s  passenger  and  freight  railroad  network 
and the efforts that the Department of Transportation (DOT) is making to enhance 
rail  safety  and  security.  The  Federal  Railroad  Administration’s  (FRA)  primary  mis-
sion is to promote the safety of the U.S. railroad industry and to reduce the number 
and  severity  of  accidents  and  incidents  arising  from  railroad  operations.  Our  rail-
road safety mission necessarily includes our involvement in railroad security issues. 
The  U.S.  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  and  its  Transportation  Security 
Administration  (TSA)  have  primary  responsibility  for  transportation  security,  with 
FRA  providing  support  in  the  railroad  sector.  FRA  works  closely  with  TSA  and  the 
railroad  industry  on  a  daily  basis  in  addressing  railroad  security  and  safety  issues, 
participates  in  the  Government  Coordinating  Council  for  Rail,  and  contributed  its 
expertise to the National Strategy for Transportation Security and the National In-
frastructure Protection Plan. 

My  testimony  today  will  provide  some  background  on  FRA’s  railroad  safety  pro-
gram,  describe  the  role  that  FRA  plays  in  railroad  security,  and  discuss  railroad 
safety  and  security  initiatives.  We  stand  ready  to  work  with  the  Committee  in  fur-
thering the safety and security of our Nation’s railroad network. 
Overview of the Railroad Industry 

The  U.S.  railroad  network  is  a  vital  link  in  the  Nation’s  transportation  system 
and  is  critical  to  the  economy,  national  defense,  and  public  health.  Passenger  and 
freight railroads operate over 170,000 route miles of track and employ over 232,000 
workers.  The  rail  system  is  diverse  and  expansive.  Security  risks  are  inherent  in 
its supporting infrastructure, as well as in the people and products moving through 
it.  Most  of  the  larger  railroads  have  their  own  police  force,  and  they  are  supple-
mented by State and local law enforcement. 

Amtrak,  the  Alaska  Railroad  Corporation,  and  commuter  railroads  provide  pas-
senger rail service to more than 500 million passengers yearly. Passenger operators 
face many challenges in their efforts to provide a secure public transportation envi-
ronment.  By  definition,  the  systems  are  open,  providing  numerous  points  of  access 
and egress leading to high passenger turnover and making them difficult to monitor 
effectively.  Amtrak,  for  example,  operates  as  many  as  300  trains  per  day  serving 
over 500 stations in 46 States, and Amtrak trains use tracks owned by freight rail-
roads except for operations in the Northeast Corridor and in Michigan. 

Privately-owned  freight  railroads  connect  industries  and  businesses  with  each 
other across the country and with markets overseas, moving 42 percent of all inter-
city freight, measured in ton-miles, including 67 percent of the coal used by electric 
utilities  to  produce  power,  and  chemicals  used  in  manufacturing  and  water  purifi-
cation.  Seven  Class  I  railroads  haul  over  90  percent  of  the  rail  cargo  in  the  U.S., 
with  the  remaining  10  percent  being  transported  by  30  regional  railroads  and  over 
500 local railroads. Typically railroads move about 1.7 to 1.8 million carloads of haz-
ardous materials (hazmat) yearly, with roughly 105,000 of these carloads being toxic 
inhalation  hazard  (TIH)  materials,  such  as  chlorine  and  anhydrous  ammonia.  Over 
64  percent  of  TIH  materials  are  currently  transported  by  rail.  The  railroads  have 
an  outstanding  record  in  moving  all  goods  safely.  The  vast  majority  of  hazardous 
materials  shipped  by  rail  every  year  arrive  safely  and  without  incident,  and  train 
accidents  involving  a  release  of  hazardous  materials  that  causes  death  are  infre-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

quent and rare, even while rail traffic volumes have increased steadily. As discussed 
below,  DOT  has  an  aggressive  and  comprehensive  action  plan  to  address  the  root 
causes  of  hazmat  accidents,  to  examine  and  improve  the  integrity  of  rail  tank  cars 
used  to  transport  hazmat,  and  to  improve  the  railroads’  hazmat  security  plans.  In 
addition,  DOT’s  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  (PHMSA) 
annually  provides  grant  funds  to  States  and  Indian  tribes  to  assist  in  the  develop-
ment,  improvement,  and  implementation  of  hazmat  emergency  response  plans,  and 
to train emergency responders to respond to hazmat accidents and incidents; details 
on this program are contained in PHMSA’s website (http://hazmat.dot.gov). 

Maintaining  a  safe  and  secure  railroad  transportation  system  is  essential,  and 
safety  and  security  issues  are  being  jointly  addressed  by  the  industry,  DOT,  and 
TSA. 
FRA’s Railroad Safety Program 

FRA  is  the  DOT  agency  charged  with  carrying  out  the  Federal  railroad  safety 
laws. The laws provide FRA, as the Secretary’s delegate, with very broad authority 
over  every  area  of  railroad  safety.  In  exercising  that  authority,  the  agency  has 
issued  and  enforces  a  wide  range  of  railroad  safety  regulations.  Several  of  FRA’s 
rules  have  been  developed  with  specific  consideration  of  security  concerns.  For  ex-
ample,  FRA’s  January  2002  final  rule  barring  most  extraterritorial  dispatching  of 
U.S. railroad operations is based in part on the agency’s concerns about the security 
of foreign dispatching facilities. Similarly, FRA’s rule on passenger train emergency 
preparedness,  discussed  more  fully  below,  requires  carriers  to  prepare  plans  that 
deal  with  criminal  as  well  as  accidental  events.  While  most  of  FRA’s  rules  are  fo-
cused  on  the  safety  of  railroad  operations  and  not  explicitly  based  on  security  con-
cerns,  they  also  necessarily  have  some  bearing  on  security.  For  example,  a  railroad 
inspector  performing  an  inspection  required  by  an  FRA  safety  regulation  could  po-
tentially  uncover  a  hazardous  condition  that  was  intentionally  caused  by  terrorist 
activity. Similarly, Federal passenger and freight equipment standards are intended 
to  ensure  that  the  equipment  can  withstand  forces  of  derailments  and  collisions, 
whether  caused  by  accidents  or  deliberate  acts,  thereby  helping  to  protect  pas-
sengers, employees, and surrounding communities. 

In addition, FRA enforces in the rail mode of transportation the Hazardous Mate-
rials Regulations, which are promulgated by PHMSA. These regulations include re-
quirements  that  railroads  and  other  transporters  of  hazmat,  as  well  as  shippers, 
have  and  adhere  to  security  plans  and  also  train  their  employees  involved  in  offer-
ing,  accepting,  or  transporting  hazmat  on  both  safety  and  security  matters,  as  dis-
cussed more fully below. 

To  address  the  key  safety  issues  facing  the  railroad  industry,  in  May  2005,  DOT 
and  FRA  launched  an  aggressive  and  ambitious  National  Rail  Safety  Action  Plan 
with the following strategy: 

• Target the most frequent, highest-risk causes of accidents; 
• Focus FRA’s oversight and inspection resources more precisely; and 
• Accelerate research efforts that have the potential to mitigate the largest risks. 
FRA’s  plan  includes  initiatives  in  several  areas:  reducing  human  factor-caused 
train accidents, the largest category of train accidents; acting to address the serious 
problem of fatigue among railroad operating employees; improving track safety; im-
proving emergency preparedness and enhancing hazmat safety, including evaluating 
and  improving  the  integrity  of  tank  cars  used  to  transport  hazmat;  and  improving 
highway-rail  grade  crossing  safety.  One  of  the  primary  elements  of  the  Action  Plan 
is the implementation of a National Inspection Plan, which uses sophisticated trend 
analysis  to  ensure  that  FRA  is  properly  allocating  its  inspectors  so  that  they  are 
directing  their  efforts  on  areas  of  greatest  safety  concern.  A  summary  of  the  steps 
FRA has taken in implementing the Action Plan is attached to my statement. 

Though  the  Action  Plan  is  focused  on  rail  safety,  rail  security  will  also  be  im-
proved.  In  particular,  enhancements  to  hazmat  safety  and  emergency  preparedness 
will result in enhancements to rail security. 
FRA’s Role in Railroad Security 

FRA’s  involvement  in  railroad  security  predates  the  terrorist  attacks  on  Sep-
tember  11,  2001.  From  October  1995  (when  a  deliberate  act  of  vandalism  caused  a 
fatal Amtrak derailment near Hyder, Arizona) through March 2006 (when the USA 
PATRIOT Improvement and Reauthorization Act of 2005 was enacted), FRA helped 
develop and worked with Congress to secure the enactment of Federal criminal leg-
islation  to  deter  and  punish  more  effectively  terrorist  attacks  against  railroads  and 
mass transportation systems. Additionally, in 1998 FRA issued a regulation requir-
ing  passenger  railroads  to  prepare,  and  secure  FRA  approval  of,  plans  to  address 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

emergencies, including security threats, to train employees on the plan, and to con-
duct  emergency  simulation  drills,  as  noted  above  and  discussed  more  fully  below. 
FRA  will  be  exploring  leveraging  the  National  Labor  College,  George  Meany  Train-
ing Campus, to assist in providing security awareness training for railroad employ-
ees  who  are  not  receiving  security  training  under  FRA’s  emergency  preparedness 
regulation or PHMSA’s security regulation. 

Since the September 11 terrorist atrocities, FRA has been actively engaged in the 
railroad  industry’s  response  to  the  terrorist  threat.  The  railroads  have  developed 
their  own  security  plans,  and  FRA  has  worked  with  the  railroads,  rail  labor,  and 
law  enforcement  personnel  to  develop  the  Railway  Alert  Network,  which  permits 
timely distribution of information and intelligence on security issues. Working with 
DOT’s  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA),  we  have  participated  in  security  risk 
assessments  on  commuter  railroads,  and  we  have  conducted  security  risk  assess-
ments  of  Amtrak  as  well.  FRA’s  security  director  works  on  a  daily  basis  with  gov-
ernment agencies and the railroad industry to facilitate communications on security 
issues,  and  also  participates  in  security  training,  reviews  security  plans,  and  per-
forms other activities to promote rail security. For example, FRA intends to conduct 
at  least  15  security  training  sessions  for  rail  labor  organizations  in  2007,  as  well 
as  four  sessions  at  the  FBI  Academy  on  railroad  security  and  emergency  response 
for law enforcement personnel. 

In September 2004, DOT and DHS entered into a memorandum of understanding 
(MOU)  concerning  their  respective  roles  on  security  issues.  The  MOU  notes  that 
DHS  has  primary  responsibility  for  security  in  all  modes  of  transportation  but  also 
recognizes that DOT has responsibilities in the area of transportation security. The 
MOU  reflects  the  agencies’  shared  commitment  to  a  systems  risk-based  approach 
and  to  development  of  practical  solutions,  recognizing  that  each  agency  brings  core 
competencies, legal authorities, resources, and expertise to the railroad mission. The 
MOU requires early coordination between the parties on the development of regula-
tions  affecting  security.  Separate  annexes  have  been  signed  concerning  the  imple-
mentation  of  the  Homeland  Security  Council’s  recommendations  concerning  TIH 
materials,  and  concerning  the  coordination  between  FRA  and  TSA,  FTA  and  TSA, 
and PHMSA and TSA on security matters. 

The  FRA–TSA  annex  provides  for  close  cooperation  between  the  two  agencies  on 
railroad  security  regulations,  legislation,  research  and  development,  inspection  ac-
tivities, and response to threats to railroad security in order to maximize passenger 
and  freight  railroad  security  while  minimizing  disruptions  to  railroad  operations  to 
the  extent  practicable.  The  agreement  provides  that  if  an  FRA  inspector  observes 
a  significant  security  issue,  the  information  will  be  provided  to  TSA  and  the  rail-
road; similarly, if a TSA inspector observes a significant rail safety issue, the infor-
mation  will  be  provided  to  FRA  and  the  railroad.  FRA  has  one  full-time  employee 
addressing rail security matters, and all of our 71 hazmat inspectors and specialists, 
along  with  17  State  inspectors,  devote  a  portion  of  their  time  to  reviewing  railroad 
and  shipper  security  plans  for  compliance  with  PHMSA’s  security  regulations  dis-
cussed below. 
Freight Railroad Security 

Railroads  have  voluntarily  developed  and  adopted  security  plans  based  on  com-
prehensive  risk  analyses,  and  the  national  intelligence  community’s  best  practices, 
that address the security of not only hazmat but of freight in general. The Associa-
tion  of  American  Railroads  (AAR)  has  established  guidance  for  the  major  freight 
railroads  in  the  form  of  a  model  strategic  security  plan.  The  railroad  industry  has 
also developed a detailed protocol (AAR Circular OT–55-I) on recommended railroad 
operating  practices  for  transportation  of  high-risk  hazardous  materials  (including 
TIH).  FRA,  PHMSA,  and  TSA  have  jointly  worked  with  the  railroad  industry  to 
build upon the railroads’ security efforts through vulnerability assessments, develop-
ment of voluntary security action items, and rulemakings. Additionally, FRA has ar-
ranged a conference to permit railroads and chemical shippers to discuss routing op-
tions for the movement of TIH materials, as explained more fully below. 

A  special  focus  for  FRA  and  DOT,  collectively,  is  the  security  of  hazmat  trans-
ported by rail. A major initiative has been PHMSA’s March 2003 regulation requir-
ing  each  shipper  and  carrier  of  significant  quantities  (placardable  amounts)  of 
hazmat  to  adopt  and  comply  with  a  security  plan.  See  49  CFR  § 172.800  et  seq. 
Under  the  PHMSA  regulation,  security  plans  must  include  an  assessment  of  secu-
rity  risks  and  appropriate  countermeasures  or  mitigation  strategies,  or  both,  to  ad-
dress  those  risks.  The  plans  must,  at  a  minimum,  address  three  specific  areas:  the 
security  of  company  personnel;  unauthorized  access  to  company  property;  and  the 
security of hazmat shipped or transported by the company from its origin to its des-
tination.  To  assist  railroads  that  transport  hazmat  and  shippers  that  offer  hazmat 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

for transportation by rail to comply with this regulation, particularly small- and me-
dium-sized companies, PHMSA developed a program on how to write and implement 
security plans for their companies. 

FRA  recognizes  that  railroad  and  shipper  employees’  awareness  and  under-
standing  of  the  PHMSA  regulation  and  procedures  governing  the  safe  and  secure 
transportation of hazmat shipments are critical. Therefore, PHMSA’s regulation pro-
vides  for  safety  and  security  training  for  employees  engaged  in  the  transportation 
of hazmat. Specifically, each shipper and carrier of significant quantities of hazmat 
is also required to conduct two types of security training for its employees: security 
awareness  training  that  provides  an  awareness  of  risks  associated  with  hazmat 
transportation  and  methods  designed  to  enhance  hazmat  transportation  security, 
and in-depth security training concerning the company’s security plan and its imple-
mentation.  These  training  requirements  are  also  recurrent;  employees  must  receive 
the required training at least every 3 years. To date, FRA personnel have reviewed 
more  than  6,105  security  plans  (including  plans  for  shippers  by  rail  and  the  plans 
for  all  Class  I  freight  railroad  carriers)  and  conducted  4,054  inspections  for  compli-
ance  with  the  security  training  requirements.  Moreover,  FRA’s  security  director  is 
currently working with the American Short Line and Regional Railroad Association 
to  provide  hazmat  security  training  and  conduct  security  reviews  at  approximately 
125 short line railroads in 2007. 

In  April  2004,  DHS  and  DOT  took  specific  actions  to  improve  the  security  of  rail 
shipments of TIH materials. As part of this initiative, DHS and DOT, in cooperation 
with  the  railroads,  are  assessing  the  vulnerabilities  of  High  Threat  Urban  Areas 
(HTUAs)  through  which  TIH  materials  move  by  rail  in  significant  quantity.  These 
assessments helped result in the railroads agreeing to voluntarily implement 27 Se-
curity Action Items designed to improve the security of rail movements of TIH mate-
rials. The Action Items address system security and access control (i.e., practices af-
fecting the security of railroads and their property), as well as en-route security (the 
actual movement and handling of railcars containing TIH materials), particularly in 
HTUAs.  Full  implementation  of  the  Action  Items  is  expected  to  raise  the  security 
baseline for the transportation of TIH materials. Implementation of the first 24 Ac-
tion Items had begun when they were announced in June 2006, and implementation 
of  the  remaining  3  Action  Items  dealing  with  HTUAs  had  also  been  initiated  when 
they were announced on November 21, 2006. 

In  August  2004,  DOT  and  TSA  published  a  notice  and  request  for  comments  in 
the Federal Register asking for input on aspects of TIH rail shipments, the DOT se-
curity  program  requirement,  and  the  need  for  additional  regulation.  Following  re-
view and consideration of the comments received, PHMSA, in consultation with FRA 
and TSA, published a notice of proposed rulemaking on December 21, 2006, to revise 
current  requirements  for  the  safe  and  secure  rail  transportation  of  hazmat.  See  71 
FR  76833.  Likewise,  TSA  concurrently  proposed  enhancements  to  rail  security  re-
quirements.  See  71  FR  76852.  Specifically,  PHMSA’s  proposal  would  require  rail-
roads to— 

porarily stored in transit as part of their security plans; 

• compile annual data on specified hazmat rail shipments; 
• use  the  data  annually  to  analyze  safety  and  security  risks  along  rail  transpor-
tation  routes  where  those  materials  are  transported  and  one  possible  alter-
native to each route; 
• utilize  the  analyses  in  selecting  the  safest  and  most  secure  commercially  prac-
ticable routes the carrier is authorized to operate over in transporting these ma-
terials; 
• address the security risks associated with shipments delayed in transit or tem-
• notify consignees if there is a significant unplanned delay affecting the delivery 
• work  with  shippers  and  consignees  to  minimize  the  time  a  rail  car  containing 
certain  types  of  hazardous  materials  is  placed  on  track  awaiting  pick-up  or  de-
livery or transfer from one carrier to another; 
• notify  storage  facilities  and  consignees  when  rail  cars  containing  certain  types 
• conduct  security  visual  inspections  at  ground  level  of  rail  cars  containing  haz-
ardous materials to inspect for signs of tampering or the introduction of an im-
provised explosive device (IED). 

of hazardous materials are delivered to a storage or consignee facility; and 

of certain types of hazardous material; 

PHMSA  and  FRA  will  hold  two  public  meetings,  one  on  February  1,  2007,  in 
Washington,  D.C.,  and  the  second  on  February  9,  2007,  in  Dallas,  Texas,  to  obtain 
oral comments on the proposed requirements. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

DHS has provided funding to the Railroad Research Foundation, a nonprofit orga-
nization  devoted  to  sustaining  a  safe  and  productive  railroad  industry,  to  develop 
a  Web-based  tool  to  calculate  rail  route  specific  hazmat  risks,  and  assist  in  route 
selection  decisions.  This  tool  would  be  available  to  rail  carriers  in  performing  route 
analysis, and to DOT, TSA, and government emergency planners. 

In  late  2005,  FRA  granted  a  request  by  the  AAR  and  the  American  Chemistry 
Council  to  convene  a  section  333  conference  to  discuss  ways  to  minimize  security 
and  safety  risks  flowing  from  the  transportation  by  rail  of  TIH  materials.  Section 
333 of title 49 of the United States Code authorizes the FRA Administrator, as dele-
gate of the Secretary of Transportation, to convene conferences at the request of one 
or more railroads to address coordination of operations and facilities of rail carriers 
in order to achieve a more efficient, economical, and viable rail system. Persons at-
tending a section 333 conference are immune from antitrust liability for any discus-
sions at the conference, and can also receive immunity for any resulting agreements 
that  receive  FRA  approval.  The  conference  has  been  carefully  structured  to  mini-
mize  antitrust  concerns  involving  the  chemical  manufacturers  and  shippers.  The 
conference provides the railroads and chemical manufacturers and shippers with the 
opportunity to meet and discuss approaches to reduce the amount of TIH materials 
moved  by  rail,  and  to  enhance  the  safety  and  security  of  TIH  materials  that  are 
moved. FRA, PHMSA, and representatives from the Department of Justice, the Fed-
eral Trade Commission, TSA, and the Surface Transportation Board (STB) are par-
ticipating  in  these  discussions.  The  initial  efforts  of  the  conference  are  focused  on 
chlorine and anhydrous ammonia rail transport because they represent over 80 per-
cent  of  all  TIH  rail  shipments.  FRA  has  met  with  the  rail  carriers  to  discuss  mod-
eling  and  routing  options.  Further  meetings  with  the  rail  carriers,  as  well  as  sepa-
rate  meetings  with  the  chlorine  and  anhydrous  ammonia  shippers,  are  planned  for 
early this year. In some instances, the projects agreed to at the conference may need 
the approval of the STB in order to be implemented. 

While  we  must  remain  ever  vigilant  to  secure  hazmat  shipments  on  our  Nation’s 
railroads,  for  the  sake  of  railroad  employees  and  the  public  whom  we  all  serve,  it 
bears  emphasizing  that  the  vast  majority  of  hazmat  shipments  arrive  at  their  des-
tinations safely. Considering just chlorine, for example, since 1965 (the earliest data 
available) there have been at least 2.2 million tank car shipments of chlorine—only 
788  of  which  were  involved  in  accidents  (0.036  percent  of  all  the  shipments).  Of 
those  accidents,  there  were  11  instances  of  a  catastrophic  loss  (i.e.,  a  loss  of  all,  or 
nearly  all)  of  the  chlorine  lading  (0.0005  percent  of  all  the  shipments).  Of  the  11 
catastrophic losses, four resulted in fatalities (0.00018 percent of all the shipments). 
For  all  hazardous  materials,  in  the  12  years  from  1994  through  2005,  hazardous 
materials released in railroad accidents resulted in a total of 14 fatalities. While one 
death  is  obviously  too  many,  the  record  of  transporting  these  commodities  is  very 
good, and we believe the initiatives underway will further improve upon that record. 
Passenger Railroad Security 

As discussed earlier, in the area of passenger railroad security, FRA requires each 
railroad  that  operates  intercity  or  commuter  passenger  train  service  or  that  hosts 
the  operation  of  such  service  to  adopt  and  comply  with  a  written  emergency  pre-
paredness plan approved by FRA. See 49 CFR Part 239. The regulation makes clear 
that  an  ‘‘emergency’’  includes  a  security-related  situation.  Each  plan  must  address 
employee training and qualification, and provide for both initial and recurrent train-
ing. Additionally, each railroad must establish and maintain a working relationship 
with  emergency  responders  on  its  line  by  taking  measures  such  as  developing  and 
making  available  a  training  program  on  the  plan  and  inviting  the  emergency  re-
sponders to participate in emergency simulations. The regulation requires railroads 
providing  passenger  service  to  periodically  conduct  full-scale  passenger  train  emer-
gency simulations (with actual equipment and simulated victims) and conduct a de-
briefing  and  critique  session  after  actual  or  simulated  passenger  train  emergency 
situations.  FRA  will  continue  monitoring  passenger  railroads  for  compliance  with 
this  regulation  and  attend  each  full-scale  simulation  and  follow-up  review  session, 
such  as  one  scheduled  by  the  Long  Island  Rail  Road  for  March  with  the  New  York 
City Fire Department. 

In  2003,  under  the  auspices  of  FRA’s  Railroad  Safety  Advisory  Committee 
(RSAC),  FRA  initiated  a  review  of  existing  passenger  train  safety  needs  and  pro-
grams  for  the  purpose  of  developing  any  necessary  recommendations  on  actions  to 
advance  the  safety  of  passenger  rail  service.  The  RSAC  is  a  forum  for  developing 
recommendations  to  FRA  on  rulemakings  and  other  safety  program  issues,  and  it 
includes  representatives  from  all  of  the  rail  industry’s  major  groups,  State  rep-
resentatives,  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB),  and  other  stake-
holders. As part of this effort, the Passenger Safety Working Group was established, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

as  well  as  four  smaller  task  forces,  notably  the  Emergency  Preparedness  Task 
Force.  The  Emergency  Preparedness  Task  Force  is  specifically  devoted  to  consider-
ation  of  passenger  train  emergency  preparedness  issues,  and  includes  representa-
tives  from  railroads,  rail  labor  organizations,  the  NTSB,  FTA,  and  TSA.  Its  efforts 
helped lead to the issuance of proposed enhancements and additions to FRA’s regu-
lations  for  passenger  train  emergency  systems  (emergency  systems  NPRM).  See  71 
FR 50276; August 24, 2006. 

Emergency  communication  is  one  of  the  main  focuses  of  the  emergency  systems 
NPRM.  Under  the  proposal,  all  existing  passenger  cars  would  be  required  to  be 
equipped  with  a  public  address  system  by  2012  that  provides  a  means  for  a  crew-
member  to  communicate  to  all  train  passengers  in  an  emergency  situation,  and  all 
new passenger cars would be required to be equipped with an intercom system that 
provides a means for passengers and crewmembers to communicate with each other 
in  an  emergency  situation.  An  intercom  system  could  be  vital  in  enabling  a  pas-
senger  to  quickly  alert  a  crewmember  of  a  security  threat,  and  the  crewmember  in 
turn  could  contact  the  appropriate  authorities  to  obtain  emergency  assistance  and 
use  the  train’s  public  address  system  to  provide  any  necessary  direction  to  pas-
sengers. The proposed rulemaking would also promote passenger and employee safe-
ty  in  an  emergency  situation—whether  resulting  from  an  accidental  or  an  inten-
tional  act—by  enhancing  requirements  for  emergency  window  exits  in  passenger 
cars  and  mandating  that  all  passenger  cars,  including  existing  cars,  have  rescue 
windows  for  emergency  responder  access.  FRA  is  in  the  process  of  preparing  the 
final  rule,  which  is  expected  to  be  issued  by  the  middle  of  this  year.  Moreover,  a 
separate  regulatory  proposal  is  also  in  development  within  the  Emergency  Pre-
paredness  Task  Force,  focusing  on  passenger  car  emergency  signage,  low-location 
exit path marking, and emergency lighting. The proposal will be based on American 
Public  Transportation  Association  (APTA)  standards  for  passenger  safety,  will  aug-
ment  current  Federal  requirements,  and  is  expected  to  be  published  by  the  end  of 
2007. 

Complementing  FRA’s  regulations,  Amtrak  and  commuter  railroads  have  insti-
tuted  their  own  security  plans  and  conduct  security  training.  FRA  assisted  Amtrak 
in  the  development  of  its  security  plan.  Specifically,  in  coordination  with  Amtrak’s 
Inspector General, FRA contracted with the RAND Corporation to conduct a system-
atic review and assessment of Amtrak’s security posture, corporate strategic security 
planning, and programs focusing on the adequacy of preparedness for combating ter-
rorist  threats.  FRA’s  security  director  is  currently  working  with  Amtrak  to  imple-
ment the recommendations of the RAND study. APTA is also leading commuter rail-
roads  in  the  development  of  voluntary  industry  standards  for  passenger  rail  safety 
and security. 

FRA  inspectors  have  conducted  basic  security  reviews  of  Amtrak  and  commuter 
railroad  security  both  after  the  2004  train  bombings  in  Madrid  and  after  the  2005 
transit  bombings  in  London.  In  both  cases,  FRA  inspectors  were  deployed  imme-
diately after the bombings to assess the security posture of passenger railroad facili-
ties  based  on  a  checklist  of  major  security  criteria.  In  the  aftermath  of  the  London 
bombings,  FRA  worked  closely  on  these  security  reviews  with  TSA’s  new  rail  secu-
rity  inspectors.  TSA  focused  primarily  on  urban  rapid  transit  lines,  while  FRA  in-
spectors concentrated on commuter and intercity passenger operations; in some situ-
ations,  inspectors  from  the  two  agencies  worked  jointly.  FRA  will  continue  to  sup-
port TSA in responding to rail security threats. 

In  partnership  with  FTA,  FRA  also  participated  in  security  risk  assessments  on 
the ten largest commuter railroads and contributed the funding for security risk as-
sessments  on  three  of  these  railroads.  In  addition,  FRA  participated  in  FTA’s  ‘‘best 
practices  tool  kit’’  initiative,  contributing  our  knowledge  of  commuter  rail  oper-
ations,  infrastructure,  and  organization  to  ensure  that  the  recommended  security 
enhancement  measures  were  sound  and  feasible  in  a  railroad  environment.  FRA 
staff  worked  closely  with  many  of  the  railroads  that  receive  FTA  grant  funding,  to 
plan and assist in the development and implementation of security simulations and 
drills. FRA also devoted staff with both railroad knowledge and facilitation skills to 
the  17  FTA-sponsored  workshops  across  the  country  (called  ‘‘Connecting  Commu-
nities’’) to bring together commuter railroads, emergency responders, and State and 
local  government  leaders  so  that  they  might  better  coordinate  their  security  plans 
and emergency response efforts. 
Research and Development 

FRA conducts and supports research, development, and demonstration projects re-
lated to rail safety and rail security through its Office of Research and Development, 
in  cooperation  with  DHS.  Both  theoretical  and  applied  research  on  a  wide  range  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

issues  has  led  to  impressive  results  and  tangible  technology  and  process  improve-
ments. 

A  recent  example  of  the  application  of  FRA’s  research  efforts  to  both  rail  safety 
and  security  is  the  Passenger  Rail  Vehicle  Emergency  Evacuation  Simulator,  or 
‘‘Rollover  Rig.’’  This  device,  which  began  operation  in  2006,  can  rotate  a  full-sized 
commuter  rail  car  up  to  180  degrees  to  simulate  passenger  train  derailment  sce-
narios. The Rollover Rig is already enhancing the ability of researchers to test strat-
egies  for  evacuating  passenger  rail  cars  and  to  evaluate  the  performance  of  emer-
gency systems in the cars, such as emergency lighting, doors, and windows. In addi-
tion,  first  responders  nationwide  now  have  a  unique  training  tool  to  practice  effec-
tive  passenger  rail  rescue  techniques  safely  when  a  rail  car  is  on  its  side.  FRA  de-
veloped the Rollover Rig at a cost of $450,000. New Jersey Transit Rail Operations 
donated the commuter rail car used by the Rollover Rig, and the Washington Metro-
politan Area Transit Authority agreed to house, operate, and maintain the simulator 
at its emergency response training facility located in Landover, Maryland. 

We also continue to look for ways to improve tank car survivability, to reduce the 
likelihood that a tank car may be breached either by accident or by intentional act. 
PHMSA’s and FRA’s efforts to improve tank car survivability have a long and effec-
tive history. Working with the industry, all tank cars carrying hazardous materials 
now have top and bottom shelf couplers, and, as appropriate, tank cars are equipped 
with  head  shields,  thermal  protection,  and  skid  protection  for  protruding  bottom 
outlets.  Tank  cars  carrying  specific  product  groups,  such  as  TIH  and  other  particu-
larly  hazardous  substances,  are  subject  to  additional  requirements  which  became 
fully effective July 1, 2006, after a 10-year phase-in period. 

Prior  to  the  August  2005  enactment  of  Section  9005  of  the  Safe,  Accountable, 
Flexible,  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU), 
FRA  had  initiated  tank  car  structural  integrity  research  stemming  from  the  cir-
cumstances  of  the  2002  derailment  in  Minot,  North  Dakota,  involving  the  release 
of  anhydrous  ammonia  from  a  tank  car  punctured  during  the  derailment.  Current 
research  involves  a  three-step  process  to  assess  the  effects  of  various  types  of  train 
accidents  (e.g.,  a  derailment  or  collision)  on  a  tank  car.  The  first  phase  is  develop-
ment  of  a  physics-based  model  to  analyze  the  kinematics  of  rail  cars  in  a  derail-
ment.  The  second  phase  is  development  of  a  valid  dynamic  structural  analysis 
model;  and  the  third  phase  is  an  assessment  of  the  damage  created  by  a  puncture 
and  entails  the  application  of  fracture  mechanics  testing  and  analysis  methods. 
DOT’s  Volpe  National  Transportation  Systems  Center  is  doing  the  modeling  work 
now,  and  FRA  will  dovetail  this  ongoing  research  with  the  requirements  of  Section 
9005.  FRA,  in  conjunction  with  PHMSA,  hopes  to  develop  new  hazardous  material 
tank  car  safety  standards  in  2008,  and  we  are  currently  consulting  with  railroads, 
shippers, and car manufacturers and have solicited public comments to assist us in 
this effort. In this connection, FRA just signed a Memorandum of Cooperation with 
Dow Chemical Company, Union Pacific Railroad, and the Union Tank Car Company 
to participate in their Next Generation Rail Tank Car Project and advance rail tank 
car safety. 

Further, in September 2006, FRA awarded $200,000 to test sample tank car pan-
els  with  various  coatings  to  determine  their  ability  to  prevent  penetration  from 
small arms fire, as well as their ability to self-seal and, thereby, mitigate the sever-
ity  of  any  incident.  FRA  developed  the  project  in  coordination  with  the  AAR  and 
DHS, which came up with the idea of applying to tank cars a protective coating like 
that used to enhance the armor protection of military vehicles in Iraq. 

FRA  has  other  research  and  development  projects  underway  related  to  rail  secu-

rity which we would be happy to discuss with Committee staff. 
Conclusion 

FRA will continue to support TSA in carrying out its security responsibilities, and 
work  with  the  rail  industry  to  secure  the  Nation’s  freight  and  passenger  railroad 
network. Together, DOT, TSA, and the rail industry are helping to ensure that secu-
rity  initiatives  and  programs  are  directed  at  potential  threats  to  the  Nation’s  rail-
road network and that rail employees and others responsible for its security are pre-
pared to identify and address such threats. 
Attachment 

SUMMARY OF THE STEPS FRA HAS TAKEN TO IMPLEMENT ITS NATIONAL RAIL SAFETY 

ACTION PLAN 

In response to various rail safety concerns, including some recent major train acci-
dents,  such  as  Graniteville,  SC,  and  the  lack  of  substantial  improvement  in  the 
train  accident  rate  in  recent  years,  Secretary  of  Transportation  Norman  Mineta 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

launched the National Rail Safety Action Plan in May 2005. FRA has made real and 
substantial  progress  in  bringing  its  aggressive  and  ambitious  National  Rail  Safety 
Action Plan to fruition. 

To reduce the number of train accidents caused by human factors (the largest cat-

egory of train accidents), FRA— 

• Issued  a  proposed  Federal  rule  in  October  2006  that  would  address  top  causes 
of  human  factor  train  accidents  (such  as  failing  to  return  a  track  switch  to  its 
proper  position,  which  led  to  the  Graniteville  accident).  The  final  rule  is  ex-
pected to be issued in mid-2007. 
• Implemented an ongoing research program to identify human performance prob-
lems.  Railroads,  their  employees,  and  FRA  are  entering  into  agreements  that 
permit the employees to report unsafe events that do not result in a reportable 
accident but could have done so, without the fear of discipline. 
• Made available to railroads and their employees a fatigue model that can assist 
them in developing crew scheduling practices based on the best current science. 
• Approved  the  first  positive  train  control  system  capable  of  automatically  con-
trolling  train  speed  and  movements  to  prevent  train  collisions  and  other  acci-
dents—the  system  will  be  installed  on  many  BNSF  Railway  Company  (BNSF) 
rail lines. 
• Completed a pilot project, in partnership with BNSF, to develop a low-cost sys-
tem  that  electronically  monitors,  detects,  and  reports  a  misaligned  switch  on 
mainline  track  located  in  non-signaled  track  territory.  BNSF  plans  expansion 
of  this  and  other  similar  systems  on  other  non-signaled  lines  of  their  company. 
To  help  prevent  track-caused  train  accidents  (the  second-leading  category),  FRA— 
• Developed an automated track inspection system that uses high-resolution video 
to  detect  cracks  in  joint  bars  and  that  can  be  deployed  on  a  hi-rail  vehicle  to 
detect  visible  cracks  in  joint  bars  without  having  to  stop  the  vehicle.  Testing 
showed  that  the  high-resolution  video  system  detected  visual  cracks  that  were 
missed  by  the  traditional  visual  inspections.  The  system  was  demonstrated  to 
the railroads during Summer and Fall of 2006. 
• Issued  a  final  rule  requiring  track  owners  to  develop  and  implement  a  proce-
dure  for  the  detailed  inspection  of  rail  joints  in  continuous  welded  rail  track. 
• Contracted  for  the  construction  of  two  automated  track  inspection  vehicles,  to 
be delivered in February and March, which will bring FRA’s fleet to five, allow-
ing  FRA  to  inspect  nearly  100,000  track-miles  each  year,  which  triples  the 
present  capacity.  This  additional  capability  will  permit  FRA  to  inspect  more 
miles  of  major  hazardous  material  (hazmat)  and  passenger  routes,  while  also 
having the ability to follow up more quickly on routes where safety performance 
is substandard. 

To improve hazmat safety and emergency response capability, FRA improved emer-
gency responders’ timely access to hazmat information. As discussed in FRA’s testi-
mony  today,  FRA  also  accelerated  its  tank  car  structural  research,  hopes  to  issue 
new  tank  car  performance  standards  in  2008,  and  has  issued  an  NPRM  on  pas-
senger train emergency systems. 

To  strengthen  FRA’s  rail  safety  inspection  and  enforcement  program,  FRA  has 
made  better  use  of  data  to  direct  FRA  safety  inspectors  and  other  resources  to 
where  problems  are  likely  to  arise.  FRA’s  new  National  Inspection  Plan  was  fully 
implemented for all FRA safety disciplines in March 2006, and further training will 
be provided to FRA safety personnel on how to best use the data during the sched-
uled national technical conferences this year. 

To foster further improvements in highway-rail grade crossing safety, FRA— 
• Built  partnerships  with  State  and  local  agencies  by  issuing,  in  May  2005,  and 
extensively distributing a safety advisory describing the roles of the Federal and 
State governments and of the railroads in crossing safety. The advisory also re-
minds  railroads  of  their  responsibilities  in  relation  to  crossing  accident  report-
ing and investigation and offers assistance to local authorities in the investiga-
tion  of  crossing  collisions  where  information  or  expertise  within  FRA  control  is 
required to complete the investigation. 
• Aided  the  State  of  Louisiana  in  developing  a  crossing  safety  action  plan.  This 
State  has  consistently  ranked  among  the  top  five  with  the  highest  number  of 
crossing collisions and fatalities. The State approved the plan in April 2006. 
• Launched an ongoing public safety inquiry into safety at private crossings. 
We  would  be  glad  to  provide  the  Committee  with  additional  information  on  the 

current status of FRA’s implementation of the National Rail Safety Action Plan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Hill? 

21 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN H. HILL, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION, DOT 
Mr. HILL. Thank you for inviting me today to discuss the Federal 
Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration’s  role  in  contributing  to  the 
security of truck and bus transportation on our highways. 

Following  the  tragic  events  of  September  11,  2001,  FMCSA  rec-
ognized  immediately  the  risk  of  terrorism  associated  with  the 
transportation of hazardous materials. 

Within  a  month,  the  agency—along  with  our  State  partners— 
began  visiting  all  motor  carriers  that  transport  hazardous  mate-
rials  to  ensure  that  they  were  aware  of  the  potential  vulnerability 
and  basic  security  measures.  In  7  months,  State  and  FMCSA  staff 
conducted  over  30,000  security  sensitivity  visits  on  hazardous  ma-
terial carriers. 

FMCSA  also  worked  with  the  Research  and  Special  Programs 
Administration—now the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety 
Administration—to  develop  regulations  requiring  hazardous  mate-
rials  and  carriers  and  shippers  to  develop  security  plans  and  train 
their  employees  about  hazardous  materials  security.  Following  im-
plementation of this regulation, FMCSA took steps to educate both 
the industry, our field staff, and the State enforcement officials. 

The  agency  also  developed  procedures  to  check  compliance  with 
hazardous materials security regulations in what we call a Security 
Contact  Review.  To  date,  FMCSA  has  conducted  over  4,000  Secu-
rity  Contact  Reviews,  and  we’ve  assessed  civil  penalties  against 
over 400 entities for failure to comply with the basic security regu-
lations. 

In  2004,  our  agency  promulgated  regulations  to  require  carriers 
of  certain  hazardous  materials  to  obtain  a  hazardous  materials 
safety permit. The program—applies to carriers that transport high 
explosives, high route-controlled quantities of radioactive materials, 
and materials that are toxic by inhalation hazard, and large quan-
tities of liquefied natural gas. 

Currently,  over  1,100  motor  carriers  have  a  current  hazardous 
materials  safety  permit.  The  program  is  an  example  of  an  area 
where security overlaps with FMCSA’s safety mission. 

FMCSA’s  primary  security  activities  at  this  point  involve  the 
transportation of hazardous materials. We continue to ensure com-
pliance  with  security  training,  and  security  plans,  regulations 
through our Security Contact Review, and we take enforcement for 
non-compliance as warranted. 

We’ve  met  with  TSA,  and  we  work  with  them  to  ensure  that 
their Corporate Security Review, conducted by their personnel, are 
not duplicative on the industry for the work that they’re doing. 

Decisions  regarding  the  routing  of  hazardous  materials  is  one 
area  FMCSA  has  identified  as  relating  to  security,  in  addition  to 
the  safety  issues  that  were  originally  the  impetus  for  the  regula-
tions. 

FMCSA has two sets of regulations governing the routing of haz-
ardous  materials:  Standards  for  routing  of  non-radioactive  mate-
rials,  and  requirements  for  routing  of  highway  route-controlled 
quantities of radioactive materials. Both parts contain sections set-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

ting out requirements States or Indian tribes must follow to estab-
lish,  maintain  and  enforce  hazardous  material  routing  require-
ments. 

To  establish  routing  designations  or  restrictions,  the  State  or 
local  government,  or  Indian  tribe,  must  consider  13  factors.  Cur-
rently, security is not required to be a factor considered in making 
routing  decisions,  and  as  such,  security  is  not  covered  in  the 
FMCSA guidance regarding making routing decisions. 

Last  year,  FMCSA  began  a  study  to  modify  existing  guidance 
materials to State and local government, and Indian tribes, in des-
ignating routes to ensure the safe and secure transportation of HM. 
And second, develop tools that will assist these entities in assessing 
security  vulnerabilities  of  current  and  proposed  hazardous  mate-
rials  routes.  We  expect  to  complete  this  study  by  the  Fall  of  2007. 
Finally,  Mr.  Chairman,  in  conclusion  I  want  to  say  that  as  our 
Nation  moves  more  to  secure  and  protect  our  citizens  from  the 
threat posed by terrorism, it’s important that we move deliberately 
and responsibly to secure our transportation systems without para-
lyzing  them.  That  is  what  FMCSA  has  attempted  to  do  since  the 
tragic  events  of  September  11,  2001,  and  what  we  will  continue  to 
endeavor  to  do  as  we  support  agencies  inside  and  outside  the  De-
partment on transportation security initiatives. 

We  look  forward  to  working  with  your  committee  and  the  other 
agencies present at the hearing today to implement this important 
piece of legislation. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hill follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN H. HILL, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION, DOT 

Introduction 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and Senators of the Committee, thank 
you  for  inviting  me  today  to  discuss  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administra-
tion’s  (FMCSA)  role  in  contributing  to  the  security  of  truck  and  bus  transportation 
on our highways. I am pleased to appear before you to describe FMCSA’s outreach, 
education,  research,  enforcement  and  compliance  programs  that  help  improve  our 
homeland security. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  was  created  in 
1999 with the mission of improving the safety of trucks and buses operating on our 
Nation’s  roads.  Safety  remains  the  primary  mission  of  our  Agency—the  primary 
function of our regulations and our programs. FMCSA also plays a role in the secu-
rity  of  the  truck  and  bus  industries  due  to  our  familiarity  with,  and  oversight  of 
these industries and the close and sometimes overlapping relationship between safe-
ty and security. The proposed legislation touches directly on one of the areas where 
security concerns directly impact our existing regulations—the routing of hazardous 
materials. 
Background 

Following  the  tragic  events  of  September  11,  2001,  FMCSA  recognized  imme-
diately  the  risk  of  terrorism  associated  with  the  transportation  of  hazardous  mate-
rials. Within a month, the agency, with our State partners, began visiting all motor 
carriers  that  transport  hazardous  materials  to  ensure  they  were  aware  of  their  po-
tential  vulnerability  and  discuss  basic  security  measures.  We  felt  these  measures 
were  critical  as  many  of  the  companies  in  the  trucking  industry  are  small  carriers 
with  only  a  few  trucks  and  lacking  the  resources  to  employ  full-time  security  staff. 
In 7 months, State and FMCSA staff conducted over 30,000 Security Sensitivity Vis-
its on hazardous materials carriers. 

FMCSA also began to take other steps to raise awareness about the security risks 
posed by the transportation of hazardous materials, and indeed the potential for ter-
rorists  to  use  the  vehicles  we  regulate,  trucks  and  buses,  as  pawns  in  their  plans 
to inflict terror on our country. Despite the strictly safety mission given to the agen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

cy  by  the  Congress,  these  measures  were  deemed  justified  and  indeed  critical,  par-
ticularly  before  the  creation  of  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA) 
and  in  the  early  days  of  that  organization  when  they  were  rightly  focused  on  avia-
tion security. 

Among  the  steps  FMCSA  took  was  an  outreach  campaign  aimed  at  raising  secu-
rity  awareness  in  the  trucking  industry  and  outreach  to  the  law  enforcement  com-
munity to make them aware of the potential use of trucks, particularly those trans-
porting  hazardous  materials,  as  weapons  of  terrorism.  To  complement  these  out-
reach efforts, we created a training course called ‘‘Trucks n’ Terrorism’’ to make law 
enforcement  officials  aware  of  indicators  that  should  raise  suspicions  regarding  the 
legitimacy of truck transportation. The agency also worked with the motorcoach in-
dustry  to  address  security  issues  involving  transportation  of  people  including  con-
ducting a vulnerability assessment of the motorcoach industry and training to raise 
the security awareness of motor coach drivers and company officials. 

Additionally,  FMCSA  began  a  significant  effort  to  test  technologies  that  had  the 
potential  to  improve  security,  particularly  in  regard  to  the  transportation  of  haz-
ardous  materials.  Many  of  these  technologies  such  as  satellite  tracking  of  vehicles 
and emergency communication devices were already in use as tools to improve safe-
ty or efficiency. FMCSA’s Hazardous Materials Field Operational Test demonstrated 
how  these  technologies  could  also  be  used  to  improve  security  and  quantified  the 
costs and benefits of these technologies. The Hazardous Materials Field Operational 
Test  also  piloted  the  concept  of  a  public-sector  response  system.  FMCSA  provided 
a  copy  of  the  report  and  its  findings  to  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  in 
2005. We are working with DHS on further development of this system. 

FMCSA  also  worked  with  the  Research  and  Special  Programs  Administration 
(RSPA), now the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA) 
to  develop  regulations  requiring  hazardous  materials  carriers  and  shippers  to  de-
velop  security  plans  and  train  their  employees  about  hazardous  materials  security. 
Following implementation of this regulation, FMCSA took steps to educate both the 
industry  and  our  field  staff  and  State  partners.  FMCSA  worked  with  PHMSA,  var-
ious industry associations, and the now established TSA to develop a booklet to as-
sist hazardous materials motor carriers, particularly small businesses, in developing 
an  effective  security  plan.  Copies  of  this  document  were  distributed  to  every  haz-
ardous materials carrier in the FMCSA database. 

To promote enforcement of the new regulation, FMCSA developed a 16-hour train-
ing course to educate our field personnel and State partners, previously focused sole-
ly on safety issues, about basic security practices. The agency also developed proce-
dures  for  checking  compliance  with  hazardous  materials  security  regulations  in 
what we call a Security Contact Review. To date, FMCSA has conducted over 4,000 
Security Contact Reviews and assessed over 400 civil penalties for failure to comply 
with the hazardous materials security regulations. 

In 2004, FMCSA promulgated regulations to require carriers of certain hazardous 
materials  to  obtain  a  hazardous  materials  safety  permit.  This  program  applies  to 
carriers  that  transport  high  explosives,  high  route-controlled  quantities  of  radio-
active materials, materials that are toxic by inhalation hazard, and large quantities 
of  liquefied  natural  gas.  Currently  over  1,100  motor  carriers  have  a  current  haz-
ardous  materials  safety  permit.  The  program  is  an  example  of  an  area  where  secu-
rity  overlaps  FMCSA’s  safety  mission.  In  promulgating  this  regulation,  based  pri-
marily  on  safety  concerns  expressed  in  the  legislation  requiring  this  program,  the 
agency  did  incorporate  some  basic  security  requirements.  However,  it  should  be 
made  clear  that  while  we  developed  a  regulation  that  has  some  security  require-
ments,  it  was  not  meant  to  be  a  comprehensive  security  regulation  and  the  mate-
rials  the  agency  chose  to  make  applicable  to  this  requirement  were  based  on  the 
legislative intent and safety considerations rather than an in-depth analysis of secu-
rity risk. 
FMCSA’s Current Security Role 

Much of the security activity I have just described occurred before, or in the early 
days  of  the  TSA.  For  the  past  few  years,  our  Agency  has  been  working  with  TSA 
to  transfer  the  primary  security  responsibility  for  the  truck  and  bus  industries  to 
TSA. This is not to say that we have abandoned any role in security. As recognized 
in  Executive  Order  13416,  ‘‘Strengthening  Surface  Transportation  Security’’  both 
Departments have responsibilities in the area of transportation security. 

FMCSA’s  primary  security  activities  at  this  point  involve  the  transportation  of 
hazardous  materials  for  which  Congress  gave  the  Department  specific  shared  re-
sponsibility in the Homeland Security Act of 2002. FMCSA continues to ensure com-
pliance  with  security  training  and  security  plan  regulations  through  our  Security 
Contact Reviews and take enforcement action for non-compliance as warranted. We 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

have  met  with  TSA  to  coordinate  these  visits  to  motor  carriers  with  the  Corporate 
Security  Reviews  conducted  by  TSA  personnel  to  ensure  there  is  not  duplication  of 
effort  or  unnecessary  burden  placed  on  the  industry.  We  have  also  begun  work  to 
look at including security considerations in our long-standing regulations specifying 
procedures  for  States  to  follow  when  making  hazardous  materials  routing  distinc-
tions. 

Our  Agency  also  remains  involved  in  consulting  with  DHS  and  TSA  on  various 
issues  ranging  from  our  joint  regulations  for  background  checks  for  drivers  holding 
Commercial Driver’s Licenses with hazardous materials endorsements, implementa-
tion of the REAL ID Act, to participation on panels to make decisions about security 
grants for motorcoach companies. 
Hazardous Materials Routing and Route Plans 

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  decisions  regarding  the  routing  of  hazardous  materials  is 
one  area  FMCSA  has  identified  as  relating  to  security  in  addition  to  the  safety 
issues  that  were  the  original  impetus  for  the  regulations.  FMCSA  has  two  sets  of 
regulations governing the routing of hazardous materials. Standards for the routing 
of  non-radioactive  hazardous  materials  (NRHM)  and  requirements  for  routing  of 
highway  route-controlled  quantities  (HRCQ)  of  radioactive  materials  (RAM).  Both 
parts  contain  sections  setting  out  requirements  States  or  Indian  tribes  must  follow 
to establish, maintain, and enforce HM routing designations. 

To  establish  routing  designations  or  restrictions,  a  State  or  local  government  or 
Indian  tribe  must  consider  13  factors  such  as  population  density,  type  of  highway, 
type  and  quantities  of  HM,  emergency  response  capabilities,  exposure,  terrain  con-
siderations,  alternative  routes,  effects  on  commerce,  delays  in  transportation,  con-
gestion, and accident history. FMCSA has developed guidelines for designating haz-
ardous materials routes or preferred routes for highway route-controlled radioactive 
materials.  Currently  security  is  not  required  to  be  a  factor  considered  in  making 
routing  decisions  and  as  such,  security  is  not  covered  in  the  FMCSA  guidance  re-
garding  making  routing  decisions.  Last  year,  FMCSA  began  a  study  to:  (1)  modify 
existing guidance materials to State and local governments and Indian tribes in des-
ignating routes to ensure the safe and secure transportation of HM; and (2) develop 
tool(s)  that  will  assist  the  these  entities  in  assessing  the  security  vulnerabilities  of 
current  and  proposed  HM  routes.  We  expect  to  complete  the  study  by  the  Fall  of 
2007. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  the  Nation  moves  to  become  more  secure  and  protect  our  citi-
zens  from  the  threat  posed  by  terrorism,  it  is  important  that  we  move  deliberately 
and  responsibly;  to  secure  our  transportation  systems  without  paralyzing  them. 
That  is  what  FMCSA  has  attempted  to  do  since  the  tragic  events  of  September  11, 
2001  and  what  we  continue  to  endeavor  to  do  as  we  support  agencies  inside  and 
outside  the  Department  on  transportation  security  initiatives.  We  look  forward  to 
working  with  your  committee  and  the  other  agencies  present  at  this  hearing  today 
to implement this important piece of legislation. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  All  right.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Adminis-

trator. 

And now, may I recognize Vice Admiral Thomas Barrett, Admin-
istrator  of  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Adminis-
tration. 

STATEMENT  OF  THOMAS  J.  BARRETT,  VICE  ADMIRAL  (RET.), 
USCG;  ADMINISTRATOR,  PIPELINE  AND  HAZARDOUS 
MATERIALS SAFETY ADMINISTRATION, DOT 
Admiral  BARRETT.  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens, 
distinguished members of the Committee, good morning. On behalf 
of  Secretary  Peters  and  myself,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
discuss security of transportation of hazardous materials, including 
pipeline security. 

First, however, I want to thank you for your leadership and sup-
port  in  passing  the  Pipeline  Inspection,  Protection,  Enforcement 
and  Safety  Act  of  2006,  which  the  President  signed  into  law  last 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

month.  This  will  significantly  improve  pipeline  safety,  and  we  will 
implement the law aggressively. 

On today’s subject, like the Committee, the Department strongly 
believes  there  are  opportunities  to  improve  surface  transportation 
security for movement of hazardous materials. We follow a systems 
risk-based  approach,  recognizing  that  safety  and  security  are  re-
lated,  and  that  significant  safety  and  economic  consequences  can 
flow  from  security  decisions.  Our  goal  is  complete  safety,  complete 
security  without  duplicating  efforts,  or  excessively  burdening  com-
merce. 

We believe improvements are best developed using an enterprise 
approach to produce effective measures suited to the demands of an 
economy  that  depends  on  efficient  movement  of  hazardous  mate-
rials.  These  materials  are  essential  to  our  citizens,  are  used  every 
day across the Nation in farming, manufacturing, medical, pharma-
ceuticals,  consumer  products,  and  thousands  of  other  applications 
that shape the quality of our lives. 

Much  progress  has  been  made  since  9/11  to  improve  security  of 
our  transportation  systems,  with  the  active  assistance  and  direc-
tion  of  the  Congress.  DOT  modal  administrations,  including 
FMCSA, have strengthened our relationships with the Department 
of  Homeland  Security  and  TSA,  specifically,  to  enhance  hazardous 
materials security and transportation. 

In  a  recent  annex  to  the  MOU  between  DOT  and  DHS—which 
Kip  Hawley  and  myself  signed—we  have  established  a  joint  work-
ing  group  to  improve  inter-agency  coordination  at  the  practical 
level  on  both  transportation  security  and  safety  matters,  recog-
nizing that each agency brings core competencies, legal authorities, 
resources, and expertise to this shared mission. 

Enhancing security requires, as Mr. Hawley noted, that we start 
with  the  data,  understanding  the  problems,  identifying  gaps;  in-
cluding  gaps  in  understanding  the  risks,  threats,  vulnerabilities, 
likelihoods and consequences of incidents. Our joint working group 
is looking at how to leverage the information that each agency col-
lects  and  possesses,  to  enhance  our  understanding  of  risks  con-
nected  with  hazardous  material  transportation,  and  bring  that  in-
formation  to  bear  in  an  ongoing  basis  in  all  elements  of  our  secu-
rity and safety programs. 

Last  month,  PHMSA  and  FRA  issued  a  notice  of  proposed  rule-
making  to  upgrade  requirements  applicable  to  the  safe  and  secure 
transportation of hazardous materials by rail. We propose requiring 
carriers  to  compile  annual  data  on  specified  shipments  of  haz-
ardous materials, use the data to analyze safety and security risks 
along  routes,  assess  alternate  routing  options,  and  make  decisions 
based  on  those  assessments.  We  will  hold  public  meetings  in  Feb-
ruary to solicit public input on the proposal. 

We  are  also  taking  a  close  look  at  hazmat  security  plan  require-
ments.  TSA  and  PHMSA  recently  initiated  a  project  to  refine  the 
list  of  hazardous  materials  for  which  security  plans  are  required. 
We  published  an  advanced  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  in  Sep-
tember,  hosted  a  public  meeting  in  November,  and  expect  to  issue 
a notice of proposed rulemaking by early summer. 

We’ve  also  taken  a  careful  look  at  access  to  PHMSA’s  National 
Pipeline  Mapping  System,  which  was  removed  from  public  access 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

after  9/11.  We  have  worked  the  issues  with  TSA,  pipeline  stake-
holders,  safety  advocates  and  security  experts,  and  developed  an 
approach we believe will minimize risks, while satisfying legitimate 
public  right-to-know  concerns.  And  we  expect  to  restore  public  ac-
cess to the revised system in the next several months. 

We’re  also  bringing  a  risk-based  systems  approach  to  our  re-
search  related  to  security  to  the  Hazardous  Materials  Cooperative 
Research Program, now in its first-year of program management by 
the Transportation Research Board of the National Academies. 

Like  Congress,  we  focus  on  improving  the  ability  of  States  and 
local  governments  to  prepare  for  hazardous  materials  incidents, 
whatever  their  cause.  We  are  proud  of  our  partnerships  with  the 
National  Association  of  State  Fire  Marshals,  the  International  As-
sociation  of  Fire  Chiefs,  and  the  International  Association  of  Fire-
fighters.  At  the  end  of  the  month,  with  them,  we  will  sponsor  the 
next  in  a  series  of  meetings  of  emergency  responders,  hazmat  in-
dustry  representatives  and  pipeline  operators,  to  strengthen  re-
sponse capabilities and preparedness. 

As  the  Committee  considers  ways  to  improve  transportation,  we 
will  be  pleased  to  work  with  you  to  build  on  the  substantial 
progress  that  has  been  made,  including  lessons  that  we  have 
learned about the path to a comprehensive, systems risk-based ap-
proach. 

We  do  need  flexibility  to  develop  and  implement  solutions.  Risk 
profiles,  as  you  know,  can  change  rapidly,  and  we  must  be  able  to 
be agile in addressing developments in safety and security. We be-
lieve the path forward is an enterprise approach that takes advan-
tage  of  agency  expertise,  considers  the  perspectives  of  all  stake-
holders  and  the  public,  provides  for  regular  reassessment  and  re-
finement  as  transportation  risks,  systems  and  technologies  evolve. 
Mr.  Chairman,  I  commend  you  and  the  members  of  this  com-
mittee  for  your  leadership  on  this  important  topic,  and  would  be 
pleased to answer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Admiral Barrett follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THOMAS J.  BARRETT,  VICE ADMIRAL (RET.),  USCG; 
ADMINISTRATOR,  PIPELINE AND HAZARDOUS MATERIALS SAFETY ADMINISTRATION, 
DOT 
Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Chairman  Lautenberg,  and  distin-
guished  members  of  the  Committee,  on  behalf  of  the  Secretary  of  Transportation, 
I want to thank you for the invitation to appear today. 

I  would  like  to  take  a  moment  at  the  outset  to  commend  the  Committee  for  your 
leadership and support in passing the Pipeline Inspection, Protection, Enforcement, 
and  Safety  Act  of  2006,  Public  Law  109–468,  which  the  President  signed  into  law 
last  month.  The  PIPES  Act  will  save  lives  and  foster  economic  growth  by  strength-
ening the pipeline safety program. 

The Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA) is moving 
ahead to implement the new authority and fulfill the Act’s mandates. We will keep 
the Committee informed of our efforts and progress. 

I  appear  before  you  today  on  another  important  subject:  PHMSA’s  activities  and 

role in enhancing hazardous materials transportation security. 

We  understand  the  Committee  is  considering  options  to  improve  commercial  sur-
face  transportation  security,  and  we  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee. 
Working  in  close  coordination  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS), 
and with the Department of Transportation’s (DOT’s) Federal Railroad Administra-
tion  (FRA)  and  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA),  we  are 
moving forward in that effort on several fronts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

When  it  comes  to  improving  transportation  security,  we  follow  a  systems  risk- 
based approach, recognizing that safety and security are connected, and that signifi-
cant  safety  and  economic  consequences  will  flow  from  our  decisions.  The  success  of 
our efforts over time lies in our ability to mitigate overall risk, while avoiding undue 
burdens on transportation systems, operators, and the public. Effective coordination 
within  the  Federal  Government  is  essential  to  addressing  security  concerns  in  the 
way that the American public deserves. 

Improvement  should  be  developed  in  a  transparent  manner,  with  the  benefit  of 
stakeholder  input,  to  produce  practical  approaches  suited  to  the  demands  of  an 
economy  that  depends  on  the  efficient  movement  of  hazardous  materials.  We  must 
focus  and  prioritize  our  efforts,  preventing  incidents  that  pose  the  greatest  overall 
risk  to  the  public,  property,  and  the  environment,  and  mitigating  the  consequences 
of incidents that cannot be prevented. 
Multi-Modal Hazardous Materials Program 

Hazardous materials are essential to our citizens, and to our economy. These ma-
terials fuel automobiles, heat and cool our homes and offices, and are used in farm-
ing,  medical  applications,  manufacturing,  mining,  and  other  industrial  processes. 
More than 3 billion tons of regulated hazardous materials—including explosive, poi-
sonous, corrosive, flammable, and radioactive materials—are transported each year. 
We  oversee  the  safe  and  secure  shipment  of  over  1.2  million  daily  movements  of 
hazardous materials moving through the air; on the railroads, seas and waterways; 
and  over  the  highways.  Many  of  these  shipments  require  transfer  between  modes. 
Programs that increase the security of highway infrastructure and intermodal trans-
fer points are required to maintain the security and safety of these movements. Ad-
ditionally,  large  volumes  of  hazmat  are  moved  by  pipelines  out  of  the  view  of  most 
Americans. 

These hazardous materials shipments frequently move through densely populated 
or  sensitive  areas  where  an  incident  could  result  in  loss  of  life,  serious  injury,  or 
significant  environmental  damage.  Our  communities,  particularly  the  public  and 
workers  engaged  in  hazardous  materials  commerce,  count  on  the  safe  and  secure 
transport of these shipments. 
Post–9/11 Hazmat Security Requirements 

With  Congress’  active  assistance  and  direction,  much  progress  has  been  made 
since 9/11 to improve the security of our transportation systems. Congress confirmed 
PHMSA’s role in the Homeland Security Act of 2002, when it amended Federal law 
to clarify the agency’s responsibility for the ‘‘safety, including security,’’ of hazardous 
materials transportation. 

In  2003,  we  amended  the  Hazardous  Materials  Regulations  to  require  shippers 
and  carriers  of  certain  hazardous  materials  to  develop  and  implement  security 
plans. The regulations established a general baseline for the development and scope 
of  plans,  rather  than  a  prescriptive  list  of  specific  security  measures.  Each  security 
plan  must  include  an  individualized  risk  assessment  and,  at  a  minimum,  address 
personnel security, unauthorized access, and en route security risks. Plans must be 
appropriate  to  the  company’s  individual  circumstances,  considering  the  types  and 
amounts  of  hazardous  materials  shipped  or  transported  and  the  modes  used  for 
transportation.  The  regulation  establishes  a  meaningful  performance  standard  for 
security  planning,  while  providing  shippers  and  carriers  with  the  flexibility  nec-
essary  to  develop  security  measures  addressing  their  individual  circumstances  and 
operational environments. 

DOT-regulated pipeline operators are subject to different security planning stand-
ards, also requiring the development of site-specific security plans. Most pipeline op-
erators follow a set of consensus guidelines that were jointly developed by PHMSA, 
pipeline operators, and State pipeline safety agencies following the 9/11 terrorist at-
tacks. The security requirements governing operators of liquefied natural gas (LNG) 
facilities predate 9/11 and are enforced, along with our other LNG safety standards, 
by PHMSA and our State partners. 

As  the  Committee  is  aware,  PHMSA  also  has  been  actively  involved  in  govern-
ment-wide  security  planning  and  coordination  efforts  led  by  DHS.  In  accordance 
Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directives  and  Executive  Orders,  we  regularly  pro-
vide  technical  expertise  and  consultation  on  security  initiatives  with  DOT  partners 
in the areas of pipeline operations and hazardous materials transportation. We con-
tributed to the recently-completed National Infrastructure Protection Plan and par-
ticipate  in  the  Government  Coordinating  Councils  for  the  Rail,  Highway,  Chemical 
and Pipeline sectors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The PHMSA–TSA Security Annex 

28 

Most  recently,  PHMSA  and  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA) 
have  established  a  joint  working  group  to  improve  interagency  coordination  on 
transportation  security  and  safety  matters,  and  to  develop  and  advance  plans  for 
improving transportation security. As you know, PHMSA and TSA signed an Annex 
to  the  Departmental  Memorandum  of  Understanding  (MOU)  executed  by  DOT  and 
DHS.  The  Annex  recognizes  TSA’s  lead  role  in  transportation  security  and  reflects 
the agencies’ shared commitment to a systems risk-based approach and to the devel-
opment  of  practical  solutions,  recognizing  that  each  agency  brings  core  com-
petencies, legal authority, resources, and expertise to this shared mission. 

In entering into the Annex, PHMSA and TSA pledge to build on and not duplicate 
the various security initiatives and efforts already underway. At the same time, we 
thought it was important to outline the key program elements and approaches nec-
essary  to  effective  Federal  action  and  to  use  that  framework  to  identify  specific 
areas for improvement. 

Enhancing security requires that we start with the data—understanding the prob-
lem and identifying any gaps in existing solutions, including gaps in understanding 
the  risks  and  consequences  of  incidents.  PHMSA’s  technical  staff  has  knowledge 
about  hazardous  materials  and  transportation  systems  that  can  and  should  be 
brought to bear in the Federal effort to enhance security. 

The joint agency working group established under the PHMSA–TSA MOU Annex 
is  looking  at  ways  to  leverage  the  information  that  each  agency  possesses  and  col-
lects. We are doing this in order to enhance our understanding of all risks connected 
with  hazardous  materials  transportation  and  to  bring  that  information  to  bear  on 
an ongoing basis in all elements of our safety and security programs. 

Under  Executive  Order  13416  and  as  delineated  in  the  Annex,  PHMSA  and  TSA 
are looking for ways to improve standards, recognizing that solutions need to be tai-
lored  to  risks  and  transportation  needs,  both  of  which  will  change  over  time.  En-
hancing transportation security does not necessarily mean that we must impose reg-
ulatory  requirements.  We  must  be  open  to  the  range  of  possible  solutions,  driven 
by information about systems risks and security gaps. 

Where it is appropriate to impose new standards, close coordination and consulta-
tion  between  the  agencies—and  active  outreach  with  stakeholders—will  help  to  en-
sure effective results. Better communication and outreach with affected stakeholders 
are  important  elements  of  the  approach  to  enhancing  transportation  security  re-
flected in the MOU Annex. 

Inspection  and  enforcement  also  present  opportunities  for  improvement.  PHMSA 
and  TSA  are  looking  for  ways  to  maximize  the  use  of  Federal  resources  by  cooper-
ating in these efforts. 

Research and development are important parts of a coordinated Federal strategy. 
Our  joint  agency  working  group  will  put  in  place  measures  to  ensure  that  we  are 
making  the  best  use  of  Federal  resources  by  sharing  research  results  and  collabo-
rating in the development of future projects. 
Pending Improvements 

Working  with  our  DOT  colleagues  and  TSA,  we  continue  to  consider  ways  to  en-
hance the transportation security of hazardous materials. Last month, PHMSA and 
FRA  issued  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  (NPRM),  proposing  to  revise  current 
requirements  applicable  to  the  safe  and  secure  transportation  of  hazardous  mate-
rials by rail. Specifically, we are proposing to require rail carriers to compile annual 
data  on  specified  shipments  of  hazardous  materials,  use  the  data  to  analyze  safety 
and  security  risks  along  rail  routes,  assess  alternative  routing  options,  and  make 
routing decisions based on those assessments. 

The  same  notice  proposes  clarifications  of  the  current  security  plan  requirements 
to  address  en  route  storage,  delays  in  transit,  delivery  notification,  and  additional 
security  inspection  requirements  for  hazardous  materials  shipments.  We  have 
planned two meetings in early February, one here in Washington and one in Dallas, 
to solicit public input on the rail security proposals. 

In  consultation  with  the  other  DOT  operating  administrations  and  TSA,  we  also 
are  taking  a  close  look  at  the  scope  of  our  hazmat  security  plan  requirements.  In 
the 3 years since the requirements went into effect, we have gained experience eval-
uating  security  risks  associated  with  specific  hazardous  materials  and  transpor-
tation environments and identifying appropriate measures to address those risks. In 
response  to  two  industry  petitions  for  rulemaking,  PHMSA  recently  initiated  a 
project  to  reconsider  and  refine  the  list  of  hazardous  materials  for  which  security 
plans  are  currently  required.  The  industry  petitioners  asked  PHMSA  to  amend  the 
security  plan  regulations  to  create  a  distinction  between  hazardous  materials  that 
present  a  significant  security  risk  while  in  transportation  and  the  vast  majority  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

hazardous materials that pose minimal security risks in transportation. To this end, 
we  have  initiated  a  rulemaking  project,  in  cooperation  with  the  DOT  operating  ad-
ministrations  and  TSA;  we  published  an  ANPRM  on  September  21,  2006,  and 
hosted  a  public  meeting  on  November  30.  We  expect  to  issue  a  proposal  by  early 
Summer of 2007. 

As  we  refine  our  understanding  of  system  risks,  we’ve  also  taken  a  careful  look 
at how we regulate access to PHMSA’s National Pipeline Mapping System (NPMS). 
The NPMS is a comprehensive database including geospatial and other information 
about  all  PHMSA-regulated  liquid  and  natural  gas  pipelines  and  their  relationship 
to  populated  and  unusually  sensitive  environmental  areas.  In  the  immediate  after-
math  of  9/11,  we  pulled  the  NPMS  from  the  agency’s  website  and  restricted  public 
access  out  of  concern  that  information  in  the  system  could  be  used  in  planning  or 
targeting  a  terrorist  attack.  In  the  meantime,  we  have  taken  a  careful  look  at  the 
nature and quality of publicly available information about pipeline facilities and the 
safety  and  security  implications  of  providing  public  access.  We  have  discussed  the 
issues  with  DHS  and  all  pipeline  stakeholders,  safety  advocates,  and  security  ex-
perts, and we have developed an approach that we believe will minimize risk, while 
satisfying legitimate public right-to-know concerns. 

I  would  like  to  mention  that  in  the  coming  months,  PHMSA  will  be  rolling  out 
changes  to  its  NPMS  website  that  will  permit  members  of  the  public  to  access  cer-
tain maps and data on a county-by-county basis. The level of detail accessible to the 
public  will  make  the  site  useful  for  emergency  response  and  local  planning  efforts, 
helping communities manage risks of development and other human activities near 
existing pipelines. 

Our decision to restore public access to NPMS data illustrates how a data-driven, 
systems risk-based approach improves risk mitigation. From a systems risk perspec-
tive,  public  access  to  information  is  desirable,  because  it  facilitates  environmental 
protection,  emergency  response,  and  safety-conscious  land  use  planning.  Further, 
this  determination  may  pave  the  way  for  making  NPMS  data  available  in  efforts 
to  reduce  other  transportation  risks.  As  we  move  ahead  on  the  rail  routing  rule-
making, for instance, we will consider whether access to NPMS data concerning en-
vironmentally-sensitive areas may be useful in making safety and security conscious 
rail routing decisions. 

With  Congress’  support,  a  systems  risk-based  approach  will  be  carried  forward 
through  the  Hazardous  Materials  Cooperative  Research  Program,  now  in  its  first 
year of program management by the Transportation Research Board of the National 
Academies. Four initial research projects recently cleared the selection process. They 
are:  (1)  Hazmat  Commodity  Flow  Guidance  to  States  and  Localities;  (2)  Enhanced 
Incident  Data  Quality  for  Root  Cause  Analysis;  (3)  Assessing  Hazmat  Emergency 
Response Capabilities; and (4) Emerging Technologies Applicable to Hazmat Trans-
portation Safety and Security. PHMSA is closely monitoring the progress of that re-
search. 

Finally, like Congress, we are focused on improving the ability of States and local 
governments to prepare for and respond to hazardous materials incidents, whatever 
their  cause.  PHMSA  is  proud  of  its  partnerships  with  the  National  Association  of 
State  Fire  Marshals,  the  International  Association  of  Fire  Chiefs,  and  the  Inter-
national  Association  of  Fire  Fighters.  Each  organization  has  assisted  in  capability 
building across the country. 

At the end of this month, PHMSA and the National Association of State Fire Mar-
shals will co-sponsor another meeting of emergency responders, hazardous materials 
industry  representatives,  and  pipeline  operators.  This  joint  effort  covers  a  variety 
of initiatives intended to strengthen response capabilities and preparedness, includ-
ing a recent PHMSA Advisory Bulletin on the appropriate response to ethanol spills 
and  plans  for  the  2008  edition  of  the  Emergency  Response  Guidebook  (ERG). 
PHMSA  publishes  and  distributes  the  ERG  free  of  charge  to  the  Nation’s  first  re-
sponder  community.  For  years,  the  ERG  has  been  an  important  resource  for  first 
responders, providing critical guidance during the initial phase of a hazardous mate-
rials  incident.  For  the  first  time,  the  2008  ERG  will  be  expanded  to  include  a  re-
sponse section applicable to pipeline incidents. 
Closing 

Like  Secretary  Peters,  PHMSA  takes  very  seriously  our  responsibility  to  ensure 
the safe and secure movement of hazardous materials across our transportation sys-
tem.  Although  we  recognize  that  there  is  always  room  for  improvement,  we  believe 
that we have a strong regulatory framework in place for hazardous materials trans-
portation security. Together with DHS, we seek to achieve the highest level of safety 
and security possible, while at the same time, minimizing the burden and associated 
cost. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  members  of  this  Committee,  the  Congress 
and our stakeholders as we embark on a serious and open discussion with all inter-
ested  parties  to  further  enhance  the  safe  and  secure  transportation  of  hazardous 
materials. 

Mr. Chairman, I commend you and the members of this Committee for your lead-
ership  on  this  very  important  topic.  Thank  you  again  for  this  opportunity  today.  I 
am happy to take your questions. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much Admiral Barrett. 
And  now  may  I  call  upon  Ms.  Cathleen  A.  Berrick,  Director  of 
Homeland  Security  and  Justice  Issues,  Government  Accountability 
Office. 

STATEMENT OF CATHLEEN A. BERRICK, DIRECTOR, 
HOMELAND SECURITY AND JUSTICE ISSUES, GAO 

Ms. BERRICK. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Mr. Vice Chairman and 
members of the Committee for the opportunity to discuss the secu-
rity  of  the  Nation’s  surface  transportation  systems,  and  in  par-
ticular, passenger rail. 

In  addition  to  our  passenger  rail  security  work,  GAO  has  re-
cently  initiated,  or  will  soon  initiate,  reviews  of  additional  surface 
transportation  modes,  including  freight  rail,  commercial  vehicles, 
and  highway  infrastructure.  We  expect  to  report  on  the  results  of 
that work later this year. 

Regarding passenger rail, my testimony today focuses on actions 
the Federal Government have taken to assess risks to the rail sys-
tem,  and  security  practices  implemented  by  domestic  and  selected 
foreign rail operations. 

DHS,  in  conjunction  with  its  grant-making  authority,  and  DOT, 
have  completed  numerous  risk  assessments  of  passenger  rail  sys-
tems  around  the  country,  and  have  provided  technical  assistance 
and training to rail operators, among other efforts. 

DHS  has  also  begun  to  develop  an  overall  framework  to  help 
agencies  and  the  private  sector  develop  a  consistent  approach  for 
analyzing and comparing risks to transportation and other sectors. 
TSA  has  also  conducted  risk  assessments,  and  is  establishing  a 
methodology for analyzing and characterizing risks. 

However,  although  progress  has  been  made,  these  risk-assess-
ment  efforts  have  not  yet  been  fully  coordinated  or  completed. 
Until  they  are,  it  may  be  difficult  to  compare  risks  within  the  rail 
sector,  and  across  different  sectors,  even  outside  of  transportation, 
and allocate resources accordingly. 

After  the  9/11  attacks,  FRA  and  FTA  took  a  number  of  actions 
to strengthen the security of rail systems, including providing secu-
rity  training  to  rail  operators  and  technical  assistance.  TSA  also 
issued  security  directives,  and  piloted  explosive  detection  tech-
nology  for  use  in  the  rail  system,  recently  issued  a  proposed  rule 
addressing  passenger  and  freight  rail  security,  and  has  imple-
mented other security programs in partnership with FRA and FTA. 
However,  some  Federal  and  rail  stakeholders  question  the  feasi-
bility  of  implementing  and  complying  with  the  rail  security  direc-
tives,  claiming  that  they  were  not  always  based  on  industry  best 
practices, or conflicted with some safety requirements. 

Domestic  and  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  have  also  taken  a 
range  of  actions  to  secure  their  systems.  Most  have  implemented 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

customer awareness programs, increased the number and visibility 
of security personnel, and upgraded security technologies. 

However,  we  also  observed  security  practices  among  certain  for-
eign  rail  systems,  or  their  governments,  that  are  not  currently 
used—or  used  to  the  same  degree—by  domestic  operators.  These 
practices  include:  the  random  screening  of  passengers,  and  their 
bags,  and  the  utilization  of  covert  testing  to  help  keep  employees 
alert to security threats. We also found that certain foreign govern-
ments  maintain  a  centralized  clearing  house  of  rail  security  tech-
nologies and best practices, which is not currently done to the same 
degree  in  the  U.S.  Based  on  our  work,  we  recommended  that  TSA 
reassess  established  security  requirements,  and  more  systemati-
cally review and consider for use, security practices used by foreign 
countries. 

Regarding  the  security  of  all  transportation  modes,  DHS  and 
DOT  signed  an  MOU  intended  to  improve  coordination  of  security 
and  safety  matters,  and  subsequently  completed  several  related 
Annexes—a very important step in ensuring a coordinated Federal 
response to security. 

However,  we  found  that  DHS  has  been  delayed  in  issuing  its 
Transportation  Sector  Specific  Plan  and  supporting  plans,  which 
are  to  identify  TSA  strategy  for  securing  all  transportation  modes. 
The  sector-specific  plan  is  an  important  step  needed  to  establish 
and  clearly  communicate  the  Federal  Government’s  security  strat-
egy  to  all  transportation  stakeholders.  Our  ongoing  work  on  com-
mercial  vehicle  security  has  found  that  commercial  vehicle  opera-
tors are seeking information from the Federal Government on their 
role and strategy with respect to security. Our work has also shown 
that,  despite  several  security  efforts  underway  in  this  area,  DHS 
is in the early stages of defining its security wall. 

In  summary,  we  are  encouraged  by  the  increased  Federal  focus 
on  the  security  of  surface  transportation  modes,  and  moving  for-
ward,  a  clear  strategy,  strong  Federal  coordination  and  continued 
leadership  will  be  needed  to  help  ensure  that  actions  and  invest-
ments  designed  to  enhance  security  are  appropriately  focused  and 
prioritized. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Berrick follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CATHLEEN A. BERRICK, DIRECTOR, 

HOMELAND SECURITY AND JUSTICE ISSUES, GAO 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  on  Federal  efforts  to 
secure rail and surface transportation systems. Since September 11, 2001, TSA has 
focused  much  of  its  efforts  and  resources  on  meeting  legislative  mandates  to 
strengthen  commercial  aviation  security.  However,  TSA  has  recently  placed  addi-
tional focus on securing surface modes of transportation, particularly in the area of 
passenger  rail  security.  Surface  transportation,  which  includes  passenger  and 
freight rail, mass transit, highways, and pipelines, are inherently open and difficult 
to secure. One of the critical challenges facing these Federal agencies, and rail sys-
tem  operators  they  oversee  or  support,  is  finding  ways  to  protect  rail  systems  from 
potential  terrorist  attacks  without  compromising  the  accessibility  and  efficiency  of 
rail travel. The Madrid commuter rail attacks in March 2004, London rail bombings 
in  July  2005,  and  Mumbai,  India  train  bombings  just  last  year,  highlight  the 
vulnerabilities of passenger rail and other surface transportation systems and made 
clear that even when security precautions are put into place, these systems remain 
vulnerable  to  attack.  While  securing  surface  transportation  systems  is  a  daunting 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

task—a  shared  responsibility  requiring  coordinated  action  on  the  part  of  Federal, 
state,  and  local  governments  and  the  private  sector—it  is  important  nonetheless  to 
take the necessary steps to identify and mitigate risks to these systems. 

As we have reported previously, the sheer number of stakeholders involved in se-
curing  surface  transportation  modes,  including  passenger  rail,  can  sometimes  lead 
to communication challenges, duplication of effort, and confusion about roles and re-
sponsibilities.  Regarding  passenger  rail  security,  key  Department  of  Homeland  Se-
curity  (DHS)  stakeholders  with  critical  roles  include  the  Transportation  Security 
Administration (TSA), which is responsible for securing all modes of transportation, 
and  the  Office  for  Grants  and  Training  (OGT),  which  provides  grant  funds  to  rail 
operators and conducts risk assessments for passenger rail agencies. Within the De-
partment  of  Transportation  (DOT),  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA)  and 
Federal  Railroad  Administration  (FRA)  have  responsibilities  for  passenger  and 
freight rail safety and security. In addition, public and private passenger rail opera-
tors also share responsibility for securing their systems. 

At  the  Federal  level,  another  significant  challenge  related  to  securing  passenger 
rail  systems  involves  allocating  resources  based  on  risk.  Within  and  among  all 
modes  of  transportation,  there  is  competition  for  resources,  as  Federal,  state,  and 
local  agencies  and  transportation  operators  seek  to  identify  and  invest  in  appro-
priate  security  measures  to  safeguard  these  systems  while  also  investing  in  other 
capital  and  operational  improvements.  Moreover,  given  competing  priorities  and 
limited  homeland  security  resources,  difficult  policy  decisions  have  to  be  made  by 
Congress and the Executive Branch to prioritize security efforts and direct resources 
to  areas  of  greatest  risk  within  and  among  transportation  modes  and  across  other 
nationally critical sectors. 

In this regard, to help Federal decisionmakers determine how to best allocate lim-
ited  resources,  we  have  advocated,  the  National  Commission  on  Terrorist  Attacks 
Upon  the  United  States  (the  9/11  Commission)  has  recommended,  and  the  Intel-
ligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004  provides  that  a  risk  manage-
ment  approach  be  employed  to  guide  decisionmaking  related  to  homeland  security 
resources.  A  risk  management  approach  entails  a  continuous  process  of  managing 
risks through a series of actions, including setting strategic goals and objectives, as-
sessing  and  quantifying  risks,  evaluating  alternative  security  measures,  selecting 
which  measures  to  undertake,  and  implementing  and  monitoring  those  measures. 
My  testimony  today  focuses  on  the  progress  Federal  agencies  and  domestic  pas-
senger  rail  operators  have  made  in  setting  and  implementing  security  priorities  in 
the wake of September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks, and the security practices imple-
mented  by  foreign  passenger  rail  operators.  In  particular,  my  testimony  highlights 
three  key  areas:  (1)  the  actions  that  DHS  and  its  component  agencies  have  taken 
to assess the risks posed by terrorism to the U.S. passenger rail system; (2) the ac-
tions  that  TSA  and  other  Federal  agencies  have  taken  to  enhance  the  security  of 
the U.S. passenger rail system; and (3) the security practices that domestic and se-
lected  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  have  implemented  to  mitigate  risks  and  en-
hance security. My comments today are based on GAO’s September 2005 report ad-
dressing the security of the U.S. passenger rail system and selected updates on this 
program  obtained  in  January  2007.1 This  report  was  based  on  work  at  DHS,  DOT 
and Amtrak, as well as work that included 32 passenger rail operators in the U.S., 
and  13  passenger  rail  operators  in  7  European  and  Asian  countries.  We  conducted 
our work in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards. 

We have been requested by the Chairman of the House Homeland Security Com-
mittee  to  conduct  a  follow-on  review  of  passenger  rail  security,  which  we  expect  to 
initiate  in  the  near  future.  In  addition,  we  have  been  requested  to  assess  the  secu-
rity of other surface modes of transportation—including freight rail, commercial ve-
hicles  and  highway  infrastructure—which  we  have  underway  or  will  initiate  later 
this year. 
In Summary 

The DHS Office of Grants and Training has developed and conducted risk assess-
ments  of  passenger  rail  systems  to  identify  and  protect  rail  assets  that  are  vulner-
able  to  attack,  such  as  stations  and  bridges.  TSA  has  also  begun  to  conduct  risk 
assessments,  including  a  threat  assessment  of  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  and 
assessments  of  individual  critical  rail  assets.  While  TSA  has  begun  to  establish  a 
methodology  for  determining  how  to  analyze  and  characterize  the  risks  identified, 
the  agency  has  not  completed  a  comprehensive  risk  assessment  of  the  U.S.  pas-
senger  rail  system.  Until  TSA  completes  this  effort,  the  agency  may  be  limited  in 

1 GAO, Passenger Rail Security: Enhanced Federal Leadership Needed to Prioritize and Guide 

Security Efforts, GAO–05–851 (Washington, D.C.: Sept. 9, 2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

its ability to prioritize passenger rail assets and help guide security investment deci-
sions  about  protecting  them.  At  the  Department  level,  DHS  has  begun  developing, 
but has not yet completed a framework to help Federal agencies and the private sec-
tor  develop  a  consistent  approach  for  analyzing  and  comparing  risks  to  transpor-
tation  and  other  critical  sectors.  Until  this  framework  is  finalized  and  shared  with 
stakeholders,  it  may  not  be  possible  to  compare  risks  across  different  sectors, 
prioritize them, and allocate resources accordingly. 

Before and after September 11, 2001, FTA and FRA undertook a number of initia-
tives to enhance passenger rail security, including conducting security readiness as-
sessments,  providing  grants  for  emergency  response  drills  and  training,  and  devel-
oping  security  awareness  programs  for  rail  passengers  and  employees.  In  March 
2004, after terrorist attacks on the rail system in Madrid, TSA issued security direc-
tives  for  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit.  These  directives  were  intended  to  estab-
lish  standard  protective  measures  for  all  passenger  rail  operators,  including  Am-
trak.  However,  Federal  and  rail  industry  stakeholders  have  questioned  the  extent 
that these directives were based on industry best practices and expressed confusion 
about  how  TSA  would  monitor  compliance  with  the  directives.  In  the  15  months 
since  the  completion  of  our  work  on  passenger  rail  security,  TSA  has  reported  tak-
ing  additional  actions  to  strengthen  the  security  of  the  passenger  rail  system.  For 
example,  TSA  has  tested  rail  security  technologies,  developed  training  tools  for  rail 
workers,  and  issued  a  proposed  rule  in  December  2006  regarding  passenger  and 
freight rail security, among other efforts. TSA has also taken steps to better coordi-
nate  with  DOT  regarding  rail  security  roles  and  responsibilities.  The  memorandum 
of understanding between DHS and DOT has been recently updated to include spe-
cific agreements between TSA and FTA and FRA to delineate security-related roles 
and responsibilities, among other things, for passenger rail and mass transit. 

Domestic and foreign passenger rail operators we contacted during our prior work 
on  passenger  rail  security  had  taken  a  range  of  actions  to  secure  their  systems. 
Most  had  implemented  customer  awareness  programs  to  encourage  passengers  to 
remain vigilant and report suspicious activities, increased the number and visibility 
of  security  personnel,  increased  the  use  of  canine  teams  to  detect  explosives,  en-
hanced employee training programs, upgraded security technology, tightened access 
controls,  and  made  rail  system  design  improvements  to  enhance  security.  We  also 
observed  security  practices  among  certain  foreign  passenger  rail  systems  or  their 
governments  that  are  not  currently  used  by  the  domestic  rail  operators  we  con-
tacted,  or  by  the  U.S.  Government,  which  could  be  considered  for  use  in  the  U.S. 
For example, some foreign rail operators randomly screen passengers or utilize cov-
ert  testing  to  help  keep  employees  alert  to  security  threats,  and  some  foreign  gov-
ernments maintain centralized clearinghouses on rail security technologies and best 
practices. While introducing any of these security practices into the U.S. rail system 
may  pose  political,  legal,  fiscal,  and  cultural  challenges,  they  nevertheless  warrant 
further  examination.  Since  our  report  on  passenger  rail  security  was  issued,  TSA 
has  reported  taking  steps  to  coordinate  with  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  and 
governments to identify security best practices. 

In our September 2005 report on passenger rail security, we recommended, among 
other  things,  that  TSA  establish  a  plan  with  timelines  for  completing  its  method-
ology for conducting risk assessments and develop security standards that reflect in-
dustry best practices and can be measured and enforced. These actions should help 
ensure  that  the  Federal  Government  has  the  information  it  needs  to  prioritize  pas-
senger  rail  assets  based  on  risk,  and  evaluate,  select,  and  implement  measures  to 
help  the  passenger  rail  operators  protect  their  systems  against  terrorism.  In  addi-
tion,  we  recommended  that  the  Secretary  of  DHS,  in  collaboration  with  DOT  and 
the passenger rail industry, determine the feasibility, in a risk management context, 
of  implementing  certain  security  practices  used  by  foreign  rail  operators.  DHS, 
DOT, and Amtrak generally agreed with the report’s recommendations. As of Janu-
ary 2007, DHS had not provided a formal response indicating if or how it has imple-
mented these recommendations. 
Background 
Overview of the Passenger Rail System 

Each weekday, 11.3 million passengers in 35 metropolitan areas and 22 states use 
some  form  of  rail  transit  (commuter,  heavy,  or  light  rail).2 Commuter  rail  systems 
typically  operate  on  railroad  tracks  and  provide  regional  service  between  a  central 

2 The  American  Public  Transportation  Association  compiled  this  Fiscal  Year  2003  ridership 
data  from  FTA’s  National  Transit  Database.  These  are  the  most  current  data  available.  Rail 
transit systems in the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico are included in these statistics. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

city and adjacent suburbs. Commuter rail systems are traditionally associated with 
older industrial cities, such as Boston, New York, Philadelphia, and Chicago. Heavy 
rail systems—subway systems like New York City’s transit system and Washington, 
D.C.’s  Metro—typically  operate  on  fixed  rail  lines  within  a  metropolitan  area  and 
have  the  capacity  for  a  heavy  volume  of  traffic.  Amtrak  operates  the  Nation’s  pri-
mary  intercity  passenger  rail  service  over  a  22,000-mile  network,  primarily  over 
freight  railroad  tracks.  Amtrak  serves  more  than  500  stations  (240  of  which  are 
staffed) in 46 states and the District of Columbia, and it carried more than 25 mil-
lion passengers during FY 2005. 
Passenger Rail Systems Are Inherently Vulnerable to Terrorist Attacks 

According to passenger rail officials and passenger rail experts, certain character-
istics of domestic and foreign passenger rail systems make them inherently vulner-
able  to  terrorist  attacks  and  therefore  difficult  to  secure.  By  design,  passenger  rail 
systems  are  open,  have  multiple  access  points,  are  hubs  serving  multiple  carriers, 
and, in some cases, have no barriers so that they can move large numbers of people 
quickly.  In  contrast,  the  U.S.  commercial  aviation  system  is  housed  in  closed  and 
controlled  locations  with  few  entry  points.  The  openness  of  passenger  rail  systems 
can leave them vulnerable because operator personnel cannot completely monitor or 
control  who  enters  or  leaves  the  systems.  In  addition,  other  characteristics  of  some 
passenger  rail  systems—high  ridership,  expensive  infrastructure,  economic  impor-
tance,  and  location  (large  metropolitan  areas  or  tourist  destinations)—also  make 
them  attractive  targets  for  terrorists  because  of  the  potential  for  mass  casualties 
and economic damage and disruption. Moreover, some of these same characteristics 
make passenger rail systems difficult to secure. For example, the numbers of riders 
that  pass  through  a  subway  system—especially  during  peak  hours—may  make  the 
sustained  use  of  some  security  measures,  such  as  metal  detectors,  difficult  because 
they could result in long lines that could disrupt scheduled service. In addition, mul-
tiple access points along extended routes could make the cost of securing each loca-
tion prohibitive. Balancing the potential economic impacts of security enhancements 
with the benefits of such measures is a difficult challenge. 
Multiple Stakeholders Share Responsibility for Securing Passenger Rail Systems 

Securing  the  Nation’s  passenger  rail  systems  is  a  shared  responsibility  requiring 
coordinated action on the part of Federal, state, and local governments; the private 
sector; and rail passengers who ride these systems. Since the September 11 attacks, 
the role of Federal Government agencies in securing the Nation’s transportation sys-
tems,  including  passenger  rail,  have  continued  to  evolve.  Prior  to  September  11, 
FTA and FRA, within DOT, were the primary Federal entities involved in passenger 
rail  security  matters.  In  response  to  the  attacks  of  September  11,  Congress  passed 
the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA),  which  created  TSA  within 
DOT  and  defined  its  primary  responsibility  as  ensuring  the  security  of  all  modes 
of  transportation,  though  its  provisions  focus  primarily  on  aviation  security.3 The 
Act  also  gave  TSA  regulatory  authority  for  security  over  all  transportation  modes, 
though  its  provisions  focus  primarily  on  aviation  security.  With  the  passage  of  the 
Homeland  Security  Act  of  2002,  TSA  was  transferred,  along  with  over  20  other 
agencies, to the Department of Homeland Security.4 

Within DHS, the Office of Grants and Training (OGT), formerly the Office for Do-
mestic  Preparedness  (ODP),  has  become  the  Federal  source  for  security  funding  of 
passenger  rail  systems.5 OGT  is  the  principal  component  of  DHS  responsible  for 
preparing  the  United  States  for  acts  of  terrorism  and  has  primary  responsibility 
within the Executive Branch for assisting and supporting DHS, in coordination with 
other  directorates  and  entities  outside  of  the  Department,  in  conducting  risk  anal-
ysis and risk management activities of state and local governments. In carrying out 
its  mission,  OGT  provides  training,  funds  for  the  purchase  of  equipment,  support 
for  the  planning  and  execution  of  exercises,  technical  assistance,  and  other  support 
to  assist  states,  local  jurisdictions,  and  the  private  sector  to  prevent,  prepare  for, 

3 Pub. L. 107–71, 115 Stat. 597 (2001). 
4 Pub. L. 107–296, 116 Stat. 2135 (2002). 
5 OGT originated within the Department of Justice’s Office of Justice Programs in 1998 as the 
Office  for  Domestic  Preparedness  (ODP).  Pursuant  to  the  Homeland  Security  Act  of  2002,  ODP 
was  transferred  to  DHS  in  March  2003.  See  Pub.  L.  107–296,  § 403(5),  116  Stat.  at  2178  (codi-
fied  at  6  U.S.C.  203(5)).  In  March  2004,  the  Secretary  of  Homeland  Security  consolidated  ODP 
with  the  Office  of  State  and  Local  Government  Coordination  to  form  the  Office  of  State  and 
Local  Government  Coordination  and  Preparedness  (SLGCP).  SLGCP,  which  reports  directly  to 
the  DHS  Secretary,  was  created  to  provide  a  ‘‘one-stop  shop’’  for  the  numerous  Federal  pre-
paredness  initiatives  applicable  to  state  and  local  governments.  Recently,  SLGCP  was  incor-
porated under the Preparedness Directorate as OGT. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

and  respond  to  acts  of  terrorism.  OGT  created  and  is  administering  two  grant  pro-
grams  focused  specifically  on  transportation  security,  the  Transit  Security  Grant 
Program and the Intercity Passenger Rail Security Grant Program. These programs 
provide financial assistance to address security preparedness and enhancements for 
passenger  rail  and  transit  systems.  During  Fiscal  Year  2006,  OGT  provided  $110 
million  to  passenger  rail  transit  agencies  through  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Pro-
gram and about $7 million to Amtrak through the Intercity Passenger Rail Security 
Grant Program. 

While  TSA  is  the  lead  Federal  agency  for  ensuring  the  security  of  all  transpor-
tation  modes,  FTA  conducts  safety  and  security  activities,  including  training,  re-
search, technical assistance, and demonstration projects. In addition, FTA promotes 
safety and security through its grant-making authority. FRA has regulatory author-
ity  for  rail  safety  over  commuter  rail  operators  and  Amtrak,  and  employs  over  400 
rail  inspectors  that  periodically  monitor  the  implementation  of  safety  and  security 
plans at these systems.6 

State  and  local  governments,  passenger  rail  operators,  and  private  industry  are 
also important stakeholders in the Nation’s rail security efforts. State and local gov-
ernments  may  own  or  operate  a  significant  portion  of  the  passenger  rail  system. 
Passenger rail operators, which can be public or private entities, are responsible for 
administering  and  managing  passenger  rail  activities  and  services.  Passenger  rail 
operators  can  directly  operate  the  service  provided  or  contract  for  all  or  part  of  the 
total service. Although all levels of government are involved in passenger rail secu-
rity,  the  primary  responsibility  for  securing  passenger  rail  systems  rests  with  pas-
senger rail operators. 
Assessing  and  Managing  Risks  to  Rail  Infrastructure  Using  a  Risk  Management 

Approach 

Risk  management  is  a  tool  for  informing  policymakers’  decisions  about  assessing 
risks, allocating resources, and taking actions under conditions of uncertainty. In re-
cent  years,  the  President,  through  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directives 
(HSPDs),  and  Congress,  through  the  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention 
Act  of  2004,  provided  for  Federal  agencies  with  homeland  security  responsibilities 
to  apply  risk-based  principles  to  inform  their  decisionmaking  regarding  allocating 
limited  resources  and  prioritizing  security  activities.  The  9/11  Commission  rec-
ommended  that  the  U.S.  Government  should  identify  and  evaluate  the  transpor-
tation assets that need to be protected, set risk-based priorities for defending them, 
select  the  most  practical  and  cost-effective  ways  of  doing  so,  and  then  develop  a 
plan, budget, and funding to implement the effort.7 In addition, DHS issued the Na-
tional  Strategy  for  Transportation  Security  in  2005  that  describes  the  policies  the 
DHS will apply when managing risks to the security of the U.S. transportation sys-
tem.8 We  have  previously  reported  that  a  risk  management  approach  can  help  to 
prioritize  and  focus  the  programs  designed  to  combat  terrorism.  Risk  management, 
as applied in the homeland security context, can help Federal decisionmakers deter-
mine  where  and  how  to  invest  limited  resources  within  and  among  the  various 
modes of transportation. 

The Homeland Security Act of 2002 also directed the Department’s Directorate of 
Information  Analysis  and  Infrastructure  Protection  to  use  risk  management  prin-
ciples in coordinating the Nation’s critical infrastructure protection efforts.9 This in-
cludes  integrating  relevant  information,  analysis,  and  vulnerability  assessments  to 
identify  priorities  for  protective  and  support  measures  by  the  Department,  other 

6 FRA  administers  and  enforces  Federal  laws  and  regulations  that  are  designed  to  promote 
safety on railroads, such as track maintenance, inspection standards, equipment standards, and 
operating  practices.  FRA  exercises  jurisdiction  over  all  areas  of  railroad  safety  pursuant  to  49 
U.S.C. § 20103. 

7 National Commission on Terrorist Attacks upon the United States, The 9/11 Commission Re-
port:  Final  Report  of  the  National  Commission  on  Terrorist  Attacks  upon  the  United  States 
(Washington, D.C.: 2004). The 9/11 Commission was an independent, bipartisan commission cre-
ated  in  late  2002,  to  prepare  a  complete  account  of  the  circumstances  surrounding  the  Sep-
tember 11, 2001 terrorist attacks, including preparedness for and the immediate response to the 
attacks.  The  Commission  was  also  mandated  to  provide  recommendations  designed  to  guard 
against future attacks. 

8 The  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004  requires  the  Secretary  of 
Homeland  Security,  working  jointly  with  the  Secretary  of  Transportation,  to  develop,  prepare, 
implement,  and  update,  as  needed  a  National  Strategy  for  Transportation  Security  and  trans-
portation  modal  security  plans.  Pub.  L.  108–458,  § 4001,  118  Stat.  3638,  3710–12  (codified  at 
49 U.S.C. §114(t)). 

9 In 2006, DHS reorganized their Information Analysis and Infrastructure Protection division. 
The  functions  of  the  Directorate  of  Information  Analysis  and  Infrastructure  Protection  were 
moved to the Office of Intelligence Analysis and Office of Infrastructure Protection. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Federal  agencies,  state  and  local  government  agencies  and  authorities,  the  private 
sector, and other entities. Homeland Security Presidential Directive 7 and the Intel-
ligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004  further  define  and  establish 
critical infrastructure protection responsibilities for DHS and those Federal agencies 
given  responsibility  for  particular  industry  sectors,  such  as  transportation.  In  June 
2006, DHS issued the National Infrastructure Protection Plan (NIPP), which named 
TSA  as  the  primary  Federal  agency  responsible  for  coordinating  critical  infrastruc-
ture protection efforts within the transportation sector.10 The NIPP requires Federal 
agencies to work with the private sector to develop plans that, among other things, 
identify and prioritize critical assets for their respective sectors. As such, the NIPP 
requires  TSA  to  conduct  and  facilitate  risk  assessments  in  order  to  identify, 
prioritize, and coordinate the protection of critical transportation systems infrastruc-
ture, as well as develop risk-based priorities for the transportation sector. 

To  provide  guidance  to  agency  decisionmakers,  we  have  created  a  risk  manage-
ment  framework,  which  is  intended  to  be  a  starting  point  for  applying  risk-based 
principles.  Our  risk  management  framework  entails  a  continuous  process  of  man-
aging  risk  through  a  series  of  actions,  including  setting  strategic  goals  and  objec-
tives, assessing risk, evaluating alternatives, selecting initiatives to undertake, and 
implementing  and  monitoring  those  initiatives.  DHS’s  National  Infrastructure  Pro-
tection Plan describes a risk management process that closely mirrors our risk man-
agement framework. 

Setting  strategic  goals,  objectives,  and  constraints  is  a  key  first  step  in  applying 
risk management principles and helps to ensure that management decisions are fo-
cused  on  achieving  a  purpose.  These  decisions  should  take  place  in  the  context  of 
an agency’s strategic plan that includes goals and objectives that are clear and con-
cise. These goals and objectives should identify resource issues and external factors 
to  achieving  the  goals.  Further,  the  goals  and  objectives  of  an  agency  should  link 
to  a  department’s  overall  strategic  plan.  The  ability  to  achieve  strategic  goals  de-
pends,  in  part,  on  how  well  an  agency  manages  risk.  The  agency’s  strategic  plan 
should  address  risk  related  issues  that  are  central  to  the  agency’s  overall  mission. 
Risk  assessment,  an  important  element  of  a  risk-based  approach,  helps  decision-
makers  identify  and  evaluate  potential  risks  so  that  countermeasures  can  be  de-
signed and implemented to prevent or mitigate the effects of the risks. Risk assess-
ment  is  a  qualitative  and/or  quantitative  determination  of  the  likelihood  of  an  ad-
verse  event  occurring  and  the  severity,  or  impact,  of  its  consequences.  Risk  assess-
ment  in  a  homeland  security  application  often  involves  assessing  three  key  ele-
ments—threat,  vulnerability,  and  criticality  or  consequence.  A  threat  assessment 
identifies and evaluates potential threats on the basis of factors such as capabilities, 
intentions,  and  past  activities.  A  vulnerability  assessment  identifies  weaknesses 
that  may  be  exploited  by  identified  threats  and  suggests  options  to  address  those 
weaknesses. A criticality or consequence assessment evaluates and prioritizes assets 
and functions in terms of specific criteria, such as their importance to public safety 
and  the  economy,  as  a  basis  for  identifying  which  structures  or  processes  are  rel-
atively more important to protect from attack. Information from these three assess-
ments  contributes  to  an  overall  risk  assessment  that  characterizes  risks  on  a  scale 
such  as  high,  medium,  or  low  and  provides  input  for  evaluating  alternatives  and 
management  prioritization  of  security  initiatives.  The  risk  assessment  element  in 
the  overall  risk  management  cycle  may  be  the  largest  change  from  standard  man-
agement  steps  and  can  be  important  to  informing  the  remaining  steps  of  the  cycle. 
DHS  Has  Taken  Steps  To  Assess  Risk  to  Passenger  Rail  Systems,  but  Additional 

Work Is Needed To Guide Security Investments 

DHS  component  agencies  have  taken  a  variety  of  steps  to  assess  the  risk  posed 
by  terrorism  to  U.S.  passenger  rail  systems.  The  DHS  OGT  developed  and  imple-
mented  a  risk  assessment  methodology  intended  to  help  passenger  rail  operators 
better  respond  to  terrorist  attacks  and  prioritize  security  measures.  Passenger  rail 
operators  must  have  completed  a  risk  assessment  to  be  eligible  for  financial  assist-
ance through the Fiscal Year 2007 OGT Transit Security Grant Program, which in-
cludes  funding  for  passenger  rail.  To  receive  grant  funding,  rail  operators  are  also 
required  to  have  a  security  and  emergency  preparedness  plan  that  identifies  how 
the  operator  intends  to  respond  to  security  gaps  identified  by  risk  assessments.  As 
of  January  2007,  OGT  had  completed  or  planned  to  conduct  risk  assessments  of 
most  passenger  rail  operators.  According  to  rail  operators,  OGT’s  risk  assessment 

10 HSPD–7 directed the Departments of Transportation and Homeland Security to collaborate 
on  all  matters  relating  to  transportation  security  and  transportation  infrastructure  protection. 
In 2003, DHS designated TSA as the lead agency for addressing HSPD–7 as it relates to secur-
ing the Nation’s transportation sector. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

process enabled them to prioritize investments based on risk and are allowing them 
to  target  and  allocate  resources  toward  security  measures  that  will  have  the  great-
est impact on reducing risk across their system. 

TSA  has  also  begun  to  assess  risks  to  the  passenger  rail  system.  TSA  had  com-
pleted an overall threat assessment for both mass transit and passenger and freight 
rail  modes.  TSA  also  conducted  criticality  assessments  of  nearly  700  passenger  rail 
stations and had begun conducting assessments for other passenger rail assets such 
as  bridges  and  tunnels.  TSA  plans  to  rely  on  asset  criticality  rankings  to  prioritize 
which  assets  it  will  focus  on  in  conducting  vulnerability  assessments  to  determine 
which  passenger  rail  assets  are  vulnerable  to  attack.  For  assets  that  are  deemed 
to  be  less  critical,  TSA  has  developed  a  software  tool  that  it  has  made  available  to 
passenger  rail  and  other  transportation  operators  for  them  to  use  on  a  voluntary 
basis  to  assess  the  vulnerability  of  their  assets.  Until  all  three  assessments  of  pas-
senger rail systems—threat, criticality, and vulnerability—have been completed, and 
until  TSA  determines  how  to  use  the  results  of  these  assessments  to  analyze  and 
characterize  the  level  of  risk  (high,  medium,  or  low),  it  will  be  difficult  to  prioritize 
passenger  rail  assets  and  guide  investment  decisions  about  protecting  them.  Final-
izing a methodology for assessing risk to passenger rail and other transportation as-
sets  and  conducting  risk  assessments  are  also  key  steps  used  in  producing  the 
Transportation  Sector  Specific  Plan  (TSSP)  required  by  HSPD–7.11 According  to 
TSA,  the  TSSP  and  supporting  plans  for  each  mode  of  transportation  have  been 
completed  and  are  currently  being  reviewed  by  DHS  and  the  White  House  Home-
land Security Council. As of January 2007, TSA had not completed a comprehensive 
risk assessment of the passenger rail system. 

As TSA, OGT, and other Federal agencies, including DOT, move forward with risk 
assessment  activities,  DHS  is  developing  a  framework  intended  to  help  these  agen-
cies work with their stakeholders to assess risk. This framework is intended to help 
the  private  sector  and  state  and  local  governments  develop  a  consistent  approach 
to analyzing risk and vulnerability across infrastructure types and across entire eco-
nomic  sectors,  develop  consistent  terminology,  and  foster  consistent  results.  The 
framework  is  also  intended  to  enable  a  Federal-level  assessment  of  risk  in  general, 
and comparisons among risks, for purposes of resource allocation and response plan-
ning. DHS has informed TSA that this framework will provide overarching guidance 
to  sector-specific  agencies  on  how  various  risk  assessment  methodologies  may  be 
used  to  analyze,  normalize,  and  prioritize  risk  within  and  among  sectors.  Because 
neither  this  element  nor  the  framework  as  a  whole  has  been  finalized  or  provided 
to  TSA  or  other  sector-specific  agencies,  it  is  not  clear  what  impact,  if  any,  DHS’s 
framework may have on ongoing risk assessments conducted by, and the methodolo-
gies  used  by,  TSA,  OGT,  and  others,  and  whether  or  how  DHS  will  be  able  to  use 
these  results  to  compare  risks  and  prioritize  homeland  security  investments  among 
sectors.  Until  DHS  finalizes  this  framework,  and  until  TSA  completes  its  risk  as-
sessment  methodology,  it  will  not  be  possible  to  determine  whether  different  meth-
odologies used by TSA and OGT for conducting threat, criticality, and vulnerability 
assessments generate disparate qualitative and quantitative results or how they can 
best be compared and analyzed. In addition, coordinated risk assessments will help 
TSA and others avoid duplicative efforts and determine whether other agencies’ risk 
assessment  methodologies,  and  the  data  generated  by  these  methodologies,  can  be 
leveraged to complete assessments required for the transportation sector. 
Multiple Federal Agencies Have Taken Actions To Enhance Passenger Rail 

Security 

In addition to the ongoing initiatives to enhance passenger rail security conducted 
by  the  FTA  and  FRA  before  and  after  September  11,  2001,  TSA  issued  security  di-
rectives  to  passenger  rail  operators  after  the  March  2004  terrorist  attacks  on  the 
rail  system  in  Madrid.  However,  Federal  and  rail  industry  stakeholders  have  ques-
tioned  the  extent  that  these  directives  were  based  on  industry  best  practices  and 
expressed  confusion  about  how  TSA  would  monitor  compliance  with  the  directives. 
Since  the  completion  of  our  work  on  passenger  rail  security,  TSA  has  reported  tak-
ing  additional  actions  to  strengthen  the  security  of  the  passenger  rail  system.  For 
example,  TSA  has  tested  rail  security  technologies,  developed  training  tools  for  rail 
workers,  and  issued  a  proposed  rule  in  December  2006  regarding  passenger  and 
freight rail security, among other efforts. TSA has also taken steps to better coordi-

11 HSPD–7  defines  critical  infrastructure  protection  responsibilities  for  DHS,  sector-specific 
agencies  (those  Federal  agencies  given  responsibility  for  transportation,  energy,  telecommuni-
cations, and so forth), and other departments and agencies. The Directive instructs Federal de-
partments  and  agencies  to  identify,  prioritize,  and  coordinate  the  protection  of  critical  infra-
structure to prevent, deter, and mitigate the effects of terrorist attacks. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

nate  with  DOT  regarding  rail  security  roles  and  responsibilities.  The  memorandum 
of understanding between DHS and DOT had been recently updated to include spe-
cific agreements between TSA and FTA and FRA to delineate security-related roles 
and responsibilities, among other things, for passenger rail and mass transit. 
DOT Agencies Led Initial Efforts To Enhance Passenger Rail Security 

Prior to the creation of TSA in November 2001, FTA and FRA, within DOT, were 
primarily responsible for the security of passenger rail systems. These agencies un-
dertook  a  number  of  initiatives  to  enhance  the  security  of  passenger  rail  systems 
after  the  September  11  attacks  that  are  still  in  place  today.  Specifically,  FTA 
launched  a  transit  security  initiative  in  2002  that  included  security  readiness  as-
sessments,  technical  assistance,  grants  for  emergency  response  drills,  and  training. 
FTA instituted the Transit Watch campaign in 2003—a nationwide safety and secu-
rity  awareness  program  designed  to  encourage  the  participation  of  transit  pas-
sengers and employees in maintaining a safe transit environment. The program pro-
vides information and instructions to transit passengers and employees so that they 
know  what  to  do  and  whom  to  contact  in  the  event  of  an  emergency  in  a  transit 
setting. FTA planned to continue this initiative, in partnership with TSA and OGT, 
and offer additional security awareness materials that address unattended bags and 
emergency  evacuation  procedures  for  transit  agencies.  In  addition,  FTA  has  issued 
guidance,  such  as  its  Top  20  Security  Program  Action  Items  for  Transit  Agencies, 
which  recommends  measures  for  passenger  rail  operators  to  implement  into  their 
security  programs  to  improve  both  security  and  emergency  preparedness.  FTA  has 
also  used  research  and  development  funds  to  develop  guidance  for  security  design 
strategies to reduce the vulnerability of transit systems to acts of terrorism. In No-
vember 2004, FTA provided rail operators with security considerations for transpor-
tation infrastructure. This guidance provides recommendations intended to help op-
erators deter and minimize attacks against their facilities, riders, and employees by 
incorporating security features into the design of rail infrastructure. 

FRA  has  also  taken  a  number  of  actions  to  enhance  passenger  rail  security  since 
September 11, 2001. For example, it has assisted commuter railroads in developing 
security  plans,  reviewed  Amtrak’s  security  plans,  and  helped  fund  FTA  security 
readiness  assessments  for  commuter  railroads.  In  the  wake  of  the  Madrid  terrorist 
bombings in March 2004, nearly 200 FRA inspectors, in cooperation with DHS, con-
ducted  inspections  of  each  of  the  18  commuter  railroads  and  Amtrak  to  determine 
what  additional  security  measures  had  been  put  into  place  to  prevent  a  similar  oc-
currence  in  the  United  States.  FRA  also  conducted  research  and  development 
projects  related  to  passenger  rail  security.  These  projects  included  rail  infrastruc-
ture security and trespasser monitoring systems and passenger screening and mani-
fest projects, including explosives detection. Although FTA and FRA now play a sup-
porting  role  in  transportation  security  matters  since  the  creation  of  TSA,  they  re-
main  important  partners  in  the  Federal  Government’s  efforts  to  strengthen  rail  se-
curity,  given  their  role  in  funding  and  regulating  the  safety  of  passenger  rail  sys-
tems.  Moreover,  as  TSA  moves  ahead  with  its  passenger  rail  security  initiatives, 
FTA and FRA are continuing their passenger rail security efforts. 
TSA  Issued  Rail  Security  Directives,  but  Faces  Challenges  Related  to  Compliance 

and Enforcement 

In  May  2004,  TSA  issued  security  directives  to  the  passenger  rail  industry  to  es-
tablish  standard  security  measures  for  all  passenger  rail  operators,  including  Am-
trak.12 However,  as  we  previously  reported,  it  was  unclear  how  TSA  developed  the 
requirements in the directives, how TSA planned to monitor and ensure compliance, 
how  rail  operators  were  to  implement  the  measures,  and  which  entities  were  re-
sponsible  for  their  implementation.  According  to  TSA,  the  directives  were  based 
upon FTA and American Public Transportation Association best practices for rail se-
curity.  Specifically,  TSA  stated  that  it  consulted  a  list  of  the  top  20  actions  FTA 
identified that rail operators can take to strengthen security. While some of the di-
rectives correlate to information contained in the FTA guidance, the source for many 
of  the  directives  is  unclear.  Amtrak  and  FRA  officials  also  raised  concerns  about 
some  of  the  directives.  For  example,  FRA  officials  stated  that  current  FRA  safety 
regulations  requiring  engineer  compartment  doors  be  kept  unlocked  to  facilitate 
emergency  escapes 13 conflicts  with  the  TSA  security  directive  requirement  that 
doors equipped with locking mechanisms be kept locked. Other passenger rail opera-

12 TSA  issues  security  related  regulations  and  directives  pursuant  to  its  49  U.S.C.  § 114(1) 

rulemaking authority. 

13 See 49 CFR § 238.235. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

tors we spoke to during our review stated that TSA did not adequately consult with 
the rail industry prior to developing and issuing these directives. 

With  respect  to  how  the  directives  were  to  be  enforced,  rail  operators  were  re-
quired to allow TSA and DHS to perform inspections, evaluations, or tests based on 
execution  of  the  directives  at  any  time  or  location.  TSA  officials  stated  the  agency 
has  hired  100  surface  transportation  inspectors,  whose  stated  mission  is  to,  among 
other  duties,  monitor  and  enforce  compliance  with  TSA’s  rail  security  directives. 
However, some passenger rail operators have expressed confusion and concern about 
the role of TSA’s inspectors and the potential that TSA inspections could be duplica-
tive  of  other  Federal  and  state  rail  inspections.  TSA  rail  inspector  staff  stated  that 
they  were  committed  to  avoiding  duplication  in  the  program  and  communicating 
their  respective  roles  to  rail  agency  officials.  According  to  TSA,  since  the  initial  de-
ployment  of  surface  inspectors,  these  inspectors  have  developed  relationships  with 
security  officials  in  passenger  rail  and  transit  systems,  coordinated  access  to  oper-
ations  centers,  participated  in  emergency  exercises,  and  provided  assistance  in  en-
hancing  security.  We  will  continue  to  assess  TSA’s  enforcement  of  rail  security  di-
rectives during our follow-on review of passenger rail security. 
TSA  Has  Taken  Other  Actions  To  Strengthen  the  Security  of  the  Passenger  Rail 

System and Coordinate Its Efforts With Other Federal Agencies 

In January 2007, TSA provided us an update on additional actions they had taken 
to  strengthen  passenger  rail  security.  We  have  not  verified  or  evaluated  these  ac-
tions. These actions include: 

National  Explosive  Canine  Detection  Teams:  Since  late  2005,  TSA  reported  that 
it has trained and deployed 53 canine teams to 13 mass transit systems to help de-
tect  explosives  in  the  passenger  rail  system  and  serve  as  a  deterrent  to  potential 
terrorists. 

Visible  Intermodal  Prevention  and  Response  Teams:  This  program  is  intended  to 
provide teams of law enforcement, canines, and inspection personnel to mass transit 
and passenger rail systems to deter and detect potential terrorist actions. Since the 
program’s inception in December 2005, TSA reported conducting more than 25 exer-
cises at mass transit and passenger rail systems throughout the Nation. 

Mass  Transit  and  Passenger  Rail  Security  Information  Sharing  Network:  Accord-
ing to TSA, the agency initiated this program in August 2005 to develop information 
sharing  and  dissemination  processes  regarding  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  se-
curity across the Federal Government, state and local governments, and rail opera-
tors. 

National Transit Resource Center: TSA officials stated that they are working with 
FTA  and  DHS  OGT  to  develop  this  center,  which  will  provide  transit  agencies  na-
tionwide with pertinent information related to transit security, including recent sus-
picious activities, promising security practices, new security technologies, and other 
information. 

National Security Awareness Training Program for Railroad Employees: TSA offi-
cials stated that the agency has contracted to develop and distribute computer-based 
training for passenger rail, rail transit, and freight rail employees. The training will 
include  information  on  identifying  security  threats,  observing  and  reporting  sus-
picious  activities  and  objects,  mitigating  security  incidents,  and  other  related  infor-
mation.  According  to  TSA,  the  training  will  be  distributed  to  all  passenger  and 
freight rail systems. 

Transit  Terrorist  Tool  and  Tactics:  This  training  course  is  funded  through  the 
Transit  Security  Grant  Program  and  teaches  transit  employees  how  to  prevent  and 
respond  to  a  chemical,  biological,  radiological,  nuclear,  or  explosive  attack.  Accord-
ing to TSA, this course was offered for the first time during the Fall of 2006. 

National Tunnel Security Initiative: This DHS and DOT initiative aims to identify 
and assess risks to underwater tunnels, prioritize security funding to the most crit-
ical  areas,  and  develop  technologies  to  better  secure  underwater  tunnels.  According 
to TSA, this initiative has identified a list of 29 critical underwater rail transit tun-
nels. 

TSA  has  also  sought  to  enhance  passenger  rail  security  by  conducting  research 
on  technologies  related  to  screening  passengers  and  checked  baggage  in  the  pas-
senger  rail  environment.  TSA  conducted  a  Transit  and  Rail  Inspection  Pilot.  The 
pilot  was  a  $1.5  million  effort  to  test  the  feasibility  of  using  existing  and  emerging 
technologies  to  screen  passengers,  carry-on  items,  checked  baggage,  cargo,  and  par-
cels  for  explosives.  TSA  officials  told  us  that  based  upon  preliminary  analyses,  the 
screening technologies and processes tested would be very difficult to implement on 
heavily  used  passenger  rail  systems  because  these  systems  carry  high  volumes  of 
passengers and have multiple points of entry. However, TSA officials added that the 
screening processes used in the pilot may be useful on certain long-distance intercity 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

train  routes,  which  make  fewer  stops.  Further,  TSA  officials  stated  that  screening 
could  be  used  either  randomly  or  for  all  passengers  during  certain  high-risk  events 
or  in  areas  where  a  particular  terrorist  threat  is  known  to  exist.  For  example, 
screening  technology  similar  to  that  used  in  the  pilot  was  used  by  TSA  to  screen 
certain passengers and belongings in Boston and New York rail stations during the 
2004 Democratic and Republican national conventions. According to TSA, the agen-
cy is also researching and developing other passenger rail security technologies, in-
cluding closed circuit television systems that can detect suspicious behavior, mobile 
passenger  screening  checkpoints  to  be  used  at  rail  stations,  bomb  resistant  trash 
cans, and explosive detection equipment for use in the rail environment. 

More recently, in December 2006, TSA issued a proposed rule regarding passenger 
and freight rail security requirements. TSA’s proposed rule would require that pas-
senger  and  freight  rail  operators,  certain  facilities  that  ship  or  receive  hazardous 
materials by rail, and rail transit systems take the following actions: 

• Designate a rail security coordinator to be available to TSA on a 24 hour, 7 day 
a  week  basis  to  serve  as  the  primary  contact  for  the  receipt  of  intelligence  and 
other security related information. 

• Immediately  report  incidents,  potential  threats,  and  security  concerns  to  TSA. 
• Allow TSA and DHS officials to enter and conduct inspections, test, and perform 

other duties within their rail systems. 

• Provide  TSA,  upon  request,  with  the  location  and  shipping  information  of  rail 
cars that contain a specific category and quantity of hazardous materials within 
1 hour of receiving the request from TSA. 
• Provide for a secure chain of custody and control of rail cars containing a speci-

fied quantity and type of hazardous material. 

Public  comments  on  the  proposed  rule  are  due  in  February  2007.  TSA  plans  to 

review these comments and issue a final rule in the future. 

With  multiple  DHS  and  DOT  stakeholders  involved  in  securing  the  U.S.  pas-
senger  rail  system,  the  need  to  improve  coordination  between  the  two  agencies  has 
been  a  consistent  theme  in  our  prior  work  in  this  area.  In  response  to  a  previous 
recommendation  we  made,14 DHS  and  DOT  signed  a  memorandum  of  under-
standing (MOU) to develop procedures by which the two departments could improve 
their  cooperation  and  coordination  for  promoting  the  safe,  secure,  and  efficient 
movement of people and goods throughout the transportation system. The MOU de-
fines  broad  areas  of  responsibility  for  each  department.  For  example,  it  states  that 
DHS,  in  consultation  with  DOT  and  affected  stakeholders,  will  identify,  prioritize, 
and coordinate the protection of critical infrastructure. The MOU between DHS and 
DOT represents an overall framework for cooperation that is to be supplemented by 
additional signed agreements, or Annexes, between the departments. These Annexes 
are  to  delineate  the  specific  security  related  roles,  responsibilities,  resources,  and 
commitments  for  mass  transit,  rail,  research  and  development,  and  other  matters. 
TSA  signed  annexes  to  the  MOU  with  FRA  and  FTA  describing  the  roles  and  re-
sponsibilities  of  each  agency  regarding  passenger  rail  security.  These  annexes  also 
describe  how  TSA  and  these  DOT  agencies  will  coordinate  security  related  efforts, 
avoid  duplicating  these  efforts,  and  improve  coordination  and  communication  with 
industry stakeholders. 
U.S.  and  Foreign  Rail  Operators  Have  Taken  Similar  Actions  To  Secure 
Rail  Systems,  and  Opportunities  for  Additional  Domestic  Security 
Actions May Exist 

U.S.  passenger  rail  operators  have  taken  numerous  actions  to  secure  their  rail 
systems since the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, in the United States, and 
the  March  11,  2004,  attacks  in  Madrid.  These  actions  included  both  improvements 
to  system  operations  and  capital  enhancements  to  a  system’s  facilities,  such  as 
tracks,  buildings,  and  train  cars.  All  of  the  U.S.  passenger  rail  operators  we  con-
tacted have implemented some types of security measures—such as increased num-
bers  and  visibility  of  security  personnel  and  customer  awareness  programs—that 
were  generally  consistent  with  those  we  observed  in  select  countries  in  Europe  and 
Asia. We also identified three rail security practices—covert testing, random screen-
ing  of  passengers  and  their  baggage,  and  centralized  research  and  testing—utilized 
by  foreign  operators  or  their  governments  that  were  not  utilized  by  domestic  rail 
operators or the U.S. Government at the time of our review. 

14 Transportation Security: Federal Action Needed to Help Address Security Challenges, GAO– 

03–843 (Washington, D.C.: June 2003). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

U.S. and Foreign Rail Operators Employ Similar Security Practices 

41 

Both  U.S.  and  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  we  contacted  have  implemented 
similar improvements to enhance the security of their systems. A summary of these 
efforts follows. 

Customer  awareness:  Customer  awareness  programs  we  observed  used  signage 
and  announcements  to  encourage  riders  to  alert  train  staff  if  they  observed  sus-
picious  packages,  persons,  or  behavior.  Of  the  32  domestic  rail  operators  we  inter-
viewed, 30 had implemented a customer awareness program or made enhancements 
to an existing program. Foreign rail operators we visited also attempted to enhance 
customer awareness. For example, 11 of the 13 operators we interviewed had imple-
mented a customer awareness program. 

Increased number and visibility of security personnel: Of the 32 U.S. rail operators 
we  interviewed,  23  had  increased  the  number  of  security  personnel  they  utilized 
since September 11, to provide security throughout their system or had taken steps 
to  increase  the  visibility  of  their  security  personnel.  Several  U.S.  and  foreign  rail 
operators  we  spoke  with  had  instituted  policies  such  as  requiring  their  security 
staff,  in  brightly  colored  vests,  to  patrol  trains  or  stations  more  frequently,  so  they 
are  more  visible  to  customers  and  potential  terrorists  or  criminals.  These  policies 
make  it  easier  for  customers  to  contact  security  personnel  in  the  event  of  an  emer-
gency,  or  if  they  have  spotted  a  suspicious  item  or  person.  At  foreign  sites  we  vis-
ited,  10  of  the  13  operators  had  increased  the  number  of  their  security  officers 
throughout  their  systems  in  recent  years  because  of  the  perceived  increase  in  risk 
of a terrorist attack. 

Increased  use  of  canine  teams:  Of  the  32  U.S.  passenger  rail  operators  we  con-
tacted,  21  were  using  canines  to  patrol  their  facilities  or  trains.  Often,  these  units 
are  used  to  detect  the  presence  of  explosives,  and  may  be  called  in  when  a  sus-
picious package is detected. In foreign countries we visited, passenger rail operators’ 
use of canines varied. In some Asian countries, canines were not culturally accepted 
by  the  public  and  thus  were  not  used  for  rail  security  purposes.  As  in  the  United 
States,  and  in  contrast  to  Asia,  most  European  passenger  rail  operators  used  ca-
nines for explosive detection or as deterrents. 

Employee  training:  All  of  the  domestic  and  foreign  rail  operators  we  interviewed 
had  provided  some  type  of  security  training  to  their  staff,  either  through  in-house 
personnel  or  an  external  provider.  In  many  cases,  this  training  consisted  of  ways 
to  identify  suspicious  items  and  persons  and  how  to  respond  to  events  once  they 
occur.  For  example,  the  London  Underground  and  the  British  Transport  Police  de-
veloped  the  ‘‘HOT’’  method  for  its  employees  to  use  to  identify  suspicious  items  in 
the  rail  system.  In  the  HOT  method,  employees  are  trained  to  look  for  packages  or 
items  that  are  Hidden,  Obviously  suspicious,  and  not  Typical  of  the  environment. 
Passenger and baggage screening practices: Some domestic and foreign rail opera-
tors  have  trained  employees  to  recognize  suspicious  behavior  as  a  means  of  screen-
ing  passengers.  Eight  U.S.  passenger  rail  operators  we  contacted  were  utilizing 
some  form  of  behavioral  screening.  Abroad,  we  found  that  4  of  13  operators  we 
interviewed had implemented forms of behavioral screening. All of the domestic and 
foreign rail operators we contacted have ruled out an airport-style screening system 
for  daily  use  in  heavy  traffic,  where  each  passenger  and  the  passenger’s  baggage 
are screened by a magnetometer or X-ray machine, based on cost, staffing, and cus-
tomer convenience factors, among other reasons. 

Upgrading technology: Many rail operators we interviewed had embarked on pro-
grams  designed  to  upgrade  their  existing  security  technology.  For  example,  we 
found that 29 of the 32 U.S. operators had implemented a form of closed circuit tele-
vision  (CCTV)  to  monitor  their  stations,  yards,  or  trains.  While  these  cameras  can-
not  be  monitored  closely  at  all  times,  because  of  the  large  number  of  staff  that 
would  be  required,  many  rail  operators  felt  that  the  cameras  acted  as  a  deterrent, 
assisted security personnel in determining how to respond to incidents that had al-
ready occurred, and could be monitored if an operator had received information that 
an  incident  may  occur  at  a  certain  time  or  place  in  their  system.  Abroad,  all  13  of 
the  foreign  rail  operators  we  visited  had  CCTV  systems  in  place.  In  addition,  18  of 
the  32  U.S.  rail  operators  we  interviewed  had  installed  new  emergency  phones  or 
enhanced  the  visibility  of  the  intercom  systems  they  already  had.  As  in  the  United 
States, a few foreign operators had implemented chemical or biological detection de-
vices at these rail stations, but their use was not widespread. Two of the 13 foreign 
operators  we  interviewed  had  implemented  these  sensors,  and  both  were  doing  so 
on an experimental basis. In addition, police officers from the British Transport Po-
lice—responsible for policing the rail system in the United Kingdom—were equipped 
with pagers to detect chemical, biological, or radiological elements in the air, allow-
ing them to respond quickly in case of a terrorist attack using one of these methods. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

Access  control:  Tightening  access  control  procedures  at  key  facilities  or  rights-of- 
way is another way many rail operators have attempted to enhance security. A ma-
jority  of  domestic  and  selected  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  had  invested  in  en-
hanced  systems  to  control  unauthorized  access  at  employee  facilities  and  stations. 
Specifically,  23  of  the  32  U.S.  operators  had  installed  a  form  of  access  control  at 
key  facilities  and  stations.  All  13  foreign  operators  had  implemented  some  form  of 
access control to their critical facilities or rights-of-way. 

Rail system design and configuration: In an effort to reduce vulnerabilities to ter-
rorist  attack  and  increase  security,  passenger  rail  operators  in  the  United  States 
and  abroad  have  been,  or  are  now  beginning  to,  incorporate  security  features  into 
the design of new and existing rail infrastructure, primarily rail stations. For exam-
ple,  of  the  32  domestic  rail  operators  we  contacted,  22  of  them  had  removed  their 
conventional  trash  bins  entirely,  or  replaced  them  with  transparent  or  bomb-resist-
ant  trash  bins,  as  TSA  instructed  in  its  May  2004  security  directives.  Foreign  rail 
operators had also taken steps to remove traditional trash bins from their systems. 
Of  the  13  operators  we  visited,  8  had  either  removed  their  trash  bins  entirely  or 
replaced them with blast-resistant cans or transparent receptacles. 

Many foreign rail operators are also incorporating aspects of security into the de-
sign  of  their  rail  infrastructure.  Of  the  13  operators  we  visited,  11  had  attempted 
to  design  new  facilities  with  security  in  mind  and  had  retrofitted  older  facilities  to 
incorporate security-related modifications. For example, one foreign operator we vis-
ited  was  retrofitting  its  train  cars  with  windows  that  passengers  could  open  in  the 
event of a chemical attack. In addition, the London Underground incorporates secu-
rity  into  the  design  of  all  its  new  stations  as  well  as  when  existing  stations  are 
modified.  We  observed  several  security  features  in  the  design  of  Underground  sta-
tions,  such  as  using  vending  machines  that  have  no  holes  that  someone  could  use 
to hide a bomb, and sloped tops to reduce the likelihood that a bomb can be placed 
on top of the machine. In addition, stations are designed to provide staff with clear 
lines  of  sight  to  all  areas  of  the  station,  such  as  underneath  benches  or  ticket  ma-
chines, and station designers try to eliminate or restrict access to any recessed areas 
where a bomb could be hidden. 

Figure  1  shows  a  diagram  of  several  security  measures  that  we  observed  in  pas-

senger rail stations both in the United States and abroad. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Amtrak Faces Challenges Specific to Intercity Passenger Rail in Securing Its System 
In our past work, we found that Amtrak faces security challenges unique to inter-
city  passenger  rail  systems.  First,  Amtrak  operates  over  thousands  of  miles,  often 
far from large population centers. This makes its route system more difficult to pa-
trol  and  monitor  than  one  contained  in  a  particular  metropolitan  region,  and  it 
causes delays in responding to incidents when they occur in remote areas. Also, out-
side  the  Northeast  Corridor,  Amtrak  operates  almost  exclusively  on  tracks  and  in 
stations  owned  by  freight  rail  companies.  This  means  that  Amtrak  often  cannot 
make security improvements to others’ rights-of-way or station facilities and that it 
is  reliant  on  the  staff  of  other  organizations  to  patrol  their  facilities  and  respond 
to incidents that may occur. Furthermore, with over 500 stations, only half of which 
are staffed, screening even a small portion of the passengers and baggage boarding 
Amtrak  trains  is  difficult.  Finally,  Amtrak’s  financial  condition  has  never  been 
strong—Amtrak has been on the edge of bankruptcy several times. 

Amid  the  ongoing  challenges  of  securing  its  coast-to-coast  railway,  Amtrak  has 
taken  some  actions  to  enhance  security  throughout  its  intercity  passenger  rail  sys-
tem. For example, Amtrak initiated a passenger awareness campaign, began enforc-
ing  restrictions  on  carry-on  luggage  that  limit  passengers  to  two  carry-on  bags,  not 
exceeding 50 pounds; began requiring passengers to show identification after board-
ing  trains;  increased  the  number  of  canine  units  patrolling  its  system  looking  for 
explosives  or  narcotics;  and  assigned  some  of  its  police  to  ride  trains  in  the  North-
east Corridor. Also, Amtrak instituted a policy of randomly inspecting checked bag-
gage  on  its  trains.  Last,  Amtrak  is  making  improvements  to  the  emergency  exits 
in  certain  tunnels  to  make  evacuating  trains  in  the  tunnels  easier  in  the  event  of 
a crash or terrorist attack. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
o
a
g
8
1
1

44 

Three  Foreign  Rail  Security  Practices  Are  Not  Currently  Used  in  the  United  States 
While many of the security practices we observed in foreign rail systems are simi-
lar to those U.S. passenger rail operators are implementing, we identified three for-
eign  practices  that  were  not  currently  in  use  among  the  U.S.  passenger  rail  opera-
tors  we  contacted  as  of  September  2005,  nor  were  they  performed  by  the  U.S.  Gov-
ernment. These practices are as follows. 

Covert testing: Two of the 13 foreign rail systems we visited utilized covert testing 
to keep employees alert about their security responsibilities. Covert testing involves 
security  staff  staging  unannounced  events  to  test  the  response  of  railroad  staff  to 
incidents  such  as  suspicious  packages  or  setting  off  alarms.  In  one  European  sys-
tem,  this  covert  testing  involves  security  staff  placing  suspicious  items  throughout 
their  system  to  see  how  long  it  takes  operating  staff  to  respond  to  the  item.  Simi-
larly,  one  Asian  rail  operator’s  security  staff  will  break  security  seals  on  fire  extin-
guishers and open alarmed emergency doors randomly to see how long it takes staff 
to respond. TSA conducts covert testing of passenger and baggage screening in avia-
tion, but has not conducted such testing in the rail environment. 

Random screening: Of the 13 foreign operators we interviewed, 2 have some form 
of  random  screening  of  passengers  and  their  baggage  in  place.  Prior  to  the  July 
2005 London bombings, no passenger rail operators in the United States were prac-
ticing  random  passengers  or  baggage  screening.  However,  during  the  Democratic 
National  Convention  in  2004,  the  Massachusetts  Bay  Transportation  Authority 
(MBTA) instituted a system of random screening of passengers. 

National  government  clearinghouse  on  technologies  and  best  practices:  According 
to  passenger  rail  operators  in  five  countries  we  visited,  their  national  governments 
had  centralized  the  process  for  performing  research  and  development  of  passenger 
rail  security  technologies  and  maintained  a  clearinghouse  of  technologies  and  secu-
rity best practices for passenger rail operators. No U.S. Federal agency has compiled 
or  disseminated  information  on  research  and  development  and  other  best  practices 
for U.S. rail operators. 

Implementing covert testing, random screening, or a government-sponsored clear-
inghouse  for  technologies  and  best  practices  in  the  U.S.  could  pose  political,  legal, 
fiscal, and cultural challenges because of the differences between the U.S. and these 
foreign nations. Many foreign nations have dealt with terrorist attacks on their pub-
lic transportation systems for decades, compared with the United States, where rail 
has  not  been  specifically  targeted  by  terrorists.  According  to  foreign  rail  operators, 
these  experiences  have  resulted  in  greater  acceptance  of  certain  security  practices, 
such  as  random  searches,  which  the  U.S.  public  may  view  as  a  violation  of  their 
civil  liberties  or  which  may  discourage  them  from  using  public  transportation.  The 
impact of security measures on passengers is an important consideration for domes-
tic  rail  operators,  since  most  passengers  could  choose  another  means  of  transpor-
tation, such as a personal automobile. As such, security measures that limit accessi-
bility, cause delays, increase fares, or otherwise cause inconvenience could push peo-
ple away from rail and into their cars. In contrast, the citizens of the European and 
Asian  countries  we  visited  are  more  dependent  on  public  transportation  than  most 
U.S. residents and therefore may be more willing to accept intrusive security meas-
ures. Nevertheless, in order to identify innovative security measures that could help 
further  mitigate  terrorism-risks  to  rail  assets—especially  as  part  of  a  broader  risk 
management  approach  discussed  earlier—it  is  important  to  consider  the  feasibility 
and costs and benefits of implementing the three rail security practices we identified 
in foreign countries. Officials from DHS, DOT, passenger rail industry associations, 
and  rail  systems  we  interviewed  told  us  that  operators  would  benefit  from  such  an 
evaluation. Since our report on passenger rail security was issued, TSA has reported 
taking  steps  to  coordinate  with  foreign  passenger  rail  operators  and  governments 
to  identify  security  best  practices.  For  example,  TSA  reported  working  with  British 
rail security officials to identify best practices for detecting and handling suspicious 
packages in rail systems. 
Conclusions 

In conclusion, Mr. Chairman, the July 2005 London rail bombings made clear that 
even  when  a  variety  of  security  precautions  are  put  into  place,  passenger  rail  sys-
tems that move high volumes of passengers daily remain vulnerable to attack. DHS 
components have taken steps to assess the risks to the passenger rail system. How-
ever, enhanced Federal leadership is needed to help ensure that actions and invest-
ments  designed  to  enhance  security  are  properly  focused  and  prioritized  so  that  fi-
nite resources may be allocated appropriately to help protect all modes of transpor-
tation.  Specifically,  both  DHS  and  TSA  should  take  additional  steps  to  help  ensure 
that the risk management efforts under way clearly and effectively identify priority 
areas  for  security-related  investments  in  rail  and  other  transportation  modes.  TSA 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

has  not  yet  completed  its  methodology  for  determining  how  the  results  of  threat, 
criticality, and vulnerability assessments will be used to identify and prioritize risks 
to  passenger  rail  and  other  transportation  sectors.  Until  the  overall  risk  to  the  en-
tire transportation sector is identified, TSA will not be able to determine where and 
how to target limited resources to achieve the greatest security gains. Once risk as-
sessments for the passenger rail industry have been completed, it will be critical to 
be able to compare assessment results across all transportation modes and make in-
formed,  risk-based  investment  trade-offs.  It  is  important  that  DHS  complete  its 
framework  to  help  ensure  that  risks  to  all  sectors  can  be  analyzed  and  compared 
in a consistent way. Until this framework is complete, it will be difficult for agencies 
to reconcile information from different sectors to allow for a meaningful comparison 
of risk. 

Apart from its efforts to identify risks, TSA has taken steps to enhance the secu-
rity  of  the  passenger  rail  system.  The  issuance  of  security  directives  in  2004  was 
a  well-intentioned  effort,  but  did  not  provide  the  industry  with  security  standards 
based on industry best practices. It is also not clear how TSA will enforce these di-
rectives.  Consequently,  neither  the  Federal  Government  nor  rail  operators  can  be 
sure they are requiring and implementing security practices proven to help prevent 
or mitigate disasters. While foreign passenger rail operators face similar challenges 
to securing their systems and have generally implemented similar security practices 
as  U.S.  rail  operators,  there  are  some  practices  that  are  utilized  abroad  that  U.S. 
rail  operators  or  the  Federal  Government  have  not  studied  in  terms  of  the  feasi-
bility,  costs,  and  benefits.  In  our  September  2005  report  on  passenger  rail  security, 
we recommended, among other things, that TSA establish a plan with timelines for 
completing  its  methodology  for  conducting  risk  assessments  and  develop  security 
standards  that  reflect  industry  best  practices  and  can  be  measured  and  enforced. 
These actions should help ensure that the Federal Government has the information 
it  needs  to  prioritize  passenger  rail  assets  based  on  risk,  and  evaluate,  select,  and 
implement  measures  to  help  the  passenger  rail  operators  protect  their  systems 
against  terrorism.  In  addition,  we  recommended  that  the  Secretary  of  DHS,  in  col-
laboration  with  DOT  and  the  passenger  rail  industry,  determine  the  feasibility,  in 
a  risk  management  context,  of  implementing  certain  security  practices  used  by  for-
eign  rail  operators.  DHS,  DOT,  and  Amtrak  generally  agreed  with  the  report’s  rec-
ommendations,  but  as  of  January  2007,  they  have  not  told  us  what  specific  actions 
they  are  taking  to  implement  them.  We  will  continue  to  assess  DHS  and  DOT’s  ef-
forts  to  secure  the  U.S.  passenger  rail  system  during  follow-on  work  to  be  initiated 
later this year. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any 

questions that you or other members of the Committee may have at this time. 

RELATED GAO PRODUCTS RELEASED SINCE SEPTEMBER 11, 2001 

Passenger Rail Security: Evaluating Foreign Security Practices and Risk Can Help 

Guide Security Efforts. GAO–06–557T. Washington, D.C.: March 29, 2006. 

Passenger  Rail  Security:  Enhanced  Federal  Leadership  Needed  to  Prioritize  and 

Guide Security Efforts. GAO–06–181T, Washington, D.C.: October 20, 2005. 

Passenger  Rail  Security:  Enhanced  Federal  Leadership  Needed  to  Prioritize  and 

Guide Security Efforts. GAO–05–851. Washington, D.C.: September 9, 2005. 

Transportation  Security:  Systematic  Planning  Needed  to  Optimize  Resources. 

GAO–05–357T. Washington, D.C.: February 15, 2005. 

Rail  Security:  Some  Actions  Taken  to  Enhance  Passenger  and  Freight  Rail  Secu-
rity,  but  Significant  Challenges  Remain.  GAO–04–598T.  Washington,  D.C.:  March 
23, 2004. 

Transportation  Security:  Federal  Action  Needed  to  Enhance  Security  Efforts. 

GAO–03–1154T. Washington, D.C.: September 9, 2003. 

Transportation  Security:  Federal  Action  Needed  to  Help  Address  Security  Chal-

lenges. GAO–03–843. Washington, D.C.: June 30, 2003. 

Rail  Safety  and  Security:  Some  Actions  Already  Taken  to  Enhance  Rail  Security, 

but Risk-based Plan Needed. GAO–03–435. Washington, D.C.: April 30, 2003. 

Transportation  Security:  Post-September  11  Initiatives  and  Long-term  Challenges. 

GAO–03–616T. Washington, D.C.: April 1, 2003. 

Mass Transit: Federal Action Could Help Transit Agencies Address Security Chal-

lenges. GAO–03–263. Washington, D.C.: December 13, 2002. 

Mass  Transit:  Challenges  in  Securing  Transit  Systems.  GAO–02–1075T.  Wash-

ington, D.C.: September 18, 2002. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  next  witness,  the  Director  of  the  Office  of 
Homeland  Security  and  Preparedness,  State  of  New  Jersey,  the 
Honorable Richard Can˜ as. 
STATEMENT  OF  THE  HON.  RICHARD  L.  CAN˜ AS,  DIRECTOR, 
OFFICE  OF  HOMELAND  SECURITY  AND  PREPAREDNESS, 
STATE OF NEW JERSEY 
Mr. CAN˜ AS. Good morning, Chairman Inouye, and Vice Chairman 
Stevens, distinguished Senators. Thank you for asking me to testify 
on  how,  together,  we  can  improve  rail  and  surface  transportation 
security. 

Current  intelligence  information  clearly  indicates  terrorists’ 
threat  to  mass  transit,  specifically,  rail  infrastructure,  remains 
high. 

In New York and New Jersey region, the most densely populated 
area  in  the  United  States,  there  have  been  multiple,  specific 
threats to rail and subway assets. Several terrorist plots have been 
thwarted since 9/11, and we continue to see numerous incidents of 
suspicious activity at, or near, New Jersey rail infrastructure. It is 
clearly one of the highest security priorities for us. 

New  Jersey’s  rail  system  is  complex.  The  state  is  home  to  five 
major public rail organizations, with an annual ridership exceeding 
90  million  passengers.  Policing  these  systems  is  a  daunting  chal-
lenge, and since 9/11, one that has depleted our resources. 

On  the  freight  rail  side,  New  Jersey  has  13  rail  companies,  con-
necting more than 900 miles of rail lines with large industries that 
require  hazardous  materials  trucked,  piped  and  freight-railed  to 
them. The release of any of these toxic inhalation hazards, or TIH, 
would likely cause serious damage to nearby population and facili-
ties. 

Shortly after 9/11, New Jersey began working with the transpor-
tation sector to develop industry best management practices for se-
curity. And in 2004, these were approved. The passenger rail sector 
in  our  state  was  the  first  in  the  transit  industry  to  complete  vul-
nerability  assessments.  We  have  also  developed,  this  past  year,  a 
comprehensive transportation security strategy for New Jersey. 

But  our  progress  has  limits.  There  is  a  vast  gap  between  what 
we  need  to  do  to  enhance  transportation  security,  and  what  funds 
we have to accomplish that task. 

We  are  also  dependent  on  the  security  of  our  trucking  industry, 
which  critically  needs  to  interact  with  a  secure  port  environment. 
Once trucks leave the controlled access areas of our ports, they are 
part of the same open environment as rail. 

While waiting for the Federal Government to provide the needed 
funding for transportation security initiatives, our State has under-
taken  a  number  of  actions  in  conjunction  with  rail,  truck  and  bus 
carriers that operate in our state. Congress has since responded to 
the  threats  facing  mass  transit,  rail,  bus  and  ferry  and  these  sys-
tems’  overall  vulnerability  by  authorizing  transit  security  grants, 
which  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  administers  as  part 
of its infrastructure protection program. 

And,  we  are  very  appreciative  of  that  effort.  But  the  freight—on 
the  freight  rail  side  there  are  funding  gaps.  For  example,  in  2004, 
TSA  undertook  a  study  of  the  North  Jersey  rail  corridor,  and  fol-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

lowed  that  up  with  a  comprehensive  review  of  the  same  area  in 
2006. 

But these reviews were not accompanied by any DHS funding to 
address  vulnerabilities.  Nor  has  DHS,  to  this  point,  provided  any 
funding  to  help  bolster  the  secure  movement  and  storage  of  haz-
ardous material via freight rail. 

For these reasons, we strongly support the provisions of the draft 
legislation  being  considered  by  this  committee  that  recognize  the 
need for additional funding. 

Another  requirement  in  our  State  is  the  real-time  tracking  of 
TIH cargo. New Jersey has seven major rail yards that handle TIH 
rail cars. Some of these are in our most populous urban areas. The 
rail  companies  need  to  share  their  tracking  information  with  secu-
rity agencies. DHS’s recent draft freight rail regulations also recog-
nizes  this  vital  need.  In  this  regard,  our  State  has  made  progress 
with  the  freight  rail  industry,  particularly  CSX  in  obtaining  this 
exclusive  tracking  capability.  And  I  want  to  publicly  commend 
them for that cooperation. 

We  also  wholly  support  the  provision  in  the  proposed  legislation 
that  calls  for  TSA  to  oversee  all  transportation-related  measures; 
heretofore, it has not always been clear which agency is responsible 
for this oversight. 

And  we  are  also  in  agreement  that  Amtrak  should  remain  a 
strong  partner  in  regional  efforts  for  developing  critical  vulner-
ability  assessments  along  the  corridor.  At  its  stations,  and  in  its 
tunnels,  New  Jersey’s  passenger  rail  systems  run  on  the  same 
tracks, and use the same stations as Amtrak. 

Mr.  Chairman,  New  Jersey  has  taken  many  steps  to  protect  its 
citizens and facilities, and we will continue down that track as fast 
as  we  can.  Simply,  because  we  must.  But  New  Jersey  can  only  go 
so  far  without  adequate  funding  and  without  uniform  standards 
applied  to  our  sister  states.  Please  note  that  when  I  speak  of  uni-
form standards, I’m talking about them as a floor—not as a ceiling. 
We  want  to  remain  and  maintain  our  ability  to  exceed  minimum 
uniform  standards  when  we  think  it  is  in  the  best  interests  of  our 
citizens’ security. 

In closing, I want to thank the Chair and the Vice Chair, as well 
as  of  the  members  of  the  Committee  for  allowing  me  to  testify. 
Transportation  security  is  a  critical  issue  that  must  be  discussed 
and  debated  at  the  national  stage,  and  again,  I  thank  you  for  pro-
viding me that opportunity. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Can˜ as follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. RICHARD L. CAN˜ AS, DIRECTOR, 

OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND PREPAREDNESS, STATE OF NEW JERSEY 

Good  Morning  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  and  Senators.  Thank 
you for asking me to testify on how together we can improve rail and surface trans-
portation  security.  There  is  no  question  about  the  priority.  I  also  want  to  express 
my  gratitude  to  Senator  Lautenberg  for  his  unwavering  commitment  to  transpor-
tation security, particularly rail security. I will be commenting briefly on several as-
pects  of  the  proposed  legislation  that  is  before  you,  and  I  commend  Chairman 
Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  Senator  Lautenberg  for  sponsoring  ‘‘the  Sur-
face  Transportation  and  Rail  Security  Act  of  2007,’’  which  recognizes  the  need  for 
significant security enhancements. 

Current intelligence information clearly indicates that the terrorist threat to mass 
transit, specifically rail infrastructure, remains high. In recent years, terrorists have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

conducted numerous successful attacks on transit systems worldwide. Mumbai, Lon-
don, and Madrid come readily to mind. 

In  the  New  York/New  Jersey  region  there  have  been  multiple,  specific  threats  to 
rail  and  subway  assets.  Several  terrorist  plots  have  been  thwarted,  including  a 
much-publicized plot against the PATH system connecting New York and New Jer-
sey,  and  two  earlier  plots  directed  at  the  New  York  City  subway  system.  An  indi-
vidual charged in one of the earlier plots was sentenced recently to 30 years in pris-
on. We continue to see numerous incidents of suspicious activity at or near New Jer-
sey’s  rail  infrastructure,  including  photography,  videotaping,  use  of  hand  counters, 
placement of fake improvised explosive devices and trespassing. 

I would like to begin by providing a brief overview of New Jersey’s surface trans-
portation  system  and  thus  provide  a  picture  of  its  magnitude  and  complexities.  I 
will focus my first comments on both the passenger and freight rail sectors. 

The passenger rail sector in New Jersey consists of five major public rail organiza-
tions:  New  Jersey  Transit,  Port  Authority  Trans  Hudson  (PATH),  Port  Authority 
Transit  Company  (PATCO),  Southeastern  Pennsylvania  Transit  Authority  (SEPTA) 
and  Amtrak.  Among  these  five  systems,  the  annual  ridership  exceeds  90  million 
passengers. I’ve attached a more detailed list of the number of lines and their rider-
ship to my testimony. The statistics are impressive indeed. On the other hand, these 
public and private passenger rail systems are depleted of resources. By that I mean 
they do not have enough officers, canine units, and technology to properly police and 
provide security for the heavy passenger loads they carry. 

On  the  freight  rail  side,  New  Jersey  has  13  rail  companies  operating  within  our 
state.  These  include  three  Class  I  (CSX,  Norfolk  Southern  and  Conrail),  two  Class 
II  and  nine  Class  III  railroads,  which  operate  on  more  than  900  miles  of  railroad 
mainline.  For  those  of  you  not  familiar  with  New  Jersey,  I  must  remind  the  Com-
mittee  that  this  activity  takes  place  in  the  most  densely  populated  state  in  the 
union.  And  that  in  this  most  densely  populated  state,  our  citizens  live  and  work 
amidst a concentration of chemical, pharmaceutical, petroleum and other industries, 
a  great  number  of  which  require  hazardous  precursor  materials  trucked,  piped  or 
freight-railed to them. 

New  Jersey  serves  as  both  destination  and  a  point  of  origin  for  hazardous  mate-
rials, which are among the 43 million tons of material transported across our freight 
lines annually. The release of toxic substances from a rail car in northern New Jer-
sey would likely cause serious damage to nearby populations and facilities. 

Shortly  after  9/11,  the  state  began  working  with  the  transportation  sector  to  de-
velop  industry  ‘‘best  management  practices,’’  and  in  2004  these  were  approved. 
These  best  practices  were  initiated  in  some  cases  prior  to  the  Federal  Government 
or  TSA  developing  its  industry  best  practices.  The  development  of  these  standards 
and  protocols  involved  working  with  the  private  sector,  public  transit  agencies  and 
the Federal Government. Meanwhile, the passenger rail sector in our state was the 
first to have the entire transit industry complete the vulnerability assessment using 
the U.S. Department of Homeland Security’s (DHS’s) Special Needs Tool Kit, a tech-
nical assistance program funded by DHS. 

But  New  Jersey  did  not  stop  there.  When  I  became  the  Director  of  New  Jersey’s 
new  Office  of  Homeland  Security  and  Preparedness  last  March,  Governor  Corzine 
asked me to develop a comprehensive rail security strategy and to begin distributing 
limited state and Federal funds—based on risk. 

Our  security  forces  have  increased  their  presence  and  patrol  of  key  installations 
to  include  specialized  canine  units.  We  have  also  increased  the  interoperability  of 
emergency  responders  within  subways,  tunnels,  rail  yards  and  terminals.  We  have 
increased  the  number  of  ‘‘SMART’’  closed-circuit  television  (CCTV)  cameras  and 
software  at  equipment  yards  where  commuter  rail  coach  cars  and  locomotives  are 
stored.  We  have  also  initiated  regional  programs  with  the  State  of  New  York  and 
the  NY/NJ  and  Delaware  River  Port  authorities  to  maximize  the  efforts  of  our  lim-
ited resources. And finally, we are using scarce state funds to leverage security ini-
tiatives against investment justifications funded by DHS. 

But  our  progress  has  limits.  There  is  a  vast  gap  between  what  we  need  to  do  to 
enhance  transportation  security  and  what  funds  we  have  to  accomplish  that  task. 
Rail, of necessity, operates in an open environment. Mass transit passenger rail, in 
particular, represents a soft target because it is in the business of moving as many 
people as possible as quickly and efficiently as possible. 

Congress  has  responded  to  the  threat  to  mass  transit  and  the  system’s  vulner-
ability by authorizing Transit Security Grants, which the Department of Homeland 
Security  administers  as  part  of  its  Infrastructure  Protection  Program.  We  are  very 
appreciative of that effort and believe we are using the funds to the best of our abil-
ity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

Freight  rail  carriers  also  operate  in  an  open  environment  and  are  required  to 
transport and safeguard toxic inhalation hazards, or TIH, extremely hazardous ma-
terials  that  are  the  functional  equivalent  of  chemical  plants  on  rails.  DHS  has  to 
this  point,  however,  not  targeted  any  similar  funding  to  its  Transit  Security  Grant 
Program to help bolster the secure movement and storage of these materials. 

Much more needs and must be done. 
We  are  also  dependent  on  the  security  of  our  trucking  industry,  which  critically 
needs to interact with a secure port environment and concomitant Federal funding. 
Once trucks leave the controlled access areas of our ports they are part of the same 
open  environment  as  rail,  buses  and  ferries  and  an  inclusive  strategy  for  them 
needs to be considered. 

Real-time cargo tracking of rail cars to monitor the movement of TIH cars on New 
Jersey  tracks,  yards  or  on  sidings  is  another  example.  The  rail  companies  need  to 
share this tracking information with security agencies. In this regard, I cannot over-
state  the  importance  of  fostering  public/private  partnerships  to  achieve  our  mutual 
goal of assuring a secure transportation system. I am pleased to report that our of-
fice has made some progress in this regard, particularly with the railroad company 
CSX.  They  have  sought  out  a  partnership,  shared  their  insights  on  rail-based  secu-
rity  threats,  and  even  allowed  us  to  have  access  to  their  tracking  capability.  And 
I  want  to  publicly  commend  them  for  that.  Leveraging  this  success,  we  intend  to 
seek similar partnerships with other carriers. 

Another shortfall involves TSA. In 2004, TSA undertook a study of the North Jer-
sey  freight  rail  corridor.  In  2006,  TSA  followed  up  with  a  Comprehensive  Review 
of the same area. These were thorough and well thought out assessments with posi-
tive recommendations. But neither of these reviews by TSA came with any funding 
to address vulnerabilities that were identified. 

It  is  our  hope  that,  as  a  result  of  the  proposed  legislation  that  this  committee  is 
considering,  this  situation  will  be  set  right,  and  that  this  committee  will  support 
providing funding necessary to close recognized security gaps. 

We also wholly support the provision in the proposed ‘‘Surface Transportation and 
Rail  Security  Act  of  2007’’  that  calls  for  oversight  of  all  security  measures  by  TSA. 
Heretofore, the agency responsible for oversight has not always been clear. 

And  finally,  the  Northeast  Corridor  line,  which  connects  New  Jersey  and  New 
York under the Hudson River, handles more than 150,000 NJ TRANSIT and 35,000 
Amtrak trips each and every day—relying on a 100-year-old two-track railroad tun-
nel  that  provides  limited  capacity  and  no  redundancy.  The  Access  to  the  Regions 
Core  Project,  including  a  new  commuter  rail  tunnel  under  the  Hudson  will  double 
commuter  rail  capacity—providing  critical  system  capacity  enhancements,  des-
perately needed transportation redundancy, and will be designed to include the lat-
est  security  features.  Moreover,  the  Amtrak  tunnel  that  we  use  today  is  the  only 
link  from  Boston  to  Washington  for  intercity  trains,  as  well  as  for  New  York  and 
New Jersey commuter trains. 

We are also in agreement that Amtrak should remain a strong partner in regional 
efforts for developing critical vulnerability assessments along the corridor, at its sta-
tions or within its tunnels. As you probably are aware, New Jersey’s passenger rail 
systems run on the same tracks and use the same stations as Amtrak. 

In closing, I want to thank the Chair and Vice Chair, as well as all the members 
of  the  Committee,  for  allowing  me  to  testify.  New  Jersey  has  taken  many  steps  to 
protect its citizens and facilities by shoring up security on its passenger and freight 
rail  systems.  We  will  continue  down  that  track  as  fast  as  we  can  simply  because 
we must. But New Jersey can only go so far without adequate funding and without 
uniform  standards  applied  to  our  sister  states.  That  is  why  I  find  the  very  fact  of 
today’s  hearing  a  positive  and  heartening  development.  Transportation  security  is 
a critical issue that must be discussed and debated on the national stage and, again, 
I thank you for providing that opportunity. 
Attachment 

New Jersey Rail Transportation Fact Sheet 

NJ TRANSIT 
Rail Operations 

Rail Lines 
Directional Route Miles 
Locomotives in Service 
Revenue cars in service 
Rail Stations 

11 
951 
133 
900 
162 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

New Jersey Rail Transportation Fact Sheet—Continued 

Weekday ridership trips 
Weekend ridership trips 

Light Rail lines 
Directional route miles 
Light rail fleet 
Light rail stations 
Weekday ridership trips 
Weekend ridership trips 

Light Rail Operations 

PATH (Port Authority Trans Hudson) 
Port Authority of New York and New Jersey 

Weekday Ridership passengers 
2005 Passenger trips—million 
Route miles—tunnel 
Route miles—surface 

PATCO (Port Authority Transit Company) 

Delaware River Port Authority 

Weekday Ridership passengers 
Transit Car fleet vehicles 
Track miles 
Stations 

Trains in Operation Daily 
Total NJ station usage (annual boardings and alightings) 

AMTRAK 

SEPTA (Southeastern Pennsylvania Transit Authority) 

2005 Annual Ridership—million 

R3 West Trenton annual passengers (2005) 
R7 Trenton annual passengers (2005) 

Light rail routes 
Light rail vehicles 
Elevated subway routes 
Elevated subway vehicles 
Regional rail routes 
Regional rail vehicles 

236,900 
142,100 

3 
107 
72 
52 
45,050 
42,700 

215,115 
60.7 
7.4 
6.4 

34,000 
121 
14.2 
13 

110 
3,406,215 

299 
2,634,530 
2,852,245 
9 
159 
2 
371 
13 
349 

2003 Rail Freight Tonnage—42 million tons. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Director. 
I’d  like  to  ask  Assistant  Secretary  Hawley  a  question.  Recently, 
an Executive Order issued strengthening surface transportation se-
curity and that Executive Order requires the Department of Home-
land  Security  and  TSA  to  do  some  planning  assessments  and  re-
porting that this committee has been advocating for some time. 

However, I’m concerned that your budget of $37 million this year 
will be insufficient. Do you believe your agency has enough funding 
to fulfill your responsibilities under this Executive Order? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  do  in  the  current  fiscal  year  for  going  forward  in 
2007. And I think a good example of that is how we took the TIH— 
the  Toxic  Inhalation  Hazard—really  dangerous  chemicals,  and  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

stituted  the  security  arrangement  with  the  railroads  that  does  not 
cost  the  Government,  but  has  the  effect  of  reducing  the  shipments 
that are standing still. 

So,  an  example  of  how  that  works  is,  rather  than  us  having  to 
pay  for  fences  around  cars,  if  we  work  with  the  railroads  to  make 
those cars not get into that area, that accomplishes the security ob-
jective without the Government having to pay for it. 

So, I think, on the rail/TIH side, those steps can be taken to im-

plement security without significant Government funding. 
The CHAIRMAN. So you believe you have sufficient funds? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And  do  you  believe  that  the  President  will  re-

quest supplemental funding? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  right  now  in  the  2008  budget  process—and 
we’ll  be  back  up  here  in  a  month  to  discuss  that—but  I  think  the 
priority  that  we  give  to  the  surface  side  and  the  aviation  side  are 
a lot closer in terms of our focus in the security measures than the 
budget  dollars  would  indicate,  simply  because  of  the  fact  that  we 
pay  the  salaries  of  all  of  the  people  in  the  TSA  in  the  airports, 
whereas a lot of other people pay for it in the surface environment. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  You  received  $175  million  for  the  Transit  Secu-

rity Grant Program, is that sufficient? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, and it was—Secretary recently announced the 
2007 allocations of that, and as I mentioned in my statement, that 
the  risk  assessment  was  done  in  surface  transportation  and  the 
number  one  target,  for  us,  in  terms  of  funding  and  priority  is 
urban, underground, high-density population passenger transit sys-
tems.  And  that’s  where  the  priority  for  that  $171  million  is  going. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Director  Berrick,  do  you  believe  that  our  Government  is  pro-
viding  sufficient  resources,  personnel,  regulations  to  adequately 
protect our Nation’s surface transportation and rail systems? 

Ms. BERRICK. In terms of whether or not sufficient resources are 
being  provided,  the  first  point  I  would  make  is  DHS  is—I’m  sorry, 
closer?  The  first  point  I  would  make  is,  DHS  is  required  to  issue 
a  Transportation  Sector  Specific  Plan  which,  basically,  will  outline 
their strategy for securing all modes of transportation. They’re also 
supposed to develop detailed annexes to that. 

Since  that  hasn’t  been  issued,  it’s  difficult  to  determine,  long 
range,  what  their  ultimate  plans  and  goals  are.  So,  until  that’s 
completed,  I  think  it’s  difficult  to  identify  whether  or  not  the  re-
sources that they have are enough. 

Another point that we found during our work was, in conducting 
risk assessments, DHS in issuing grants had a pretty rigorous risk 
assessment  methodology.  Separate  from  that,  TSA  was  also  doing 
risk assessments, and separate from that, DOT was conducting risk 
assessments within passenger rail to see whether or not they were 
allocating the limited resources to the rail systems that were most 
in  need.  We  found  at  the  time  that  the  three  parties  were  not  co-
ordinating  as  much  as  they  could,  and  they  had  not  yet  completed 
their  efforts.  So,  we  made  recommendations  that  these  efforts 
should be coordinated so they’re not duplicating efforts, and also so 
that  they  can  effectively  compare  risks,  since  there  are  limited  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

sources  right  now,  to  make  sure  the  money  is  going  in  the  right 
places. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Director. I will submit the 
rest  of  my  questions  in  the  record,  and  submit  it  to  you  for  your 
response. 

Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I’m  reminded  of  the  Exxon-Valdez  spill.  We  had,  at  one  time, 
taken  the  Appropriations  Committee  down  to  Valdez  and  the  in-
dustry had shown us their response plan, and they had a series of 
boats out there. They actually had dumped about 40 barrels of ten-
nis  balls,  and  they  showed  up  how  they  could  scoop  those  up,  and 
how we were prepared for a spill. 

Several years went by, and we had the spill. People couldn’t find 
the  right  equipment.  Local  communities  weren’t  prepared.  Their 
communications  systems  were  not  interoperable,  and  they  had  not 
had  training  of  new  people.  They  had  not  really  exercised  their 
plans. 

Congress  has  passed  an  Act  that  requires  all  of  those  things  to 

be done now, and to prove that they’ve been done. 

I  wonder  about  the  transportation  modes,  now.  And  let  me  ask 
you,  Ms.  Berrick.  First—it’s  my  understanding  that  each  one  of 
these  agencies  has  signed  a  memorandum  of  agreement  that  gives 
TSA  the  lead  role  with  regard  to  security  under  the  direction  of 
DHS. Did you review that? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Yes,  we  did.  And  at  the  time  we  did  our  work— 
we started about a year and a half ago—the MOU didn’t exist. And 
we  had  made  a  recommendation  earlier  that  the  two  parties  de-
velop  an  MOU.  They  did  develop  the  MOU,  since  then  they  have 
developed annexes for specific transportation areas. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  respectfully,  it’s  not  two  parties,  we’ve 

got at least five here. 

Ms. BERRICK. Right. All of the annexes have not yet been signed. 
For example, there’s no annex between TSA and the Federal Motor 
Carrier Safety Administration. But there are annexes between TSA 
and FRA, and TSA and FTA. So, we think that’s a great—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  Doesn’t  that  mean  everyone  in  the  whole  sur-
face transportation industry—is waiting for Homeland Security and 
TSA to do its job? I don’t understand how far this MOU goes. Have 
they turned over the formulation of plans for security in their var-
ious areas to TSA and Homeland Security? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Well,  I  think  the  first  problem  in  terms  of  the 
views of the transportation stakeholders was, they wanted to know 
that the Federal Government’s role was. They were confused about 
what  DOT  was  doing,  what  DHS  was  doing.  So,  I  think  the  fact 
that  the  MOU  was  signed  with  these  annexes  is  a  great  first  step 
to  be  clear  on  what  the  roles  and  responsibilities  are.  And  they  do 
provide  some  good  detail  that  had  previously  been  concerns  of 
stakeholders. 

The question now is the implementation of that MOU. The ques-
tion is also, When is DHS going to issue this transportation sector- 
specific  plan  that’s  going  to  outline  what  their  overall  strategy  is? 
Because there are still some questions among transportation stake-
holders on what the long-term strategy is, despite all of the efforts 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

that  TSA  and  FRA  and  FTA  have  underway.  There’s  still  that 
question,  Where  are  we  ultimately  going,  and  what’s  our  strategy? 
Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  do  these  agreements  require  cooperation 
of  the  communities  along  railroad  lines,  for  instance,  to  be  pre-
pared  to  handle  problems—should  they  develop—in  their  area?  Is 
there  interoperability  of  communications  between  the  local  people 
and these various Federal agencies? Is there interoperability as far 
as communications—between the Federal agencies themselves? Did 
you look into that? 

Ms. BERRICK. I—not that specific issue. In terms of the MOU and 
the  annexes,  I  don’t  believe  it  goes  into  that  level  of  detail.  There 
have  been  rules,  and  proposed  rules—recently  there’s  been  a  pro-
posed rule on freight and passenger rail security that provides a lot 
more  detail,  and  lays  out  what  the  requirements  are  for  transpor-
tation security operators, but I’ll have to defer to my colleagues on 
the level of detail related to that point. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I don’t have time to ask each one of you 
questions. But, respectfully, let me tell you—we had plans. We had 
one of the best plans in the world for Valdez. It was dusty, the new 
people hadn’t been trained, the equipment hadn’t been inspected— 
I  wonder  if  we’re  getting  down  to  that  detail.  It’s  wonderful  to 
make plans. But how are they executed, and who has the responsi-
bility for compliance? 

We’ve just passed this Pipeline Security Act. We put the duty on 
an official, a high-level official, of every company to certify that the 
action  had  been  taken  to  carry  out  the  requirements  of  that  Act. 
Now, has that been done in this area? Is there some responsibility 
on  the  people  who  are  operating  these  systems  to  comply  with  all 
these  plans?  Or  is  it  just  coordination  between  the  Federal  agen-
cies? 

Do you want to answer that, Mr. Hawley? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, please. The Toxic Inhalation Agreement I just 
mentioned is enforced with inspectors—we have 100 surface trans-
portation  inspectors—and  we  now  get  the  data.  We  talked  about, 
where  are  these  cars?  We  now  are  able  to  get  within  5  minutes 
where all the TIH cars are. And as part of the data we get, we are 
able to audit by the numbers, how much time is spent standing in 
places that we consider vulnerable. So, we actually have the actual 
data  from  the  railroads,  on  which  we  can  agree,  and  assess  their 
performance against the agreement. 

Senator STEVENS. OK, my time is up. Let me just say this in my 
state,  70  percent  of  the  communities  can  be  reached  only  by  air. 
Every  airline  passenger  pays  $2.50  to  get  on  an  airplane,  up  to 
$5.00  on  a  one-way,  up  to  $10  on  a  round-trip.  Every  single  time 
we  move  from  one  city  to  another,  we’re  paying  that.  I  don’t  see 
anything  at  all,  in  these  plans,  that  indicate  the  people  that  are 
using  these  transportation  mechanisms  are  going  to  contribute  to-
wards this security. And I think you have to face up to that. Unless 
you face up to it, you’re not going to have the money. 

Respectfully,  Mr.  Can˜ as,  you’re  not  going  to  have  money  unless 
the passengers are willing to pay something for their security. You 
cannot  rely  on  the  taxpayer  all  over  the  country  to  support  these 
rail systems. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

And I ride the Amtrak, I’ve seen the crowds in these stations, we 
all  know  that  there’s  a  substantial  problem  there.  But  we  have  to 
have  some  way  to  have  people  who  use  these  transportation  sys-
tems to contribute something towards their security. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Thune? 
Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’d like to follow up on that question of the Senator from Alaska 
as  well,  because  it  seems  to  me,  at  least,  that  this  is  a  big  issue. 
And  I  want  to  maybe  drill  down  a  little  bit  further.  But  DOT  has 
their hazmat carrier list, TSA has a No-Fly List, FBI has their list, 
and  it  would  make  sense  to  me  that  if  individuals  are  correctly  on 
the No-Fly List, then that person probably shouldn’t be authorized 
to transport hazardous material, either. 

And  I  guess,  I  would  like  to  know—how  close  are  the  Federal 
agencies  from  being  able  to  completely  synch  up  their  respective 
lists?  And  are  there  State  lists  that  ought  to  be  added  to  that,  as 
well? 

And, Ms. Berrick if, I don’t—that’s something that you probed in 

your analysis? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Thank  you.  GAO  has  done  reviews  of  the  terrorist 
watch  list,  and  have  identified  quality  issues  with  the  watch  list, 
and  we  have  reported  at  the  Terrorist  Screening  Center  who  owns 
the  Terrorist  Screening  Center  database,  the  watch  lists  are  ex-
tracted  from  that  database.  There  are  a  lot  of  efforts  underway 
doing data scrubs of the data to try to make sure there’s no dupli-
cation, and really whittle down the list to make sure it’s more accu-
rate than what it is now. 

Their—they’ve  made  a  lot  of  progress  recently,  they  still  have  a 
long  way  to  go.  But  in  terms  of  your  specific  question  on  whether 
or  not  those  lists  are  coordinated,  we  didn’t  look  into  that,  specifi-
cally. 

Senator THUNE. Anybody else care to comment on that? 
Mr. HAWLEY. I can comment on that. 
Senator THUNE. Mr. Hawley? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  They  are  coordinated,  they  are  in  one  place—the 
Terrorist  Screening  Center  is  the  place  in  the  U.S.  Government 
where  all  terrorist-related  watch  lists  are,  and  that  is  the  place 
that  we  looked.  It’s  the  place  where  everybody  in  the  community 
goes  for  watch  list  checking.  There  are  different  standards  for 
whether  somebody  can  get  a  Commercial  Driver’s  License  or  a 
hazmat endorsement, or a pilot’s license, or be able to fly, so there 
are different rules. But there’s one place where everybody has lists, 
so  we  do  not  have  the  potential  loophole  that  somebody  has  been 
identified  over  here,  and  then  gets  permission  over  here  that  they 
shouldn’t get. 

Senator  THUNE.  I  know  this  is  something  that  the  health  care 
world is trying to address. Different health care providers will have 
different software packages, but they are trying to figure out ways 
that  they  can  communicate  so  patients  have  access  to  information. 
And if patients go to a clinic somewhere else than where they live, 
that their file could be pulled up. Stakes are obviously a lot higher 
here,  because  you’re  talking  about  security.  And,  so  I’m  glad  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

hear there’s at least some central point where all of these lists get 
consolidated,  where  hopefully  there’s  not  the  duplication  that  was 
talked about earlier. 

And  I  would  ask  this  question  of  Mr.  Hawley  or  Mr.  Barrett, 
but—and  that  has  to  do  with  the  mobile  enrollment  centers  that 
are  in  place.  I’ve  heard  from  some  drivers  in  South  Dakota  that 
there  are  still  some  troubles  that  they  have,  getting  their  haz-
ardous  material  endorsement.  And,  I’m  wondering  if  there  is  any-
thing  that  can  be  done  to  expedite  that  process  for  truck  drivers 
who live in rural areas. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I’m  not  familiar  that  there  are  problems  in  South 
Dakota—I  think  the  system  overall,  at  the  national  level,  is  per-
forming  a  pretty  quick  turnaround.  And,  in  fact,  our  success  rate 
in terms of adjudicating disputes is very high. So I will, I’ll go back 
and  look  at  that,  what  the  issue  might  be  in  South  Dakota.  There 
were  some  problems  when  it  first  started  up,  but  I  think  every  bit 
of data I’ve seen recently is that the program is operating well. But 
I will go back and check. 

Senator  THUNE.  I  would  appreciate,  maybe,  if  you’d  take  a  look 

at that. 

And the final question I would direct to either Mr. Hawley or Mr. 
Boardman.  Is  there  any  information  on  how  soon  electronic  track-
ing  devices  for  cargo  shipping  containers  will  become  affordable 
enough to be used on a widespread basis? 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  I  don’t  think  we  have,  Senator,  the  exact  time-
frame  that  we  would  put  those  sensing  devices  in.  But  we’re  mak-
ing  tremendous  progress  on  the  kinds  of  things  that  we  could  add 
to trains today. 

For  example,  on  the  pneumatic  brake,  electronic  control  and 
pneumatic  braking—as  each  one  of  those  coal  trains,  for  example, 
were to be outfitted with that, there would be the ability, with the 
sensors  that  are  available,  to  provide  very  specific  and  immediate 
information. So, there are a lot of pilot things that are going on at 
this point in time, and as you’re aware, we can also do the rail side 
checking.  But,  we  think  the  sensing  devices  are  the  better  future 
for us. 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank you, panel. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
And next is Senator McCaskill. 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator MCCASKILL. A huge—oh, thank you. 
A  huge  percentage  of  our  rail  offices  across  this  country  are  un-
manned.  And  I  know,  from  personal  experience,  how  easy  it  is  to 
buy a ticket on Amtrak over the Internet and, get on the train, and 
no  one  ever  asks  you  who  you  are,  no  one  ever  touches  your  bag, 
no  one  ever  checks  to  see  if  you  are  who  you  say  you  are.  And,  I 
know,  because  my  kids  travel  all  of  the  time  on  Amtrak  in  my 
State, and the station in suburban St. Louis is unmanned. So, you 
know,  I—we  go  on  the  Internet,  it’s  very  easy  and  user-friendly, 
and  my  kids  get  on  the  train  and  off  they  go,  and  sometimes  they 
get  to  the  destination  and  no  one  ever  says,  ‘‘Boo’’  to  them  other 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

than  them  giving  the  conductor  the  confirmation  number  off  the 
Internet reservation. 

56 

I  think  that  it’s  fair  to  make  the  observation  that  so  much  of 
what  we  have  done  in  the  area  of  safety  after  the  tragedy  of  9/11 
is,  in  fact,  reactive,  as  opposed  to  proactive.  I  think,  me  giving  up 
my shampoo and my lip gel is a good example. And, the interesting 
thing  about  these  unmanned  stations  and  about  the  ease  of  travel 
without  any  kind  of  identification,  any  kind  of  checking  is—it 
would  be  one  thing  if  these  were  just  traveling  to  unpopulated 
areas.  I  mean,  those  of  us  who  represent  rural  areas  would  argue, 
we  need  to  protect  those  areas,  too.  But  this  train  goes  through 
some of the most densely populated areas of St. Louis, and onto the 
very  densely  populated  area  of  Chicago.  And,  it  seems  to  me,  that 
we  are  just  waiting  to  be  reactive  again  because  of  the  complete 
ease—why would anyone go and try to wreak havoc with a terrorist 
activity  having  to  go  through  a  station  such  as  the  one  in  New 
York,  maybe,  that  has  Transit  Authority  Police  everywhere,  that 
maybe is doing random screenings, when all they’ve got to do is go 
on  the  Internet,  hop  on  the  train  in  Kirkwood,  and  a  few  hours 
later,  they’re  in  the  middle  of  one  of  the  most  densely  populated 
areas in America. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Senator,  first  of  all,  with  Amtrak,  we  have  a  very 
close working relationship with Amtrak and we have done risk as-
sessments,  and  actually  there  is  a  requirement  for  random  I.D. 
checking.  And  we,  in  fact,  do  run  operations  with  Amtrak.  For  in-
stance, in October of 2005 in the New York threat where New York 
Transit  Authority  put  their  people  in  to  raise  the  threat  level,  to 
Amtrak, we sent in Federal people to help so there would be a bal-
anced security across the way. 

So,  we  have  done  risk  assessment  with  Amtrak,  we  do  in  fact, 
do occasional personal screening and baggage screening, and we’ve 
run ten—what we call—VIPR Teams, which are visible and unpre-
dictable  teams  of  canines,  Federal  air  marshals,  inspectors,  some 
undercover,  some  overt—that  come  up  in  random  places  that  you 
would  not  expect,  including  less  densely  populated  areas,  to  have 
that level of unpredictability. 

We  ran  ten  of  them  at  Amtrak  in  Fiscal  Year  2006,  and  so  far 
in  2007  we’ve  run  seven.  So,  we  do  have—and  maybe  you  haven’t 
seen that, and I understand it’s not statistically way up there. But 
it  is  something  that  you  cannot  count  out,  that  there  will  not  be 
a Federal air marshal team, covert, somewhere in that Amtrak en-
vironment.  We  have  a  very  close  relationship  with  Chief  Proctor, 
and  Amtrak,  we  share  secure  communications,  they  have  secure 
communications  so  we  can  talk—and  do  talk—at  the  secret  level 
with them. So, there’s more to it than meets the eye. 

Senator MCCASKILL. It seems so counter-balanced to me, though. 
It  seems  as  if  we  have  put  so  much  on  the  airlines,  and  so  little 
on  mass  transit,  and  with  all  of  our  focus  on  being  energy  inde-
pendent  and  trying  to  do  what  we  can  to  support  mass  transit  be-
cause  what  it  means  to  some  other  areas  of  public  policy  that  are 
very important. It’s ironic that people who have under gone hip re-
placement  or  knee  replacement  have  their  luggage  gone  through, 
for  example—my  mother  had  both  of  her  knees  replaced,  she  will 
never  have  a  time  that  her  carry-on  baggage  is  not  gone  through 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

in  detail,  but  yet  chances  are  really,  frankly,  like  winning  the  lot-
tery  that  you  could  get  on  a  train  in  the  United  States  of  America 
and have any kind of a second glance, whatsoever. 

And  also,  if  I  could  ask  Mr.  Hill  about  the  NAFTA  Super  High-
way—I’m  concerned  about  safety  issues  as  it  relates  to  how  it  is 
going  to  actually  be  operated,  and  this  may  not  be  within  your 
realm, but if you all have looked at this issue. You know, folks who 
live  in  Kansas  City—the  idea  that  these  trucks  are  going  to  be 
originating  in  another  country  and  are  not  going  to  have  the  kind 
of inspections, I think, most Americans expect at the border. What 
steps  are  being  taken  in  this  planning  to  assure  safety  issues  as 
it relates to the NAFTA Super Highway? 

Mr. HILL. I thank you, Senator, for that question. 
There are really a couple of issues involved there. First of all, we 
have  the  infrastructure  side  which  the  Federal  Highway  Adminis-
tration’s  trying  to  look  at  congestion  relief  and  build  major  cor-
ridors that will allow for trade to move throughout our country. 

In terms of your specific question, in terms of the safety applica-
tion—we  are  doing  two  or  three  things  that  I  would  just  highlight 
to  you.  First  of  all,  on  the  training  of  local  police  departments  in 
and around the country, we’ve been working with the International 
Association  of  Chiefs  of  Police  to  better  train—not  just  people  who 
do truck inspections—but the regular road officers who will be see-
ing  most  of  these  vehicles.  We’ve  been  putting  together  a  training 
program with them, we have thirty-three states already involved in 
that  training,  and  we’re  trying  to  make  sure  that  they  understand 
what  trucks  are  supposed  to  be  doing  on  the  highway,  and  what 
kind of safety protocols apply to trucks. 

Having come from the state police environment, and having done 
that kind of work, I know that a lot of police officers are unfamiliar 
with that terminology and protocols. So, we’re trying to make sure 
that they understand it, first of all. 

Second, we are working to make sure that all of the safety provi-
sions  are  verified  for  any  truck  that  comes  into  the  country—right 
now  they’re  limited  to  a  border  zone,  a  commercial  zone  of  20–25 
miles,  and  those  trucks  are  checked  rigorously  along  the  Southern 
border. I think last year we inspected 240,000 of the 940,000 vehi-
cles  that  crossed  at  the  southern  border.  So,  we’re  making  sure 
that  we  have  a  rigorous  safety  regime  that’s  in  place,  and  that 
we’re  following  the  requirements  set  forth  in  legislation  and  the 
2002 Appropriations Act that deals specifically with the items that 
we  deal  with—any  trucks  that  come  into  the  country  that  go  be-
yond the commercial zone. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG [presiding]. Thanks very much. 
I’m  going  to  call  on  Senator  Smith  who  is  the  Ranking  Member 

on our Subcommittee on Transportation. 

Senator Thune, you’ve already—OK. 
Senator Smith. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Senator  Lautenberg,  and  I  look  for-
ward  to  working  with  you  on  this  very  important  subcommittee.  I 
enjoy our relationship, and I know it will continue in a constructive 
way, and this surface transportation issue is very important. 

Mr.  Hawley,  can  you  tell  me  off-hand,  how  many  employees  are 

there in TSA? 

Mr. HAWLEY. A little short of 50,000. 
Senator  SMITH.  And  what  percentage  of  those  work  in  air  trans-

portation versus surface transportation. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  A  very  high  proportion,  close  to,  I’d  say,  the  high 

forties. 

Senator SMITH. The high forties—— 
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. 
Senator SMITH.—working for air? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. 
Senator  SMITH.  So,  sixty  percent,  fifty  percent  work—in  air 

transportation? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Much  more.  Much  more.  It’s—the  bulk  of  it,  the 
bulk  of  our  budget  is  in  air  transportation,  specifically  paying  the 
salaries of our TSOs. And that’s because the model is different. We 
pay  for  salaries  in  aviation—transit  systems  and  others  pay  for  it 
in the other modes. 

Senator  SMITH.  And,  the  air  transportation  is  paid  for  through 

ticket fees, I assume. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Forty percent of it. 
Senator SMITH. Forty percent of it. How many employees do you 

have working on surface transportation issues? 
Mr. HAWLEY. I’d say a little less than 1,000. 
Senator  SMITH.  And  the  funding  for  the  thousand  employees 
comes  from  general  revenues,  or  from  the  budget  we  allocate  to 
you? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Principally,  yes.  We  have  a  few  user  fees  on  some 

of our identity programs, but principally, general fund. 

Senator  SMITH.  Did  I  understand  you  to  say,  then,  that  roughly 

90 percent of your employees would be in airports? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Involved in that, yes, sir. 
Senator  SMITH.  OK.  How  do  you  make  the  segregation  between 

surface and air? Is it based just on the funding resources? 

Mr. HAWLEY. No—— 
Senator SMITH. Are we devoting enough security to rail? 
Mr. HAWLEY.—actually we are, we devote very close to the same 
attention on, at the top level, for aviation and transit, in the sense 
of  connecting  to  try  to  prevent  plots.  Because  plots  will  develop 
with  a  potential  target  in  one,  and  then  have  it  shift  to  the  other. 
So,  a  lot  of  our  effort  is  in  connecting  to  the  intel  community,  and 
the  law  enforcement  community,  generally,  and  then  moving  our 
assets  around  to  try  to  cover  plots  that  may  start  in  one  of  these 
areas, and then move to another. 

Senator  SMITH.  So,  if  you  find  out  from  Homeland  Security  or 
FBI  or  one  of  the  law  enforcement  communities  that  the  threat  is 
shifting  from  airports  to  rail,  you  have  the  flexibility  to  be  able  to 
move the assets? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  sir.  I  think  you  put  your  finger  on  a  critically 
important thing. Our ability to move assets from the aviation com-
munity  in  short  units,  you  know,  small  amounts  of  time  so  as  to 
not divert from the system, but to be able to surge in other places, 
is critical to being able to supplement the effort already being done. 
Senator  SMITH.  So,  to  Senator  McCaskill’s  question  about  not 
seeing  any  security  in  rural  rail  communities—that’s  because  you 
haven’t received any evidence that there’s a threat there? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  I  think  the  role  is  different  in  that  after 
9/11,  the  Congress—this  committee—elected  to  create  TSA  and 
have  Federal  officers  in  the  airports,  whereas  in  the  rest  of  the 
transportation  environment,  those  are  paid  for  by  other  entities. 
So,  our  job  there  is  to  connect  with  the  people  who  are  already 
there. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  would  you  come  to  us  if  you  felt  like  the 
threat  level  was  rising,  to  make  sure  we  do  have  the  needed  rail 
security in place? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  and  that’s  very  much  part  of  our  strategy,  is 
to be able to react immediately, and for instance, we can move, lit-
erally,  hundreds  and  even  thousands  of  people  in  less  than  a  day 
anywhere  in  the  United  States  to  be  able  to  respond  to  a  threat. 
So,  we  do,  in  fact,  drill  on  that.  And  if  there  were  to  be  a  specific 
threat  or  some  need  to  move,  we  can  move  very  aggressively,  very 
fast. 

Senator  SMITH.  Do  you  feel  the  intelligence  information  you’re 
getting is timely? Can move quickly enough to protect people trav-
eling on rail? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. We participate every morning in the White 
House  counter-terrorism  call  with  all  of  the  other  members  of  the 
intelligence community. And we then operationalize it before, real-
ly, the day starts. 

Senator  SMITH.  So,  that  intelligence  gathering  is  pretty  impor-

tant for you to do your job? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Critical. 
Senator SMITH. OK. 
Mr.  Boardman,  I’m  very  mindful—I  travel  the  country  and  cer-
tainly  in  my  state—that  bridges  and  tunnels  are  a  major  safety 
and  security  concern  on  the  freight  rail  system.  Many  of  these 
structures  are  very  old,  and  falling  apart,  and  thus  can  cause  sig-
nificant safety or security concerns. 

My sense is we don’t have a really good grip on it. And it is also 
my  sense  that  the  Federal  Railroad  Administration  has  only  a 
handful  of  bridge  inspectors,  the  States—for  the  most  part—have 
neither  the  authority,  or  the  money,  or  the  resources,  for  inspec-
tion,  nor  do  they  have  the  money  to  make  improvements.  Now,  I 
understand the reason for this is that most of these bridges are pri-
vately  owned,  and  I’m  just  wondering  if  we’re  getting  a  handle  on 
this,  and  if  the  States  or  you  are  working  on  this.  Do  you  see  this 
as  a  concern?  And,  I  really  want  to  know  what  the  Federal  Rail-
road Administration is doing to get ahead of the safety and security 
concerns  over  railroad  bridges  and  tunnels.  What  are  your  plans? 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  I  think,  based  on  the,  the  particular  hearing 
here  in  terms  of  security,  one  of  the  things  that  I  think  has  hap-
pened  with  all  bridges  in  all  of  the  States—whether  they  are  rail-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

low-up. 

road bridges or whether they are highway bridges is—there’s a co-
ordinating  activity  that  Mr.  Hawley  talked  about  with  local  police, 
local law enforcement folks, and with State DOTs to look for those 
bridges  that  have  threats  or  risks  that  we  need  to  protect  against. 
And  so,  in  terms  of  the  security  end  of  things,  it  kind  of  comes 
under that umbrella of what he’s looking—— 

Senator SMITH. And are you tied into the same intelligence infor-

mation as Mr. Hawley? 

Mr. BOARDMAN. Yes, we work on a regular basis, we have a full- 
time  Security  Director,  and  in  my  testimony  I  talked  about—we 
had  71  different  hazmat  inspectors  whose,  part  of  their  job  is  to 
look at the security plans. We’re working with—not only with TSA 
on security, we’re also working with all the railroad police. So, they 
also  have  their—all  of  the  freight  railroads—have  their  own  police 
departments  as  well  that  are  working  on  the  security  and  safety 
issues. 

Senator SMITH. Then, as to safety, Mr. Chairman, just a final fol-

You  know,  you  go  into  some  tunnels  and  look  at  the  ceiling,  the 
tiles  are  falling,  and  you  see  cracks  in  the  infrastructure,  and  you 
just  think,  ‘‘I  hope  it  holds  until  we  get  to  the  other  end.’’  What’s 
being  done  to  repair  these,  to  reinvest  in  them?  To  secure  them? 
Some of this infrastructure is really old and deteriorating. 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  I  think  they’re,  they’re—all  tunnels  are  in-
spected on a regular basis, and we do have older tunnels, as you’re 
really  talking  about.  Some  of  the  tunnels  are  on  a  public  transit 
system, for example, many of them in the Northeast, that are used 
both  by  commuter  railroads,  Amtrak,  and  with  the  freight  rail-
roads.  And  significant  public  dollars,  both  from  the  FTA  and  from 
Amtrak  have  been—and  from  TSA—are  invested  in  those  to  make 
improvements. 

When  you  look  at  the  private  tunnels  themselves—the  ones 
owned  by  the  freight  railroads—it  is  the  freight  railroads’  primary 
responsibility  to  make  sure  that  those  tunnels  are  safe  and  con-
tinue to be operable. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  that  they’re  not  shortchanging  the  inspec-

tion. 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Well,  I  don’t  believe  so.  But,  it’s  something  I’ll 

go back and check for you. 

Senator SMITH. I appreciate it. 
Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks. 
Senator  Klobuchar  has  asked  to  be  recognized  and  afterward, 
Senator  Carper  was  able  to  wait  his  turn.  I  left  the  room  because 
I  was  filling  in  for  our  colleague,  Senator  Johnson  at  the  Budget 
Committee, so excuse my absence. 

Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I come to the Senate as a former prosecutor, having managed an 
office of about 400 people, and having some sense of what you have 
to  deal  with,  with  priorities  and  balancing  resources,  and  people, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

and  brain  power.  And  I  know  how  difficult  that  can  be.  And  so  I 
come at this with that viewpoint as a manager. 

But also an understanding of how we have to be as sophisticated 
as  the  crooks  that  we  are  pursuing.  And,  in  my  line  of  work,  they 
went  from  using  crowbars  to  using  computers.  And  certainly  with 
the  terrorists  that  you  try  to  protect  us  from  every  day,  and  work 
on  every  day,  you  have  to  think  of  this  idea  of  adaption—that  you 
can’t put crime or terror-fighting systems into place, and then just 
put them on auto-pilot. That we have to adapt to our changing en-
vironment. 

So,  along  those  lines,  the  one  question  I’m  going  to  ask,  and  I’ll 
start  with  you,  Mr.  Hawley,  is  what  efforts  have  been  made  to 
measure the threats and to prioritize them and to assess the poten-
tial methods for meeting the threats and strategies? Along the lines 
of,  how  you  prioritize  this  and  how  you’ve  changed  along  the  last 
few years since 9/11, in terms of your strategy. 

Mr. HAWLEY. The first part of that is, we do a system-overall net-
work  look  to  assure  the  sustainability  of  the  network  itself.  So, 
whether  it’s  the  rail  system,  or  the  aviation,  or  whatever—but  the 
total network. 

Just  skipping  right  to  the  punch  line—in  this  particular  area  is 
that  toxic  inhalation  chemicals  in  rail  that  are  left  standing  unat-
tended  is  at  the  top  of  this  list.  There’s  also—just  under  that,  in 
the  transit  arena,  in  densely-populated  areas—underground  or  un-
derwater tunnels. So, those are number one and number two. 

So,  that’s  the  answer  on  the  priorities.  And  on  the  point  about 
the adaptive enemy—what we do is, in the surface arena, we have 
a  baseline  of  the  folks  who  operate  it  day-to-day  and  did  operate 
it  prior  to  9/11.  And  we  add  to  that,  our  TSA  resources  to  provide 
an  X-factor.  And  a  specific  example  of  that  is  we’ve  created  teams 
of  Federal  air  marshals,  air  inspectors  and  other  people  at  TSA 
both  undercover,  and  not  undercover,  to  run  operations  in  ferries 
and  transit  systems  in—basically  anything  you  can  imagine.  And 
we  now  run  them,  on  average,  of  more  than  one  a  week,  around 
the  country.  And,  so  that  is  something  that  nobody  knows  outside 
of  our  world,  where  they’re  going  to  be,  and  that,  we  believe,  adds 
a significant level of security, because you really can’t be sure that 
at any point in the system there’s not going to be some undercover 
Federal presence, in addition to everything else that’s on top. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK,  would  anyone  else  like  to  talk  a  little 

about this? 

Admiral BARRETT. Senator, I just want to comment. In the areas 
that we work, which are hazardous materials and pipelines, the ap-
proach we take is basically, our term is Integrity Management—ba-
sically keeping things in the containers, keeping things in the pipe. 
But  the  planning  for  that—we  expect  the  operators  to  have  a 
safety plan, augmented with the security plan we’re talking about, 
expecting  them  to  review  it  on  a  regular  basis,  and  update  it  and 
target their efforts against the most significant risks. 

I  think  the  way  forward  has  to  include  regular  reassessments  of 
the risk profiles, and proper reaction to those both by the operators 
and by the Federal, State and local agencies that deal with it. 

So, I could not agree more with you, and I think, obviously here, 
we need the flexibility to be able to do that, and as the Committee 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

and the Congress consider how to approach this issue, I would ask 
that  you  figure  ways  to  build  that  in.  And  obviously,  we’d  be  very 
glad to work with you on that. But I think you’re absolutely right. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK, thank you. 
Mr. HILL. Senator, thank you for the opportunity to comment on 

that question. 

Having  come  from  law  enforcement  and  understanding,  to  some 
extent,  the  nature  of  the  question—in  our  world,  in  the  motor  car-
rier  area,  we  believe  if  you  look  around  the  world,  that  it’s  a  vul-
nerability—it’s  been  proven  to  be  to  be  that  case  internationally. 
Our  dilemma  is,  as  a  safety  agency,  we  have  a  focus  of  trying  to 
use  our  resources  to  meet  certain  safety  goals,  so  what  we’ve  done 
is  we’ve  really  focused  it  in  the  high-risk  area  of  hazardous  mate-
rials where we believe that that threat is less consequential. 

And,  we’ve  done  a  couple  of  things—we’ve  tried  to  train  law  en-
forcement  about  what  to  look  for.  A  lot  of  the  things  that  we  find 
in  terms  of  interdictions  or  criminal  activity,  the  people  who  you 
deploy  for  those  vehicles  do  not  understand  the  regulatory  scheme 
that’s  required,  so  we  give  police  officers  the  basic  tools  they  need 
to  identify  those  things.  We’ve  found  an  amazing  number  of  those 
kinds of incidents already tied to terrorist-related activities. 

The second thing that we do is, we’ve been heavily involved with 
the  permitting  process  and  making  sure  that,  to  the  extent  in  our 
safety  mission  we  can  address  security,  we  require  companies  to 
understand there are security protocols. We don’t specify what kind 
of  plan  they  have  to  have,  but  we  say,  ‘‘You  have  to  have  a  plan 
in  place,’’  and  then  we  verify  compliance  with  it.  Those  are  two 
areas  that  we’ve  tried  to  engage  in,  in  terms  of  the  motor  carrier 
industry within our safety purview. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK, anyone else? One more? 
Ms.  BERRICK.  If  I  could  just  add  quickly,  one  of  the  areas  we  al-
ways  look  at  when  we  do  our  transportation  security  work  is  al-
ways  in  the  context  of  risk  assessments,  and  how  is  the  Federal 
Government conducting these, and how is that driving resource de-
cisions. 

In  terms  of  surface  transportation  security,  we  found  that  there 
were  a  lot  of  good  risk  assessment  efforts  going  on  within—at  the 
DHS  level,  and  administering  grants  at  TSA  level,  at  FTA  and 
FRA.  The  issue  we  talked  about,  in  our  work,  was  the  need  to  co-
ordinate  these  efforts,  as  they  were  all  doing  it  a  little  bit  dif-
ferently.  And  even  outside  of  the  transportation  sector,  DHS  was 
doing risk assessments a little bit differently. So, it was difficult to 
compare  risks  within  the  different  modes,  and  across  sectors,  be-
cause  they  didn’t  have  a  common  methodology  and  weren’t  con-
sistent.  So  that—we’ve  made  recommendations  consistently  along 
those lines, that these efforts should be coordinated, not duplicated, 
and they should be consistent as much as possible. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Very good. One more? 
Mr. BOARDMAN. Senator, I think my response fits very nicely into 
what  you  were  just  told,  because  we  think,  at  the  FRA,  that  our 
job  in  terms  of  security  is  really  led  by  the  TSA  and  their  look  at 
the  risk  threats.  We  absolutely  agree  with  them  on  hazmat,  and 
also the passenger rail issues. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

To add to it, though, that we think, and we know the TSA under-
stands  that,  as  we  look  at  safety  issues,  they’re  intertwined  to-
gether,  safety  and  security.  For  example,  if  we  are  doing  a  safety 
risk assessment—and we know that track causes a third of our ac-
cidents,  we  know  that  human  factors  cause  another  third,  and  so 
we know what the causes of the accidents are, the particular area. 
But when we look at a track, whether that track breaks because 
of overuse or poor maintenance or it’s a vandalism or it’s something 
worse,  it  can  be—we  try  to  protect  against  that,  or  a  standard 
against  it,  for  safety,  but  it  still  fits  into  looking  at  how  security 
impacts it. So, if we have a situation where we think there’s some-
thing  other  than  normal  breakage,  then  we  go  to  the  FBI,  we  re-
port  it  to  the  FBI,  we  report  it  to  TSA,  and  we  work  with  them. 
And  the  same  way  with,  as  we  look  at  passenger  rail  transpor-
tation  is  that  we’re  working  hand-in-hand  with  TSA  as  they  look 
at  piloting  and  experimenting  how  they  would  look  at  screening 
baggage, making improvements along the entire system. 

There—in  Amtrak  there  are  over  500  stations  in  46  States.  And 
I  think  your  associate  Senator,  who  left  us  at  this  point  in  time, 
really  understands  that  in  many  of  those  areas  that  are  very 
small—their, it’s their only linkage to public transportation and the 
risk  assessment  there  is  very  different  than  it  is  at  Penn  Station. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  understand.  And,  I  just  think  the  impor-
tance which you brought up of trying to coordinate this, across the 
transportation  lines,  is  so  important.  I  know  we’ve  done  that  a  lot 
with  law  enforcement,  and  have  had  some  very  good  results  when 
we put the resources where we see the risks. Thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Senator Klobuchar. 
STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator CARPER. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
To  our  witnesses,  welcome,  thank  you  for  coming  today  for  your 

service, and for responding to our questions. 

I’m going to ask my first question, then I’m going to make a brief 
statement  and  while  I  make  the  brief  statement,  you  can  think 
about how to answer the question, if you will. 

The question I’m going to ask deals with technology, and how it’s 
better to use technology to protect us in our various sectors wheth-
er  it’s  rail,  interstate  passenger  air,  whether  it’s  transit,  whether 
it’s  surface  transportation,  whatever,  pipelines,  whatever  it  might 
be. So, think about that. 

Senator  Lautenberg  remembers,  and  my  Democratic  colleagues 
remember—almost  2  weeks  ago  we  had  a  one-day  Democratic  re-
treat  on  the  Hill  for  Democratic  Senators—and  among  our  guests 
that day were former Senate majority leader, George Mitchell, and 
a  former  President,  Bill  Clinton.  They  spoke  separately,  and  we 
had  an  opportunity  to  talk  with  them  and  to  exchange  ideas  and 
to ask questions. 

Ironically, one of the things that both of them talked a good deal 
about with respect to, to terrorism, tamping down the threat of ter-
rorism, wasn’t so much the—what we’re doing on these fronts. 

We  talked  about  the  Middle  East,  we  talked  about  the  need  to 
get  serious  about  a  two-state  solution  in  Israel  between  Israelis 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

and the Palestinians. And they both pretty much said, to the extent 
that  we  don’t  make  progress  there,  or  they  don’t  make  much 
progress, ‘‘it really heightens the threat of terrorist attacks against 
us here and around the world.’’ 

I  thought  there  was  a  lot  of  wisdom  with  what  they  said.  And 
while  it’s  important  for  us  to  seriously  engage  in  all  of  the  areas 
that we’re discussing here, I think it’s also important for us to keep 
in  mind  that  this  is  a—this  battle  is  going  to  be  one—many 
fronts—and the one that they brought to our attention is certainly 
a big one. 

About  a—maybe  a  year  and  a  half  ago,  I  had  lunch  with  Presi-
dent  ABBAS,  it  was  like  5  months  after  he’d  been  elected—Presi-
dent  of  the  Palestinians,  Palestinian  Authority.  And  he’d  been  in 
office  5  months,  and  he  had  lunch  with  several  of  us  here  on  the 
Hill.  One  of  the  questions  I  asked  him  was,  ‘‘When  do  you  think 
we  ought  to  put  a  full-time  envoy  just  to  work  on,  focus  on  like  a 
laser  on  getting  a  two-state  solution  in  the  Middle  East?’’  And  he 
said,  ‘‘Five  months  ago.’’  And  that  was  in  June  of  2005.  Five 
months after his election, we still haven’t really engaged seriously. 
While  it’s  important  we  do  this,  and  spend  a  lot  of  money  to  try 
to  protect  ourselves  and  our  people,  it’s  also  important  that  we  at-
tack on that front, as well. It’s not the topic of today’s hearing, but 
I  always  like  to  preface  a  conversation  like  this  by  reminding  us 
that  the  best  defense  is  a  good  offense,  and  that  offense  includes 
a diplomatic offensive. 

Having  said  that,  let’s  go  to  my  question—my  question,  again, 
was  technology.  We’re  aware  of  the  technology  that  we’re  using 
every time we get on an airplane to try to make us safe—let’s talk 
about the technology that’s being deployed with respect to, with the 
transit  rail,  whether  it’s  interstate  passenger  rail,  whether  it’s 
highways,  whether  it’s  our  pipelines—I  don’t  care  who  starts  first. 

Mr., is it Can˜ as? 
Mr. CAN˜ AS. Yes, sir. 
Senator CARPER. Mr. Can˜ as, we’ll go first to you. 
Mr.  CAN˜ AS.  I  thought  I  was  going  to  leave  unscathed,  Senator. 
Senator CARPER. You’ll still be unscathed, I promise. 
Mr.  CAN˜ AS.  No,  I’ve  been  paying  attention,  because  I  did  hear 
that  DHS  places  a—underwater  tunnels  and  urban  populations  on 
a  high  priority,  and  everybody  knows  we  have  four  of  them  in  our 
area, and so, we’re very sensitive to that. 

But on the technology side, I just want to applaud other peoples’ 
comments  about  putting  more  on  the  transit  side,  on  the  surface 
transit than on the air. Clearly, we’re up to speed on air, we’re not 
up to speed on the surface. 

We  don’t  deploy  our  technology,  it’s  pretty  rudimentary,  we’re 
using canine units, we’re using the lotto searches here to deter. But 
as  far  as  the  technology  we’ve  seen  mainly  from  DHS-deployed  in 
train  stations  and  in  bus  stations,  it  still  seems  like  it  needs  a  lot 
of development before—and it sounds like it’s very expensive. 

The latest, which we’ve deployed over the Exchange Plaza in Jer-
sey  City  is  extremely  sophisticated  and  very  well-received,  except 
it requires two—at least two to five seconds for every passenger to 
go  through  there  to  be  read.  And  that’s  enough  to  create  a  bottle-
neck  that  is  unacceptable  to  ‘‘mass  transit.’’  So,  in  that  regard,  I 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

think  the  technology  is  a  little  bit  behind—I  don’t  know  if  it  may 
exist,  but  we  certainly  welcome  anything  that  would  assist  us  in 
the mass transit security. 

Senator  CARPER.  All  right.  Let’s  just  come  this  way—I  don’t 
know  if  you  have  a—from  GAO’s  perspective,  I  don’t  know  if  this 
is the—what you guys focus on. 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Sure,  I  would  like  to  make  a  point  about  tech-
nology,  and  I’ll  leave  the  specific  programs  to  the  panel  members 
who are more knowledgeable about that. 

But, in terms of technology, we actually visited foreign countries 
in  Europe  and  Asia  to  see  the  security  practices  they  were  using 
to secure their rail systems—— 
Senator CARPER. Which ones? 
Ms.  BERRICK.  There  were  about  10  different  countries.  And  I 
think  tying  that  to  the  results  might  make  that  sensitive  informa-
tion, but I can provide that to you separately. 

Senator CARPER. All right, thanks. 
Ms.  BERRICK.  One  of  the  areas  that  we  found  that  was  being 
used in some foreign countries, but isn’t done here to the same de-
gree  in  the  U.S.,  is  the  government  having  a  centralized  clearing-
house  of  technologies.  I  mean,  even  if  the  Government  wasn’t  pur-
suing  the  R&D  itself,  if  it’s  something  the  private  sector  had 
done—at  least  they  would  have  a  listing  of  what  they  felt  was  ef-
fective,  and  they  could  point  rail  operators  in  the  right  direction, 
or in a direction related to good technologies that they should con-
sider. 

Because  one  of  the  points  we  heard  from  rail  operators  in  the 
United  States  was  that  they  wanted  to  know  more  about  tech-
nology. So, that was one of the practices we highlighted. 

In terms of another innovative-type technology—— 
Senator CARPER. Sounds like a pretty good idea. 
Ms. BERRICK. Yes, yes. Another innovative-type technology that’s 
being  used  in  some  foreign  countries—we  found  one  rail  operator 
in  the  U.S.  that  was  doing  it,  but  not  to  a  great  degree—is  what’s 
called  smart  CCTV  cameras.  And  this  is  where  the  camera—it 
doesn’t have to be monitored by a person, but it will pick up anom-
alies or certain behavior. For example, if a boat were parked under 
a  bridge,  it  would  signal  and  alarm  someone  that  they  need  to 
come  look  at  the  camera,  because  this  is  abnormal,  or  if  someone 
drops  off  a  bag  and  walks  away,  and  doesn’t  take  the  bag  with 
them. 

So,  we’ve  identified  some  of  those  innovative  practices  that  are 
used  in  foreign  countries  that  should  be  considered  for  use  in  the 
U.S. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Admiral BARRETT. Senator—— 
Senator CARPER. Admiral? 
Admiral  BARRETT.  I—two  comments.  One,  on  a  small  scale  we— 
under  our  Hazardous  Materials  Cooperative  Research  Program, 
which is run by the Transportation Research Board of the National 
Academies,  we  do  have  a  project  looking  at  emerging  technologies 
that are applicable to hazmat safety and security. And we’re moni-
toring  that  closely.  But  we’re  trying  to  engage  the  National  Acad-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

emies  in  terms  of  identifying  technologies  that  may  be  emerging 
that can provide a benefit. 

And I think another indicator of the improving—and improved— 
coordination  with  TSA,  with  Mr.  Hawley,  the  joint  work  group 
we’ve  got  set  up—one  of  the  target  areas  that  we’re  looking  at  in 
that  group  is  research  and  development,  to  kind  of  collectively  fig-
ure  out—given  what  we  know  about  risks  and  system  operation— 
where  either  agency  might  be  well  served  to  target  research  and 
development efforts in the technology areas. 

Senator CARPER. Thanks. 
Mr. Hill? 
Mr. HILL. Thank you, Senator. Just one point—in your proposed 
legislation, you talked about the field operations test that was con-
ducted  by  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration,  and  I 
would  just  highlight  to  you,  that’s  one  example  that  we’ve  been 
looking  at,  different  technologies.  The  industry’s  quite  vast,  for  ex-
ample, 1.2 million hazmat loads move daily in this country just by 
surface transportation. 

And so, back in 2004, we tried to work very closely with DHS in 
developing  some  of  these  technologies  in  a  field  environment  and 
see, what does work? We looked at everything from cargo tracking, 
to  panic  alarms,  disabling  technologies,  things  that  would  allow 
there to be some way to terminate the terrorist-related event if we 
saw  it  happening.  And  then  we  implemented  a  public-sector  re-
sponse  center  concept,  where  we  worked  with  four  States,  so  that 
the information from the technology was reported back to a center. 
We  did  that  study,  we  found,  very  interestingly—the  companies 
who  adopted  it  found  cost  savings,  in  addition  to  the  security  fea-
tures.  In  other  words,  it  helped  them  do  business  better,  it  helped 
them  keep  track  of  their  loads,  and  so  they  were  able  to  manage 
the  process.  So,  we  think  there  are  ancillary  benefits  to  applying 
security technologies. 

And  then  last,  I  would  say,  that  we  work  very  closely  by  pro-
viding  that  with  DHS,  and  they’re  continuing  on  with  those  kind 
of studies, and we’re excited about being able to pursue that in this 
legislation. 

Senator CARPER. Thanks. 
Mr. Boardman? 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I’m  just  going  to  tick  off 
what we’re doing technology-wise. It’s—I think we have a real good 
list here, we do automatic track inspection, and we’ve got four cars 
out there now doing it. 

We’re adapting that to the high railers for the freight operations 
which  inspect  cracks  on  joint  bars.  We  have  a  new  cooperative 
agreement, that we announced just this past week, with the Union 
Pacific  Railroad,  Dow  Chemical  and  Union  Tank  Car  to  use  the 
most modern technology for our new tank car standard that we ex-
pect to have in place by January of next year. 

We  have  an  approval  now  of  an  operating  positive  train  control 
with  a  freight  railroad  with  BNSF’s  system  being  approved.  We 
have  a  report  that  has  been  issued,  and  we’ve  got  a  lot  of  support 
for  electronic-controlled  pneumatic  brakes,  which  will  make—not 
only improvements for us on safety—but it’ll also be a security en-
hancement as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

We  have—the  railroad  systems  themselves,  combining  all  of  the 

radio systems into one operable, interoperable system. 

We have a transportation and technology center in Pueblo, Colo-
rado that we meet—use extensively, and completed a crash energy 
management  system,  which  will  help  us  in  survivability.  We  have 
a  trio  workforce  today,  where  all  of  our  inspectors  in  the  field  are 
being  deployed  with  the  highest  technology  that’s  available  today 
for communication and inspection. 

And, I’ve just got a couple more, Mr. Chairman, we have—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, if they are a couple quick ones, fine, 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  We  have  a—what  I  think  is  not  necessarily  a 
high-tech tech, but we have very good information today on fatigue 
management, and how we can work with railroads to have an alert 
operator, which is a key element of security. 

Thank you. 
Senator CARPER. But other than that? But other than that? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Carper, 

but—— 

thank you. 

in closing, very quickly? 

Senator  CARPER.  Mr.  Chairman?  Can  I  just  say  one  quick  thing 

Mr. Can˜ as said earlier there is a vast gap between what we need 
to  do,  and  the  resources  with  which  we  have  to  address  these 
threats.  And  I  think  we’ve  already  heard  today,  just  in  the  last  5 
minutes, a pretty good demonstration of how we can better address 
those  threats  by  using  technology.  And,  frankly  I’m  encouraged  by 
what I’ve heard. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Carper. 
You  and  I  have  a  very  active,  and  deep  interest  in  what  happens 
with our rail systems, it’s crucial to our states’ functioning. So, we 
thank you for your participation. 

And  I  want  to  review  a  couple  of  things,  and  again,  I’m  sorry 
that I had to leave for a bit, but it was necessary. So, I’ll just keep 
you a few minutes more, and watch my own clock as I do it. 

Mr. Hawley, your agency’s proposal last month barely addressed 
the  many  security  needs  of  passenger  rail  stations  and  critical  in-
frastructure—bridges,  tunnels,  and  I,  frankly,  can’t  figure  out 
what—when  we  look  at  rail  compared  to  aviation  and,  I  think  you 
said  that  40–60  percent  of  the  funds  for  security  in  aviation  came 
from general funds of the Government. Was that correct? 

Mr. HAWLEY. For aviation? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. For aviation, yes. And that was something 
around  $4.7  billion  spent  on  security.  And,  here  every  day,  about 
5 times the number of people who fly get on trains. So, we’re look-
ing  at  a  total  imbalance  here  in  terms  of  the  funding  that’s  avail-
able.  I  think  that  if  we  look  at  what  goes  to  rail  as  a  total  of—be-
tween grants, and TSA, $37 million, about $212 million. Compared 
to the numbers of people who get on a train, and we’ve heard about 
the inadequacy of lots of rail tunnels—I used to be a Commissioner 
of  the  Port  Authority  of  New  York  and  New  Jersey  before  I  came 
to the Senate, and one of the first things I did was have a personal 
inspection  of  the  tunnels.  I  went  through  there—scary  as  it  was, 
because  those  envelopes  are  really  tight—and  found  all  kinds  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

problems with locked doors for safety exits, et cetera, poor electrical 
systems,  lights  would  go  out  very  quickly,  very  easily,  with  anti-
quated systems. 

So, when we—I looked at where we’re going, what’s the justifica-
tion?  I  think  that  you  said  you  thought  the  funds  that  were  avail-
able  were  adequate  for  rail,  do  I  characterize  what  you  said  cor-
rectly? 

Mr. HAWLEY. For this year’s budget—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. For rail security? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.—for  what  we  are  doing.  I’d  like  to  elaborate  on 

that when I get a—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, please do. 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  OK.  So,  the  two  top  priorities  and—as  you  men-
tioned—the  underground  tunnels  would  be  number  one,  and  the 
number  two  one  is  the  toxic  inhalation.  And,  so  what  we  did,  on 
the  risk  basis,  was  say,  ‘‘OK,  those  are  the  top  two  things,  how  do 
we get at them? And, where does the money come from?’’ 

And  the  first  one,  in  the  transit  environment  is  the  grant  pro-

gram. And, I’ll come back to that in a second—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Please do. 
Mr.  HAWLEY.—because,  I  think  you  really  wanted  to  get  to  the 
rail piece. And so, what we looked at—we said, ‘‘OK, how do we at-
tack  this  problem?’’  And  we  said,  ‘‘What  are  we  most  worried 
about?’’  And  we  said,  ‘‘It’s  the  really  bad  TIH,  when  it  gets  in  an 
urban  environment,  and  when  it  stops  and  is  unattended.’’  So,  we 
did all the risks, and we came down to and said, ‘‘That is the piece 
we want to stop.’’ Because, when it’s moving, it’s a hard target, it’s 
unpredictable, et cetera, et cetera. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  How  much  was  devoted  to  that,  Mr. 

Hawley? 

short train ride. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well, I’m going to get to that—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Please  do,  so  that  we  can  make  this  a 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. So what we did is we said to the railroads, 
‘‘How  do  we  get  those  cars  out  of  that  situation?  How  do  we  make 
sure  that  there  just  aren’t  cars  sitting  in  that  situation?’’  So,  that 
is  where  we  went,  to  work  with  the  railroads  to  get  them  to  keep 
their  cars,  either  attended,  or  out  of  these  high-threat  areas.  And 
that’s  not  something  where  we  have  to  spend  Federal  dollars  to 
build fences, or whatever. But it does accomplish the security goal. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  I’m  not  satisfied,  very  frankly  with 
your answer. I don’t see us focusing as much as we should on pro-
tecting our citizens in the country, by a long shot. We spent, so far, 
in  Iraq,  $300  billion,  plus  $100  billion  more  expected  in  the  next 
few  weeks,  and  that  is  not  including  the  amounts  that  are  spent 
for security throughout the country. 

You  go  to  commercial  buildings,  you  go  to  all  kinds  of  places, 
where  money  is  spent  to  protect  security.  And  here,  we  have  sev-
eral  billion  people  a  year  riding  in  passenger  rail  trains,  and  the 
money  that  we’re  spending  is  barely  a  blip  on  the  screen.  So,  I 
think  what’s  happening  is  we  are  not  paying  enough  attention  to 
this.  And  I  hear  you  defend  and  support  what  you’re  doing,  and  I 
admire  it.  I  know  you  work  hard  at  the  job.  But,  we  just  aren’t 
meeting the test. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

And, when the question, Mr. Can˜ as, came up—I understand from 
another  Senator—about  how  these  expenses  were  going  to  be  met. 
Well,  there  are  sources  that  are  available,  obviously,  for  other 
kinds  of  security.  Why  is  one  kind  of  security  more  important—in 
terms of lifesaving—than another? To do whatever we can? 

We—it’s  really  quite  interesting  to  see  that  the  number  of  inci-
dents  that  are  directed  against  rail  systems,  ‘‘Estimated  one-third 
of  terrorist  attacks  around  the  world  repeatedly—reportedly, 
sorry—target  transportation.’’  The  majority  of  these  attacks  are 
against  public  transportation  systems,  including  rail.  The  vulner-
ability of surface transportation sector is demonstrated. 

There was a Mineta Transportation Institute report that surface 
transportation  systems  were  the  target  of  more  than  195  inter-
national  terrorist  attacks  between  1997  and  2000.  What  does  that 
tell  us?  Have  we  been  lucky  that  worse  things  haven’t  happened 
with our system over these years? 

So,  I  think  we  ought  to  get  with  the  drill.  For  instance,  Mr. 
Hawley, your Department failed to meet one of the few trucking se-
curity  requirements  of  last  year’s  SAFE  Port  Act.  There  was  a  90- 
day deadline that was just passed, for the implementation of a pro-
gram  that  required  DHS  to  check  the  names  of  truck  drivers  with 
access  to  secure  areas  of  the  ports  against  the  terror  watch  lists, 
and for citizenship status. Why wasn’t it done? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  The  technical  systems  we  talked  about  earlier  in 
the hearing—some of the technical systems don’t talk automatically 
to  each  other.  And  the  approach  that  we’re  taking  is  that—rather 
than  try  to  figure  out  who’s  driving  into  this  port  or  that  port—to 
look at the entire CDL, the Commercial Driver’s License population 
and  do  a  much  broader  threat  assessment  for  that  population, 
versus  the  more  limited  population.  In  other  words,  it  costs  more 
to  try  to  separate  out  which  ones  are  going  to  which  port,  than  it 
is to do the entire set of the drivers. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  What  comes  first,  Mr.  Hawley—in  this 
case,  chicken/egg  kind  of  reference—the  safety  of  our  delicate 
areas,  good  targets  for  terrorism?  Or,  to  make  a  decision  about 
whether  or  not  it’s  going  to  include  a  large  system  that  will  cost 
less, and so forth, and meanwhile—I don’t want to be the one that 
is to the citizens of the State of New Jersey, ‘‘You live in the—those 
who live in the most dangerous two-mile stretch,’’ or near the two- 
mile stretch that says the worst area for terrorists, the most invit-
ing target area for terrorists—and it’s largely chemicals and trans-
portation  to  one  another,  and  to  say  to  them,  ‘‘Look,  we’re  still  de-
vising a grand scheme.’’ 

I  think,  Mr.  Hawley,  when  it’s—when  there’s  an  instruction  by 
the  Congress,  by  the  Senate  to  do  something  in  90  days  that  it’s 
not  sufficient  to  say,  ‘‘Well,  we’re  looking  at  a  larger  system.’’  At 
that  time,  you  should  have—I  think  someone  should  have  said,  ‘‘It 
can’t  be  done.’’  So,  let’s  not  trifle  with  a  deadline  that  has  no  sig-
nificance.  Just  ignoring  it  is  not  satisfactory,  as  far  as  I’m  con-
cerned. 

Mr. Boardman, perhaps you can answer. When will the Adminis-
tration  request  funding  to  address  some  of  these  rail  tunnel  im-
provements  along  the  Northeast  Corridor?  We  need  to,  to  do  it  to 
safely  evacuate  people  in  the  event—and  I  know  you’ve  discussed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

it with Senator Carper in some detail—but it’d be interesting to me 
to—we acknowledge that the problem, potentially, of enormous pro-
portion  exists  there?  But  when  will  the  Administration  say,  ‘‘You 
know, we agree enough that we want to put some funds into that.’’ 
What  do  we  have  to  do  to  sound  the  alarm  loudly  enough  to  get 
some attention? 

Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Senator,  I  understand  the  issue.  And  certainly 
with  you  being  a  member  of  the  Port  Authority  Board  in  the  past, 
and  I  myself  have  spent  some  time  in  the  PATH  tunnels  and  also 
the site access project. 

And,  one  of  the  things  that  I  was  impressed  about  as  I  worked 
on  another  issue  for,  just  this  past  year,  was  the—which  was  the 
commuter  fee  issue,  if  you  remember  that.  And,  looking  at  the  in-
vestments  that  were  being  made  by  commuter  railroads  on  the 
Northeast  Corridor  that  were  beneficial  to  Amtrak.  And  I  think 
east-side access is a good example of the amount of money that the 
transit  side  of  the  DOT  is  actually  putting  in  to  finish  off  that 
project, and make those safety improvements. 

And New Jersey Transit is also making a significant investment 
in the tunnels under the Hudson River. I know they want to make 
a  much  more  significant  investment  on  the  Trans-Hudson  Express 
Tunnels, which would be a—an entirely two different new tubes. 

Amtrak  has  funded  about  $500  million  a  year  for  capital,  or  at 
least  that’s  the  number  that’s  used  for  capital.  And  we  think  that 
Amtrak  can  spend  between  $3  million  and  $5  million  a  year  along 
the Corridor on capital improvements. 

Some of those tunnels that are along the Corridor are not in New 
York  and  New  Jersey,  but  they’re  the  Baltimore  Tunnel  and  some 
of  the  other  facilities,  and  they  need  substantial  investments—not 
just  for  safety  and  health,  but  also  for  improvements—especially 
with the electrical system, and those kinds of things. 

I  think—one  of  the  things  Mr.  Hawley  said  earlier—and  I’m  not 
going  to  dump  him  back  into  the  issue  here—is  that  there  are  dif-
ferent models that are being used for the different systems that we 
operate  under.  And  the  transit  model  grew  up  very  differently— 
and  I  grew  up  with  it,  with  different  committees,  and  how  it  was 
financed,  and  how  it  was  going  to  be  funded,  from  what  Amtrak 
is  funded,  for  inter-city  rail.  And  I  think  that  there  has  been  a 
need,  because  of  the  demand—and  you’ve  identified  it—to  have 
them  become  more  cooperative,  especially  in  the  Northeast  Cor-
ridor,  in  order  to  meet  the  demands  of  the  capacity,  and  to  make 
the improvements. 

I  think  the  Administration—the  previous  one,  this  one—have 
been  trying  to  make  those  investments,  full-funding  grant  agree-
ments, and other things, to make the improvements that are need-
ed. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  think  they  have  to  try  harder,  Mr. 

Boardman. 

I  have  several  other  questions,  but  I  know  you’ve  been  here  a 

long time, and I greatly appreciate it. 

I  would  ask  Admiral  Barrett  about  the  motor  carriers  and  the— 
how well are they doing, complying with the security plan require-
ment of your hazardous materials rules? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Senator,  I  think  they  are  doing  better  all  of 
the  time—I’ll  defer  to  John,  he  does  more  inspections  there  than 
I do—I think we did about 5,500 in the last couple of years, you’ve 
done  a  lot  more  than  that.  My  sense  is  better  that  John,  that  you 
can—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Hill? 
Mr.  HILL.  We  check  compliance  with  the  security  provisions 
through  our  compliance  review  process,  so  we  don’t  really  do  that 
at  the  road  side.  So,  we  do  a  lot  of  roadside  inspections—about  3 
million a year—of which hazardous material are a portion of them. 
But  the  compliance  review  process  is  something  that’s  a  little  bit 
more time-consuming. 

To  answer  your  specific  question:  We  did  4,000—we’ve  done 
4,000  of  those  specific  contact  reviews  to  determine  compliance 
with  security.  And  we’ve  issued  about  10  percent  rate  of  civil  pen-
alties. So, about 400 instances where they just failed to train their 
people in security awareness, or they have not put together a plan 
as they should. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Once  again,  all  these  tasks  are  in  front  of 
us, and though it’s difficult to cover them all, the fact of the matter 
is  we  have  enormous  responsibility.  We  talked  about  the  terrorist 
threat, about the possibility of accidents from hazardous cargo, and 
we  just  have  to  do  it,  in  good  conscience,  for  the  sake  of  our  citi-
zenry. 

Mr.  Can˜ as,  you  had  a  recent  proposal  to  pre-empt  States,  local-
ities  and  towns  from  protecting  themselves  for—from  the  risk  of 
hazardous  material  shipments,  and  would  require  rail  carriers  to 
evaluate  the  current  routes  that  they  use,  and  only—and  I  quote 
you—‘‘the next-most commercially practical routes.’’ 

Now, I’ve noticed that within a very short distance of this build-
ing,  this  Capitol,  this—the  center  of  Government,  you  see  trains 
going  by  very  closely.  And  I  don’t  know  what  they’re  carrying,  but 
I guess I’m looking at them now with a different view than I might 
have because of the recognition that hazardous materials are often 
carried  there.  And  if  someone  wanted  to  have  an  attack  where  it 
could  do  a  lot  of  damage,  it  would  be  right  there—this  proximity 
of the rail track to the Capitol is excessively close. So, what do we 
do about current routes, and alternatives? 

Mr.  CAN˜ AS.  Well,  as  you  know,  Senator,  New  Jersey  is  an  end- 
user  for  a  lot  of  this  TIH  that’s  railed  into  our  State,  so  it’s  not  a 
question of re-routing in New Jersey. In this area, there is a ques-
tion—probably  other  panelists  can  address  better  as  to  what  the 
progress is on that. 

I would only comment this far, to say that we need to engage the 
private  sector  more  in  this—not  only  to  address  Senator  Stevens’ 
concern  about  who  pays  for  some  of  this  oversight—but  also  to, 
they  have  a  lot  of  the  tools  already  in  place.  They  can  tell  us—if 
they wish to—where these TIH cars are at any given time, I’m told. 
Having this capability is extremely important for the security agen-
cies.  And,  I’m  also  told  by  certain  companies  that  they’re  prepared 
to share that. 

Knowing that, ahead of time, we can preposition our response. If 
we  know  that  these  cars—and  we  can  spot-check—are  not  along 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

sidings,  or  in  certain  yards,  then  using  the  risk-based  model,  we 
apply our resources where we feel the risk is greater. 

So, having that ability, I believe, is extremely important. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  Mr.  Boardman  confirmed  that,  and 
your commentary—I would ask one last question, and mention that 
we’re  going  to  keep  the  record  open  for  questions  if  we  submit 
them—can submit them in writing to you. 

Mr.  Can˜ as,  you’re  in  charge  of  our  State’s  homeland  security  ef-
forts.  How  do  you  rate  the  support  and  cooperation  you  receive 
from  TSA,  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  and—be  careful  of 
your language in this response. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  CAN˜ AS.  I—well,  you  know,  Senator—with  all  due  respect  to 
my  Federal  colleagues  here,  I  did  spend  almost  30  years  in  the 
Federal system, so it does sound like heresy when I said that I dis-
agree  with  some  of  the  comments.  I  think,  for  example,  I  heard 
that our intelligence is better, and getting better, and the informa-
tion  sharing.  I  think  that’s  true—from  the  top  down—I  don’t  be-
lieve,  however,  that  I  agree  that  our  risk-base  should  be  deter-
mined by Federal intelligence. I worked with them a long time, and 
as good as they are, and as great as they are—they really can’t tell 
us down at the local level what our needs are. 

I  think  that  we’re—right  now,  we’re  in  the  situation  of  home- 
grown terrorism, of lone wolves, even criminals, that can endanger 
us.  And  that  type  of  information  really  has  to  be  developed  from 
the ground up. And DHS has a—I would rate them mixed. They’ve 
heard  us  with  diffusion  centers,  they’re  sending  people  out  to  try 
to  obtain  local  information  to  feed  into  the  national  hoppers,  and 
I  commend  them  for  that.  It’s  something  we,  of  course,  recog-
nized—and anyone who’s worked at the State and local level knows 
that all risks and all emergencies—like all politics—is local. And it 
starts at the local basis. We need to start there. And, I think, syn-
thesizing that information is very important. 

So,  I  disagree  that  the  information  we’re  receiving  from  DHS  is 
very  germane  to  what  we  need  inside  the  States  to—so  I  think— 
but they’ve heard us, that’s the good news. 

I  can  also  attest  that,  I’m—our  office  is  new  in  New  Jersey,  as 
well,  so  I  sympathize  with  the  growing  pains  that  DHS  and  TSA 
have. They are a relatively new agency in the Federal system, and 
I think they get mixed marks, but it’s a start-up. They’ve matured, 
I  believe,  they’re—just  the  fact  that  this  year  they  recognized  that 
New  Jersey  and  New  York  really  have  the  same  risk,  which  Sec-
retary Chertoff recently announced. We’ve been saying it all along, 
this is good. They recognize we’re contiguous areas. 

So, I see flashes of brilliance at times, and other times I see that 

we’re stuck in the same old business. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Did  you  want  to  sign  where  the  flashes  of 

brilliance are? I won’t ask you that. 

We’re going to be adjourning, I want to let the record reflect the 
statement  that  Senator  McCain  has  put  in—wants  put  in  the 
record, and we’ll see that that is done. 

The  next  Commerce  Committee  hearing  will  be  at  10  a.m.,  on 
Wednesday, January 24 on the state of the airline industry, the po-
tential impact of airline mergers, and industry consolidation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

And,  I  want  to  thank  all  of  you.  While  there  is,  perhaps,  dis-
agreement  on  subjects  that,  specific  things—it  doesn’t  mean  that 
there  isn’t  a  deep  appreciation,  Mr.  Hawley—and  all  of  you—for 
the work you do, that you attempt to do—we’ve given you huge as-
signments. Our world was turned around a half a dozen years ago, 
and  it’s—we’ve  got  to  react  to  reality.  And  in  doing  that,  it’s  very 
hard,  because  I  know  each  and  every  one  of  you  is  just  as  anxious 
to get the job done as I am. I hold no prior position. 

So, I thank you very much, this hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:04 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Last year, this Committee’s bipartisan efforts strengthened the security of our Na-
tion’s  ports  and  maritime  vessels,  with  the  passage  of  the  SAFE  Port  Act,  which 
began a new era in maritime security. Despite this monumental effort, we only com-
pleted a third of our job because the final version of the bill failed to include Senate- 
passed provisions to strengthen rail and surface transportation security. 

This Committee remains committed, through its leadership and expertise on these 
important  issues,  to  enacting  legislation  this  session  that  would  strengthen  the  se-
curity of our railroads, trucks, intercity buses and pipelines. 

Toward  this  end,  I,  along  with  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Senators  Lautenberg, 
Rockefeller,  Kerry,  Dorgan,  Boxer,  Snowe,  Pryor,  Carper,  and  others,  introduced  S. 
184,  the  Surface  Transportation  and  Rail  Security  Act  of  2007,  also  known  as  the 
STARS  Act,  on  January  4,  2007.  This  bill  includes  the  rail  and  surface  transpor-
tation security provisions from the Senate-passed SAFE Port Act, offering Congress 
a second chance to enact a comprehensive transportation security bill. 

The  Administration  witnesses  will  testify  this  morning  about  S.  184  as  well  as 
about their current efforts to strengthen surface transportation security in the void 
of  Congressional  direction.  By  bringing  all  the  Federal  agencies  with  significant  re-
sponsibility  for  surface  transportation  security  together  at  this  hearing,  the  Com-
mittee is seeking to gain a complete understanding of what each agency has accom-
plished, and what remains to be done. 

The  attacks  on  critical  surface  transportation  systems  in  Madrid  and  London  are 
a  constant  reminder  of  what  can  happen  in  our  communities  if  we  fail  to  act 
promptly and effectively. We must address the vulnerabilities and risks facing these 
systems  here  at  home  in  a  comprehensive  and  coordinated  way  before  we  become 
the next victim of a successful attack. 

The  provisions  in  S.  184  were  endorsed  unanimously  by  the  Senate  in  the  109th 
Congress,  as  well  as  by  industry  and  labor.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  all  the 
members of the Commerce Committee, particularly Senators Lautenberg and Smith, 
the Chairman and Ranking Member, respectively, of the Surface Transportation and 
Merchant Marine Infrastructure, Safety, and Security Subcommittee, to perfect and 
enact this legislation as soon as possible. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN, U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman.  This  Committee  has  the  important  responsibility  of 
overseeing the security of our Nation’s transportation system, including its railways. 
I  think  all  of  us  on  the  Committee  have  repeatedly  expressed  our  shared  support 
for  greater  Federal  attention  and  resources  to  rail  and  transit  security,  and  I  ap-
plaud the Chairman for holding today’s hearing. 

Both Chairman Inouye and I introduced versions of rail security legislation on the 
opening  day  of  the  110th  Congress.  While  our  bills  may  differ  slightly,  our  goal  is 
the  same.  The  Senate  has  repeatedly  approved  rail  security  legislation,  and  I  am 
confident we will again in the near future. Unfortunately, the House of Representa-
tives  has  refused  to  act  on  rail  security  legislation  during  past  Congressional  ses-
sions.  I  remain  hopeful  that  rail  security  will  be  made  a  top  priority  for  the  110th 
Congress and the Administration. 

Mr.  Chairman.  we  have  taken  important  steps  and  expended  considerable  re-
sources  to  secure  the  homeland  since  9/11.  I  think  all  would  agree  that  air  travel 
is safer than it was 5 years ago. During the last Congress. we addressed port secu-
rity  in  a  comprehensive  manner.  However,  we  have  more  to  do  when  it  comes  to 
other transportation modes, a fact well documented by the 9/11 Commission. Unfor-
tunately, only relatively modest resources have been dedicated to rail security in re-
cent  years.  As  a  result,  our  Nation’s  transit  system,  Amtrak.  and  the  freight  rail-
roads remain vulnerable to terrorist attacks. 
(75) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

The  Rail  Security  Act  of  2007  that  I  introduced  on  January  4th  along  with  Sen-
ators Snowe, Biden, and Lieberman would authorize over $1.2 billion dollars for rail 
security.  More  than  half  of  this  funding  would  be  authorized  to  complete  tunnel 
safety  and  security  improvements  at  New  York’s  Penn  Station,  which  is  used  by 
over 500,000 transit, commuter, and intercity passengers each workday. The legisla-
tion  would  also  establish  a  grant  program  to  encourage  security  enhancements  by 
the  freight  railroads,  Amtrak,  shippers  of  hazardous  materials,  and  local  govern-
ments with responsibility for passenger stations. It would help to address identified 
security weaknesses in a manner that also seeks to protect the taxpayers’ interests. 
As I mentioned earlier, this Committee and the Senate has consistently supported 
rail  security  legislation.  Most  recently.  rail  security  provisions  were  adopted  last 
Fall  as  part  of  the  port  security  legislation.  But  again,  the  House  failed  to  allow 
these important security provisions to move ahead, and the provisions were stripped 
from  the  conference  agreement.  As  a  result,  our  rail  network  continues  to  remain 
vulnerable  to  terrorist  attack.  That  is  unacceptable,  particularly  after  seeing  the 
tragic attacks on rail systems in the cities of London, Mumbai, and Madrid, and the 
devastating consequences of those attacks. 

It  is  essential  that  we  work  to  protect  all  the  modes  of  transportation  from  a  po-
tential attack, and I hope the Committee will mark-up rail security legislation expe-
ditiously.  This  issue  is  too  important  to  transportation  safety  to  be  ignored  and  for 
that  reason  I  call  on  Congress  to  pass  rail  security  legislation  as  soon  as  possible. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for calling this very important hearing, and for shining 
a light on the crucial legislation a number of us cosponsored and introduced earlier 
this month, S. 184, the Surface Transportation and Rail Security Act of 2007, or the 
STARS Act. 

We  know  that  we  are  a  nation  with  enemies,  and  we  know  that  because  of  our 
freedoms and our economy, we are a nation of targets. In the years since terrorists 
used  one  mode  of  transportation  to  wake  us  up  to  their  sick  motivations  and  evil 
designs, we have made strides to protect the people and assets associated with that 
mode,  aviation.  Despite  the  good,  bipartisan  work  by  this  Committee  in  the  years 
since September 11 to address the vulnerabilities of our passenger and freight rails, 
our  ports  and  waterway  facilities,  and  other  elements  of  our  transportation  infra-
structure,  I  am  afraid  that  some  in  Congress  and  in  the  Administration  have  not 
been as diligent in protecting these other modes. 

If  we  are  to  take  our  responsibilities  as  Members  of  Congress  seriously,  we  must 
make certain that the trucks, trains, pipelines, and barges carrying hazardous mate-
rials  are  made  secure.  We  must  demand  action  to  protect  our  passenger  rail  and 
transit  systems  so  that  the  tragedies  we  have  witnessed  in  Madrid,  London,  and 
Mumbai  are  not  replayed  here.  We  must  do  what  we  can  to  protect  our  transpor-
tation  systems  from  evil  motives  and  opportunities  that  we  would  never  have 
thought to imagine just a few years ago. 

It  is  important  for  these  witnesses  to  be  heard  before  this  Committee,  and  it  is 
even  more  important  for  the  Committee  to  take  quick  action  on  the  STARS  Act.  I 
look  forward  to  voting  it  out  of  Committee,  and  anticipate  its  timely  consideration 
by the full Senate. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE NATIONAL SCHOOL TRANSPORTATION ASSOCIATION 
The  National  School  Transportation  Association  is  concerned  that  the  Nation’s 
largest  mass  transportation  fleet  has  been  overlooked  in  Congress’  efforts  to  secure 
our transportation system. 

Each weekday about 470,000 yellow school buses travel the Nation’s roads, about 
one-third  of  which  are  privately  owned.  Our  fleet  is  2.5  times  the  size  of  all  other 
forms  of  mass  transportation—transit,  intercity  buses,  commercial  airlines  and 
rail—combined.  During  the  school  year  we  make  more  than  50  million  passenger 
trips daily carrying the country’s most vulnerable passengers—our children. Our ex-
posure  is  far  greater  than  public  transportation’s  at  32  million  trips  daily,  yet  the 
school bus industry has received little attention and no funding at all from the Fed-
eral Government. 
School Buses and Terrorism 

School  buses  have  been  targets  of  terrorists  not  only  in  countries  such  as  Israel, 
Thailand, Yemen, and African countries, but also in Canada and the United States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

So  far,  the  attacks  in  this  country  have  been  domestic,  but  they  illustrate  the  con-
cerns of the industry—and indeed of the country: 

77 

• The  most  notorious  case  occurred  30  years  ago  when  a  gang  of  armed  men  hi-
jacked  a  school  bus  in  California,  taking  26  children  hostage.  The  men  forced 
the children and their driver into a buried van and kept them underground for 
16 hours, demanding $5 million ransom. 

• In 1995, a man claiming to have a bomb hijacked a school bus with eleven spe-
cial  needs  children  in  Miami.  Police  killed  the  hijacker,  who  turned  out  to  be 
unarmed. 

• In  1996,  a  15-year-old  boy  commandeered  a  school  bus  in  Salt  Lake  City  and 

killed the driver. He later killed himself after crashing into a home. 

• In  January  2002,  a  school  bus  driver  in  Pennsylvania  abandoned  his  regular 
route  and  took  thirteen  children  on  an  unauthorized  trip  to  Washington  DC. 
The driver, armed with a rifle, eluded attempts to find the bus for 6 hours. De-
spite a massive search by police, the bus wasn’t found until the hijacker turned 
himself in. 

• In  January  2006,  an  armed  man  hijacked  a  school  bus  in  Los  Angeles  County, 
California,  forcing  the  driver  at  gunpoint  to  drive  200  miles  before  the  driver 
outwitted him and escaped. 

As Congress knows, buses are a common target of terrorists worldwide. The Fed-
eral  Bureau  of  Investigation  estimates  that  40  percent  of  attacks  on  transportation 
systems  are  aimed  at  buses.  Additionally,  schools  in  this  country  have  been  identi-
fied  as  potential  terrorist  targets,  and  TSA  has  issued  warnings  of  potential  ter-
rorist interest in school buses. Buses carrying children are particularly popular tar-
gets, for there is little that human beings fear more than a threat to their children. 
School  buses  are  iconic  symbols  of  America  and  of  America’s  unique  educational 
system.  As  President  Bush  said  in  his  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  7, 
it is the policy of the United States to protect our Nation’s critical resources against 
terrorist  attacks  that  could  have  psychological  and  symbolic  impact  and  undermine 
the  public’s  morale  and  confidence  in  our  national  institutions.  An  attack  on  school 
buses would have a damaging psychological effect on this country and would destroy 
confidence  in  the  Nation’s  ability  to  protect  our  children.  Despite  the  potential  for 
devastating  results  if  terrorists  were  systematically  to  target  school  buses  in  this 
country,  the  Federal  Government  has  not  included  school  transportation  in  its  ef-
forts to provide a secure public transportation system. 
School Buses and Security 

Like public transit, school buses operate in an open environment. Routes are rou-
tinely  published  at  the  beginning  of  the  school  year  and  rarely  change  during  the 
year. School buses make the same stops at the same time every day, making it very 
easy  for  anyone  to  intercept  a  bus.  School  bus  stops  are  unprotected,  and  usually 
unattended by an adult. 

School  buses  in  most  states  cannot  be  locked  when  students  are  on  board;  there-
fore  they  are  vulnerable  to  penetration  by  outsiders.  School  bus  drivers  have  no 
shield,  compartment,  or  other  protection;  since  they,  unlike  public  transit  or  inter-
city  bus  drivers,  are  responsible  for  their  passengers,  they  cannot  be  isolated  from 
them. 

School  bus  operations  vary  greatly  in  their  sophistication  and  their  facilities,  but 
the  majority  operate  from  unprotected  bus  yards,  where  prior  to  9/11,  the  biggest 
concern  was  vandalism.  Industry  officials  estimate  that  bus  fleets  are  grounded  on 
an  average  of  once  a  week  by  vandals.  While  these  incidents  are  usually  the  result 
of student pranks rather than serious attempts to cause death or injury, they show 
how  easily  a  terrorist  could  access  school  buses  either  to  use  as  mobile  improvised 
explosive devices (IEDs) or to implement a hijacking. 

In  many  communities  across  the  country,  school  buses  are  the  only  form  of  mass 
transportation  available  for  evacuation  of  large  populations.  Security  of  the  school 
transportation  system  is  important  not  only  to  protect  the  students  who  ride  buses 
daily, but also to ensure that we are ready and able to respond to critical incidents 
elsewhere  in  our  communities.  Many  fleets  participate  in  emergency  planning  with 
local  government  for  everything  from  police  responses  to  nuclear  plant  evacuation 
planning. School buses from New York, New Jersey, and Connecticut played an im-
portant  role  in  both  evacuating  people  from  the  impact  area  in  Manhattan  on  9/11 
and  transporting  critical  workers  into  the  area  during  the  search  and  recovery  pe-
riod. This is part of a long tradition of service in times of disaster, whether natural 
or manmade. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

Officials in New Orleans have been criticized for not incorporating the school bus 
fleet into their emergency plans prior to and during Hurricane Katrina. Buses that 
could  have  been  used  to  transport  residents  to  safety  were  instead  trapped  under 
water. We all are aware of the consequences in that instance of the failure to recog-
nize the importance of the local school bus fleet. 

For  the  past  4  years,  the  three  national  school  transportation  associations,  the 
National  Association  of  Pupil  Transportation  (NAPT)  which  represents  primarily 
public  school  officials  who  operate  or  oversee  student  transportation  in  local  dis-
tricts;  the  National  Association  of  State  Directors  of  Pupil  Transportation  Services 
(NASDPTS)  which  represents  primarily  state  government  officials  responsible  for 
school  transportation;  and  the  National  School  Transportation  Association  (NSTA) 
which  represents  primarily  school  bus  companies  that  provide  student  transpor-
tation under contract to public school districts have, worked with the Transportation 
Security Administration in trying to determine the security needs of the school bus 
industry.  Despite  our  frequent  requests,  the  agency  has  been  unable  to  provide  a 
comprehensive vulnerability assessment of school bus operations, as they have done 
for  other  modes.  The  industry  has  produced  some  materials,  such  as  the  National 
School  Transportation  Association’s  ‘‘Top  25  Security  Action  Items  for  School  Bus 
Operations’’  and  the  National  Association  for  Pupil  Transportation’s  ‘‘Security  As-
sessment Tool,’’ and all three associations have posted security information on their 
websites.  In  addition,  many  individual  operators  have  attended  security  forums  at 
their  own  expense,  and  most  are  involved  in  their  local  emergency  response  plan-
ning activities. 

Last  year  the  American  Trucking  Associations  and  the  three  national  school  bus 
associations collaborated to develop ‘‘School Bus Watch,’’ a training program derived 
from  ‘‘Highway  Watch.’’  In  addition,  we  worked  with  Consolidated  Safety  Services, 
Inc. on a security awareness and training program funded by the Transportation Se-
curity  Administration.  While  these  programs  provide  welcome  training  to  school 
transportation personnel, our industry still lags behind all other modes in asset pro-
tection.  Fewer  than  10  percent  of  school  buses  have  global  positioning  systems 
(GPS)  or  other  vehicle  locator  systems,  fewer  than  half  have  surveillance  cameras 
on  board,  and  almost  none  have  redundant  or  integrated  communication  systems. 
School Buses and Funding 

School  transportation  is  funded  almost  entirely  by  state  and  local  government. 
The  Federal  Government  provides  no  funding  source  for  routine  home-to-school 
transportation  or  school  activity  transportation.  (In  Fiscal  Year  2003,  the  first  Fed-
eral  funds  became  available  for  school  buses  when  the  Environmental  Protection 
Agency  provided  $5  million  for  grants  to  reduce  diesel  emissions  as  part  of  their 
Clean School Bus USA program.) 

As  state  governments  are  decreasing  expenditures,  a  larger  burden  falls  on  mu-
nicipalities  to  support  school  transportation.  Some  school  districts  have  turned  to 
parents to pay part of the cost of busing their children, and some have wrestled with 
the  possibility  of  discontinuing  school  bus  transportation  entirely—knowing  that 
such a move would not only present a hardship for many families and increase traf-
fic and pollution around schools, but more importantly, would put students at much 
greater risk as they find less safe ways to get to school. 

In this economic climate, finding the means to make significant security improve-

ments to school transportation systems is difficult if not impossible. 

Congress  acknowledged  the  importance  of  school  transportation  in  the  USA  PA-
TRIOT Act, by specifically including school buses in the definition of mass transpor-
tation. But even though all other forms of mass transportation—airlines, rail, tran-
sit  and  intercity  buses—have  received  Federal  funding  for  security  improvements, 
school transportation has received none. 

In  the  past  3  years,  school  bus  operators  have  spent  almost  $12  million  annually 
on  increased  security  training.  But  if  we  are  to  make  significant  improvements  in 
school  transportation  security,  we  must  go  beyond  training  to  capitol  investments 
in facilities and equipment. Some of the priorities of the industry are: 

1.  Electronic  security  devices  for  the  bus,  such  as  vehicle  tracking,  secure  com-
munications,  and  video  monitoring  that  allow  the  driver  to  signal  trouble,  and 
allow sources outside the bus to locate the vehicle and assess the nature of the 
harmful activity. 
2. Robust and interoperable communications systems that allow drivers and su-
pervisors  to  signal  and  communicate  with  other  agencies,  such  as  law  enforce-
ment, on a regional or state level. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

3.  Security  for  bus  storage  areas,  including  fencing,  electronic  gates,  lighting, 
and monitoring systems that restrict access to buses and bus facilities and alert 
operators to intruders. 

These  are  needs  that  neither  school  bus  operators  nor  local  boards  of  education 
can fund alone. If we are to provide security for the 25 million children transported 
on school buses daily, we must have help from the Federal Government. In the past 
4  years,  Congress  has  provided  security  funding  of  $22  billion  for  commercial  avia-
tion,  $876  million  for  ports  and  shipping,  $387  million  for  public  transit  bus  and 
rail, $51 million for trucking, $49 million for intercity bus, and $15.5 million for Am-
trak.  The  largest  transportation  system  in  the  country,  carrying  its  future,  has  re-
ceived nothing. Our children deserve better. 

Fiscal Notes—School Bus Security 

Assumptions: 
470,000 school buses nationwide 
15,000 school bus facilities nationwide 
7  percent  of  school  buses  currently  have  GPS  or  other  vehicle  locating  systems 
2 percent of school buses currently have electronic student tracking systems 
42 percent of school buses currently have video surveillance systems 
14 percent of school buses currently have door locks 
85  percent  of  school  buses  currently  have  two-way  communication,  generally  ra-

dios 

15 percent of communication systems are interoperable with other agencies 
49 percent of school bus parking facilities are fenced and lighted 
16 percent of school bus parking facilities have video monitoring 
8 percent of school bus parking facilities are monitored by a guard 

Costs 

[dollars in millions] 

GPS: $900/bus for hardware plus $30/month communication expense 

437,000 buses × $900 
437,000 × 30 × 12 

Bus video surveillance: $2,500/bus 

272,600 buses × $2,500 

Two-way radios: $900/bus plus $3,000/base station 

Facility fencing, lighting, gates: $100,000/25-bus facility 

Electronic monitoring of facilities: $6,000/facility (hardware) 

70,500 buses × $900 
2,250 stations × $3,000 

7,650 facilities × $100,000 

12,600 facilities × $6,000 

Total capital expense 

1 Annually. 
2 Billion. 

$393.3 
1 $157.3 

$681.5 

$63.5 
$6.75 

$765 

$75.6 

2 $2 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question 1. The Department of Homeland Security was appropriated $175 million 
for  this  year’s  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  (TSGP).  I  understand  that  only  $8 
million of that total will be available for Amtrak, and that none of these funds will 
be  awarded  to  freight  railroads,  despite  being  made  explicitly  eligible  for  such 
grants  through  the  appropriations  bill.  We  know  that  both  Amtrak  and  our  freight 
railroads have significant vulnerabilities. Can you explain why so little of this avail-
able funding is going to Amtrak and the freight railroads? 

Answer.  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  used  a  risk-informed  allo-
cation model to evaluate the relative risk to the transportation systems. The Transit 
Security  Grant  Program  (TSGP)  risk  formula  is  comprised  of  threat  and  vulner-
ability/consequences  variables.  The  DHS  risk  assessment  methodology  considers 
critical  infrastructure  system  assets,  and  characteristics  that  might  contribute  to 
their  risk,  such  as:  intelligence  community  assessments  of  threat;  potentially  af-
fected  passenger  populations  and  the  economic  impact  of  attack.  The  relative 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

weighting  of  variables  reflects  DHS’s  overall  risk  assessment  and  Fiscal  Year  (FY) 
2007 program priorities (for example, presence of underwater and underground sys-
tems).  Specific  variables  include  unlinked  passenger  trips,  number  of  underground 
track miles, number of underwater tunnels and location-specific intelligence commu-
nity risk analysis. Amtrak was allocated $8.3 million based on its risk profile. 

Question  2.  Did  the  Department  complete  the  comprehensive  transportation  sys-
tems sector specific plan by December 31, 2006, as required by the Executive Order? 
Answer. The Transportation Sector-Specific Plan (TSSP) is part of DHS’s National 
Infrastructure  Protection  Plan  (NIPP).  In  June  2006,  DHS  signed  the  NIPP  as  the 
comprehensive  Critical  Infrastructure  and  Key  Resources  (CI/KR)  planning  frame-
work  required  by  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  7  ‘‘Critical  Infrastruc-
ture  Identification,  Prioritization,  and  Protection’’  (HSPD–7).  The  transportation 
systems sector was one of 17 CI/KR sectors outlined in HSPD–7. The NIPP deadline 
for  all  17  CI/KR  sectors  was  December  31,  2006.  On  May  21,  the  Secretary  an-
nounced the completion of all 17 sector specific plans (SSPs), of which the TSSP was 
one. Executive Order 13416, Strengthening Surface Transportation Security, also re-
quired the TSSP by December 31, 2006 but placed an additional requirement of sur-
face  transportation  modal  plans  90  days  after  the  TSSP  was  released.  The  modal 
plans were released together with the TSSP on May 21. 

Question  3.  Will  the  President  be  requesting  additional  funding  in  the  FY  2008 
budget  to  reflect  his  policy,  set  forth  in  the  Executive  Order,  that  the  ‘‘security  of 
our Nation’s surface transportation systems is a national priority, vital to our econ-
omy, and essential to the security of our Nation.’’ The current funding levels do not 
seem to reflect this sense of priority. 

Answer. The Executive Order states that surface transportation security is a pri-
ority,  but  it  is  a  shared  responsibility.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA)  supports  the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2008  budget  request.  The  budget 
request  accurately  reflects  the  funding  necessary  to  carry  out  different  approaches 
to  different  modes  of  transportation  and  includes  funding  in  TSA’s  budget  as  well 
as in the budgets of other components. 

Surface transportation infrastructure is approximately 85 percent privately owned 
and  operated,  and  receives  security  funding  from  multiple  streams  (e.g.,  operating 
revenue, State, local, private, as well as Federal funding). Surface transportation se-
curity  is  a  shared  responsibility  among  a  variety  of  stakeholders,  including  State, 
local,  and  Federal  agencies,  and  private  owners  and  operators.  As  the  Executive 
Order  outlines,  the  appropriate  role  for  the  Federal  Government  includes  assessing 
the  security  of  the  overall  surface  transportation  system  and  developing  guidelines 
and  requirements  to  address  high  priority  gaps,  ensuring  the  effective  sharing  of 
surface  transportation-related  security  information,  assessing  compliance  with 
guidelines  and  requirements,  and  ensuring  that  Federal  surface  transportation  re-
search and development efforts for security are based on the needs of these systems 
and prioritized according to the ever evolving terrorist threats. The Federal Govern-
ment  also  provided  grants  to  these  systems  based  on  the  priorities  identified 
through assessments and threats. 

The rail and mass transit modes do not allow for the same type of approach used 
for aviation where sealing off an area of the airport to those who have been screened 
is  feasible.  Rail  and  mass  transit  systems  operate  over  a  broad  geographic  spread 
with  numerous  stations  and  transfer  points  providing  the  efficiency  and  fast-pace 
that are essential to moving thousands of passengers, particularly during daily rush 
hours.  The  point  defense  approach  taken  at  the  airports  is  neither  practicable  nor 
desirable  for  surface  transportation.  Rather,  an  integrated  strategy,  tapping  the 
strengths  of  the  Federal  Government,  State  and  local  governments,  and  passenger 
rail and mass transit agencies, must be pursued. 

Funding comparisons should also include: 
• The commitment of Federal funds to intelligence activities to identify terrorists 
and  detect  their  activities  before  they  can  present  a  threat  or  achieve  their  ob-
jectives; 
• The commitment of Federal funds to capital improvements of passenger rail and 
• The availability to transit agencies to use 1 percent of Federal Transit Adminis-
tration  grants  for  training  and  exercises,  approximately  $40  million  annually; 
• The  ability  of  states  to  allocate  State  Homeland  Security  Grant  program  funds 
• Direct  grants  to  transit  providers  under  the  transit  security  and  intercity  bus 

mass transit systems that integrate security enhancements; 

to rail and transit system security; 

security grant programs; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

• The  law  enforcement  agencies—either  maintained  by  transit  agencies  or  pro-
vided  by  State  or  local  government—providing  law  enforcement  and  security 
services  for  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  systems  operating  within  and/or 
through their respective jurisdictions; and 
• Information sharing efforts that ensure security awareness is maintained at the 
Federal,  State  and  local,  and  transit  agency  levels—such  as  the  Public  Transit 
portal  of  the  Homeland  Security  Information  Network  that  is  maintained  and 
operated at no cost to the transit community; the fee-funded Information Shar-
ing and Analysis Center maintained by the American Public Transportation As-
sociation,  now  integrated  into  the  Public  Transit  portal  of  the  Homeland  Secu-
rity Information Network; and State and local intelligence fusion centers. 

Federal  funding  contributes  to  all  of  these  efforts,  and  will  continue  to  do  so,  as 
part  of  a  comprehensive,  integrated  strategic  approach  aligning  the  efforts  of  a 
range  of  entities  and  programs  at  the  Federal,  State,  and  local  government  and 
transit agency levels. 

Question  4.  In  your  testimony,  you  suggested  that  significant  personnel  could  be 
shifted from TSA’s aviation security force to help secure surface transportation sys-
tems.  How  many  aviation  security  employees  could  be  available  at  any  given  time 
for such work without impacting the security of our aviation system? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  undertaken  sev-
eral  initiatives  to  increase  our  security  footprint  at  the  Nation’s  airports.  These  ef-
forts  include  the  Behavior  Detection  Program,  the  Airport  Direct  Access  Screening 
Program, and the Bomb Appraisal Officer Program. Each of these programs requires 
a  commitment  of  manpower  beyond  basic  screening  functions.  TSA  could  support 
limited  multi-modal  contingency  operations  through  the  use  of  overtime,  diversion 
of  manpower  from  non-primary  screening  functions,  and  the  use  of  non-Transpor-
tation  Security  Officer  personnel  (e.g.,  Aviation  Security  Inspectors).  Specific  avail-
ability  of  manpower  would  be  heavily  impacted  by  system  requirements  at  a  par-
ticular  time  (e.g.,  Holiday  Operations)  and  airport  security  requirements  resulting 
from a given Threat Condition. 

Question 5. In your written testimony, you discuss the work of the Surface Trans-
portation Security Inspection (STSI) teams in assessing rail and transit systems. Is 
there  enough  funding  through  the  Department’s  Transit  Security  Grant  Program 
(TSGP) to fund improvements for all the risks and vulnerabilities that are identified 
through  this  program?  If  not,  how  are  rail  and  transit  system  supposed  to  address 
these risks and vulnerabilities? 

Answer.  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  Transit  Security  Grant 
Program  (TSGP)  is  currently  the  primary  vehicle  for  providing  funding  assistance 
for  security  enhancements  to  public  transportation  agencies  in  the  United  States. 
The  TSGP  employs  risk-based  prioritization  consistent  with  DHS  policy.  This  ap-
proach  applies  TSGP  resources  to  strengthen  the  security  of  the  Nation’s  transit 
systems in the most effective and efficient manner. 

Through  TSGP,  DHS  has  thus  far  allocated  $573  million  to  60  of  the  Nation’s 
mass transit and passenger rail systems in 25 States and the District of Columbia. 
The  TSGP  employs  risk-based  prioritization  consistent  with  the  Department’s  stra-
tegic  framework  articulated  in  the  National  Infrastructure  Protection  Plan  (NIPP) 
and the Transportation Sector Specific Plan (TSSP). Rail transit systems have been 
divided into two tiers based on risk. Particular emphasis is placed on the passenger 
volume  of  the  system  and  the  underwater  and  underground  infrastructure  of  the 
rail  transit  systems.  Tier  I  systems  apply  for  a  portion  of  a  regional  allocation,  ei-
ther  as  individual  agencies  or  as  part  of  regional  projects  that  mitigate  the  vulner-
ability of high-risk, high-consequence assets. Grants for systems in Tier II are com-
petitively  awarded  based  on  the  ability  to  reduce  risk,  cost  effectiveness,  and  the 
ability to complete the proposed project with the funds awarded. 

Based on the results of security assessments conducted by the Transportation Se-
curity  Administration’s  (TSA)  Surface  Transportation  Security  Inspectors  (STSI) 
and  prior  assessments  conducted  by  Federal  entities  and  passenger  rail  and  mass 
transit agencies, DHS has identified a set of risk-based priorities that it believes ad-
dress  the  security  needs  of  transit  agencies  and  result  in  the  overall  enhancement 
of  security  in  their  systems.  Eligible  transit  systems  are  encouraged  to  use  TSGP 
funds to address the following risk-based priorities, as applicable: 

1. Protection of high risk/high consequence underwater/underground assets and 
systems; 
2.  Protection  of  other  high  risk/high  consequence  assets  and  systems  that  have 
been identified through system-wide risk assessments; 
3. Use of visible, unpredictable deterrence; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

4. Targeted counter-terrorism training for key front-line staff; 
5. Emergency preparedness drills and exercises; and 
6. Public awareness and preparedness campaigns. 

Area  security  assessment  results  indicate  a  need  for  more  focused  effort  in  secu-
rity  training  for  transit  agency  employees.  Although  an  extensive  Federal  security 
training program has been implemented since 9/11—17 security courses, more than 
500 deliveries, and more than 78,000 transit employees trained—the assessment re-
sults  indicated  wide  variations  in  the  quality  of  transit  agencies’  security  training 
programs  and  an  inadequate  level  of  refresher  or  follow-on  training.  Well-trained 
employees are a security force multiplier for security efforts implemented by transit 
agencies.  This  year,  to  elevate  the  level  of  training,  bring  greater  consistency,  and 
assist  agencies  in  developing  and  implementing  training  programs,  TSA  produced 
and  disseminated  a  Mass  Transit  Security  Training  Program  and  made  training  a 
targeted priority for the TSGP. 

The  program  identifies  specific  types  of  training  at  basic  and  follow-on  levels  for 
particular  categories  of  transit  employees.  Presented  in  a  readily  understandable 
matrix,  it  provides  effective  guidance  to  transit  agency  officials  in  building  and  im-
plementing  training  programs  for  employees  working  in  their  systems.  To  support 
execution of such training programs, the Transit Security Grant Program offers pre- 
packaged training options agencies may obtain with grant funding. Agencies taking 
advantage  of  this  program  have  their  applications  expedited  for  review  and  ap-
proval. This initiative aims to expand significantly the volume and quality of train-
ing for transit employees during 2007. Thus far, 21 agencies have applied for train-
ing under this initiative among the Tier II systems alone for Fiscal Year (FY) 2007 
TSGP  funding.  Nine  other  transit  agencies  proposed  training  in  their  standard  FY 
2007 TSGP applications. 

Equipment  acquisitions,  drills  and  exercises,  employee  training  programs,  and 
public  awareness  programs  that  focus  on  mitigating  these  risks  represent  appro-
priate applications of TSGP funding. Transit systems may use TSGP funding to ac-
quire equipment that applies technological solutions to security vulnerabilities, such 
as explosives detection systems and surveillance cameras. In order to assess and en-
hance  the  transit  system’s  capability  to  respond  under  the  variety  of  security  sce-
narios  that  could  reasonably  be  expected  to  occur  on  its  operation,  the  emergency 
drill and exercise program should test operational protocols that the transit system 
plans to implement in the event of a terrorist attack (specifically, an improvised ex-
plosive device or chemical/biological/radiological/nuclear device), natural disaster, or 
other  emergencies,  and  consist  of  live  situational  exercises  involving  various  threat 
and  disaster  scenarios,  table  top  exercises,  and  methods  for  implementing  lessons 
learned. 

TSA believes current funding of the TSGP enables achievement of strategic prior-
ities  to  enhance  security  in  the  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  mode.  In  addition, 
grants  to  State  and  local  governments  through  the  State  Homeland  Security  Grant 
program  and  Urban  Area  Security  Initiative  are  available  for  training,  equipment, 
and  exercises  related  to  transportation  security  projects  at  the  discretion  of  State 
and  local  homeland  security  leadership  in  coordination  with  their  State  and  Urban 
Area  Homeland  Security  strategies.  Over  $8.5  billion  have  been  awarded  to  State 
and  local  governments  through  these  programs  and  an  additional  $1.3  billion  will 
be awarded in FY 2007. 

Question 6. What was the total amount in grant funding requested by transit and 
rail systems in FY 2006 during the application process for the Department’s Transit 
Security Grant Program (TSGP)? 

Answer. The total amount in grant funding requested by transit and rail systems 

in Fiscal Year 2006 was $151,445,422. 

Question  7.  I  understand  that  the  current  rail  security  guidelines  issued  by  your 
Department last year are voluntary. How are railroads complying with these guide-
lines? Do you intend to make them mandatory? 

Answer.  In  June  2006,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  (DHS)  Transpor-
tation Security Administration (TSA) and the Department of Transportation’s Pipe-
line  and  Hazardous  Materials  Administration  and  Federal  Railroad  Administration 
issued  a  set  of  Security  Action  Items  for  the  rail  transportation  of  toxic  inhalation 
hazard materials. In October 2006, TSA began to measure the degree of implemen-
tation  of  these  action  items  by  the  Nation’s  rail  carriers.  The  initial  measurements 
focused  on  the  seven  action  items  having  the  highest  impact  on  security  at  the 
ground level. TSA Surface Transportation Inspectors visited over 150 individual rail 
facilities and interviewed over 2,700 front-line employees to determine how well the 
security  action  items  were  being  applied  in  the  field.  The  level  of  implementation 
was  measured  as  either—High  (3),  Medium  (2)  or  Low  (1).  In  general,  the  level  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

implementation was rated as medium. An analysis of the individual interviews and 
inspector  reports  showed  that  the  rail  carriers  had  done  a  better  than  average  job 
of  educating  their  employees  in  security  awareness  and  their  role  in  the  detection 
and deterrence of security-related events. 

At this time, TSA is in the process of evaluating the implementation of ten addi-
tional  security  action  items.  The  results  of  these  surveys  will  provide  a  factual 
knowledge  base  which  will  drive  policy  decisions.  Several  of  the  action  items  were 
deemed  critical  to  freight  rail  security  and  have  been  incorporated  into  the  Notice 
of Proposed Rulemaking that was issued by DHS/TSA in December 2006. 

Question 8. I understand that your recent Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) 
on  rail  security  requires  that  rail  cars  carrying  certain  hazardous  shipments  would 
have  to  be  attended  at  all  times  during  transit.  Today,  it  is  common  practice  for 
railroads  to  allow  their  trains  to  sit  unattended  while  changing  train  crews.  How 
would this proposed rule affect this practice? 

Answer.  The  proposed  rule  would  eliminate  this  practice  in  High  Threat  Urban 

Areas (HTUA) and curtail it in areas that lead into HTUAs. 

The Transportation Security Administration’s (TSA) analysis of the freight rail in-
dustry indicated that there is a security vulnerability in the practice of leaving un-
attended rail cars, and in some cases entire trains, carrying certain hazardous mate-
rials, for eventual pickup by either railroad carriers or by the consignees (receivers). 
TSA  plans  to  address  this  vulnerability  through  the  proposed  chain  of  custody  re-
quirements  in  the  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM).  The  chain  of  custody 
provisions propose positive control and handoff of certain hazardous materials ship-
ments at points where rail cars are initially received by the rail carrier, where they 
are interchanged with other railroads, and at the final point of delivery. 

Since  the  highest  risk  occurs  when  a  rail  car  is  in  or  near  an  area  of  high  popu-
lation  density,  TSA’s  proposed  chain  of  custody  would  affect  railroad  carriers  con-
ducting  transfers  within  HTUAs  or  transfers  where  rail  cars  may  enter  an  HTUA. 
The  rule  also  covers  all  shippers  and  receivers  in  an  HTUA.  TSA  has  proposed  to 
secure the chain of custody of certain hazardous shipments throughout the rail sup-
ply chain. 

Question  9.  What  is  the  status  of  TSA’s  Transportation  Sector  Specific  Plan 
(TSSP)  and  annexes  for  each  mode  of  transportation?  What  has  been  the  cause  of 
TSA’s delay in issuing these plans? Without these plans in place, how can we have 
confidence that the agency’s security efforts are appropriately targeted? 

Answer. The Transportation Sector-Specific Plan (TSSP) is part of DHS’s National 
Infrastructure  Protection  Plan  (NIPP).  In  June  2006,  DHS  signed  the  NIPP  as  the 
comprehensive  Critical  Infrastructure  and  Key  Resources  (CI/KR)  planning  frame-
work  required  by  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  –7  ‘‘Critical  Infrastruc-
ture  Identification,  Prioritization,  and  Protection’’  (HSPD–7).  The  transportation 
systems sector was one of 17 CI/KR sectors outlined in HSPD–7. The NIPP deadline 
for  all  17  CI/KR  sectors  was  December  31,  2006.  On  May  21,  the  Secretary  an-
nounced the completion of all 17 sector specific plans (SSPs), of which the TSSP was 
one. Executive Order 13416, Strengthening Surface Transportation Security, also re-
quired the TSSP by December 31, 2006 but placed an additional requirement of sur-
face  transportation  modal  plans  90  days  after  the  TSSP  was  released.  The  modal 
plans were released together with the TSSP on May 21. 

The  plans  were  developed  with  extensive  participation  from  and  in  partnership 
with  the  Government  Coordinating  Council  and  Sector  Coordinating  Councils.  As 
partners in security, it was essential that the TSSP and modal plans were developed 
with their input. 

TSA  utilizes  the  broad  range  of  intelligence  it  receives,  as  well  as  the  domain 
awareness  gained  through  the  risk-based  assessments,  to  inform  the  development 
of strategies and programs to improve security in other modes of transportation and 
to prioritize and direct resources. 

Question 10. What steps has TSA taken to implement the recommendations made 
by the GAO in its September 2005 report on passenger rail security? Why has your 
agency  not  submitted  the  required  letter  to  Congress  detailing  how  you  will  imple-
ment these recommendations? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  implemented,  or 
is in the process of implementing, the Government Accountability Office (GAO) rec-
ommendations in the September 2005 report. Below are the GAO recommendations 
and TSA actions to address them. 

GAO  Recommendation  1:  Establish  a  timeline  for  completing  the  Department’s 
framework  for  analyzing  sector  risks  and  ensure  that  the  risk  assessment  meth-
odologies used by sector-specific agencies are consistent with this framework. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

The  National  Infrastructure  Protection  Plan  (NIPP)  establishes  the  risk  assess-
ment  framework  for  the  protection  of  critical  infrastructure  and  key  resources.  The 
Transportation  Sector  Specific  Plan  (TSSP)  reflects  a  coordinated  effort  integrating 
Federal  entities  operating  through  Government  Coordinating  Councils  (GCCs)  with 
transportation stakeholders operating through Sector Coordinating Councils (SCCs). 
Modal annexes for passenger rail/mass transit and freight rail have been developed 
in  a  similar  coordinated  effort  with  the  stakeholders  in  the  respective  modes.  The 
risk  management  strategy  for  the  TSSP  and  its  modal  annexes  aligns  with  the 
NIPP framework. 

GAO  Recommendation  2a:  Establish  a  plan  for  completing  its  methodology  for 
conducting risk assessments that includes timelines and addresses how it will work 
with passenger rail stakeholders and leverage existing Federal expertise in Depart-
ment of Homeland Security components, including the Office for Domestic Prepared-
ness, as well as the Department of Transportation modal administrations, including 
the Federal Railroad Administration and the Federal Transit Administration. 

At  the  operational  level,  TSA  conducts  security  assessments  under  the  Surface 
Transportation  Security  Inspection  Program.  The  purpose  of  assessing  security  sta-
tus  is  to  determine  how  individual  operations  compare  to  the  baseline  standards. 
Assessments  in  rail  and  passenger  transit  are  conducted  by  TSA’s  field  inspector 
force. The assessments are structured to target key areas of concern and to capture 
essential data to evaluate current practice versus baseline standards. 

Through  the  Baseline  Assessment  and  Security  Enhancement  (BASE)  program, 
Surface  Transportation  Security  Inspectors  (STSIs)  assess  a  transit  system’s  secu-
rity  posture  on  the  17  Security  and  Emergency  Preparedness  Action  Items,  jointly 
developed and disseminated by TSA and FTA in coordination with the Mass Transit 
Sector Coordinating Council and Transit Policing and Security Peer Advisory Group. 
Particular  emphasis  is  placed  on  the  six  core  Transit  Security  Fundamentals  that 
are  also  funding  priorities  under  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Program.  The  BASE 
program  aims  to  elevate  security  generally,  expand  TSA’s  awareness  and  under-
standing  of  security  posture  in  the  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  mode,  enable 
more effective targeting of security programs and technical assistance to elevate se-
curity, and facilitate sharing of best security practices. 

As  of  April  20,  2007,  TSA  STSIs  have  completed  BASE  assessments  on  35  of  the 
top  50  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  agencies  by  passenger  volume.  Assessments 
are  in  progress  at  six  more  of  the  top  50  systems.  The  ongoing  effort  aims  to  com-
plete assessments on the Security Action Items of the top 50 transit agencies during 
Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2007.  Work  will  commence  on  the  transit  agencies  ranked  51  to 
100 during FY 2007, continuing into FY 2008 for completion. Targeted follow-up as-
sessments will measure progress in improving performance in implementation of the 
Security Action Items, particularly the six Transit Security Fundamentals. 

The  information  derived  from  the  BASE  assessments  enables  more  effective  tar-
geting  of  security  programs  and  technical  assistance  to  elevate  security.  Through 
this  process,  TSA  also  identifies  best  security  practices  for  sharing  with  the  pas-
senger  rail  and  mass  transit  community,  further  enhancing  security  posture.  The 
thorough  review  of  security  programs  and  procedures  affords  the  systems  assessed 
the opportunity to review the state of their security program and identify strengths 
and weaknesses. This information can guide the effective application of available se-
curity resources, focus collaborative efforts with TSA, and facilitate the preparation 
of funding requests through security grant programs. 

An example of the application of assessment results in prompt development of se-
curity programs is the training initiative under the Transit Security Grant Program 
(TSGP). BASE assessment results demonstrated a need for improvement in security 
training  of  front-line  employees.  TSA,  in  coordination  with  its  Federal  partners  at 
the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Office of Grants and Training and the 
Federal Transit Administration, developed the Mass Transit Security Training Pro-
gram. The program identifies specific types of training at basic and follow-on levels 
for particular categories of transit employees. Presented in a readily understandable 
matrix,  it  provides  effective  guidance  to  transit  agency  officials  in  building  and  im-
plementing  training  programs  for  employees  working  in  their  systems.  To  support 
execution of such training programs, the Transit Security Grant Program offers pre- 
packaged training options agencies may obtain with grant funding. Agencies taking 
advantage  of  this  program  have  their  applications  expedited  for  approval  to  ensure 
funds are delivered within 90 days of submission. This initiative aims to expand sig-
nificantly  the  volume  and  quality  of  training  for  transit  employees  during  2007. 
Thus far, 21 agencies have applied for training under this initiative among the Tier 
II  systems  alone  for  FY  2007  TSGP  funding.  Nine  other  transit  agencies  proposed 
training in their standard FY 2007 TSGP applications. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

That is the objective—through regular reviews of security posture in light of pre-
vailing  threats,  to  ensure  security  resources  at  all  levels—Federal,  State,  and  local 
government,  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  agencies—are  applied  in  the  most  ef-
fective ways to deter, detect, and prevent terrorist attacks. 

GAO  Recommendation  2b:  Evaluate  whether  the  risk  assessment  methodology 
used  by  the  Office  for  Domestic  Preparedness  should  be  leveraged  to  facilitate  the 
completion of risk assessments for rail and other transportation modes. 

To  promote  interagency  coordination  and  information  sharing  on  risk  assessment 
activities and to bring the assessment methodologies within a consistent framework 
and leverage the existing methodologies, DHS, and its Federal partners have formed 
the  Federal  Risk  Assessment  Working  Group,  the  Interagency  Mass  Transit  Secu-
rity  Information  Program,  and  the  Risk  Assessment  Policy  Group.  These  groups 
work  together  to  coordinate  Federal  risk  assessment  activities  and  to  promote  con-
sistency  in  risk  assessment  approaches.  The  National  Preparedness  branch  of  the 
Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency,  formerly  the  DHS  Office  of  Grants  and 
Training, has participated as well in the development of the BASE program. 

GAO  Recommendation  3a:  Develop  security  standards  that  reflect  industry  best 
practices that can be measured, monitored, and enforced by Transportation Security 
Administration  rail  inspectors  and,  if  appropriate,  by  rail  asset  owners.  This  could 
be  accomplished  by  using  the  rule-making  process,  with  notice  in  the  Federal  Reg-
ister and an opportunity for interested stakeholders to comment, to promulgate long- 
term regulations that incorporate these standards. 
Security and Emergency Management Action Items 

In  addition  to  the  two  security  directives  issued  by  the  TSA  in  May  2004,  TSA 
and the Federal Transit Administration (FTA), in coordination with other public and 
private  security  partners,  have  recently  conducted  a  comprehensive  update  of  the 
Security and Emergency Management Action Items issued by the FTA in the imme-
diate  aftermath  of  September  11.  The  newly  enhanced  action  items  are  in  part 
based on industry effective practices and represent a systematic and measurable ap-
proach  to  elevate  baseline  security  posture  and  enhance  security  program  manage-
ment  and  implementation.  The  action  items  cover  a  range  of  areas  including  secu-
rity  program  management  and  accountability,  security  and  emergency  response 
training,  drills  and  exercises,  public  awareness,  protective  measures  for  Homeland 
Security  Advisory  System  (HSAS)  threat  levels,  physical  security,  personnel  secu-
rity, and information-sharing and security. 
Threat Level Protective Measures 

The Threat Level Protective Measures, also issued recently by TSA and FTA, pro-
vides a comprehensive systems approach and framework for transit agencies to use 
in integrating their security and emergency management systems with DHS Home-
land Security Advisory System’s five color-coded graduated threat conditions. These 
protective  measures  are  also  based  in  part  on  transit  and  passenger  rail  providers’ 
effective practices. 

Through the BASE program, STSIs review and monitor the implementation of the 
action items. This initiative aims to elevate security posture and readiness through-
out  the  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  mode  by  implementing  and  sustaining 
measurable baseline security standards applicable to the operating environment and 
characteristics of mass transit and passenger rail systems. 
Transit Security Fundamentals 

In its security assessments, TSA focuses particular attention on six Transit Secu-
rity  Fundamentals  that  provide  the  foundation  for  a  successful  security  program. 
The fundamentals are: 

1. Protection of high-risk underwater/underground assets and systems; 
2. Protection of other high-risk assets that have been identified through system- 
wide risk assessments; 
3. Use of visible, unpredictable deterrence; 
4. Targeted counter-terrorism training for key front-line staff; 
5. Emergency preparedness drills and exercises; and 
6. Public awareness and preparedness campaigns. 

TSA has distributed a self-assessment checklist to each of the top 50 agencies cov-
ering  six  fundamental  areas  that  provide  the  foundation  for  an  effective  security 
program.  To  date,  42  of  the  top  50  agencies  have  responded.  The  remaining  eight 
are  expected  to  report  shortly.  Expansion  to  the  agencies  ranked  51  to  100  will  fol-
low. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

Tunnel Security Action Items 

To  mitigate  the  potential  catastrophic  consequences  of  a  terrorist  attack  against 
underwater transit and rail tunnels, the interagency Tunnel Risk Mitigation Work-
ing  Group  under  the  leadership  of  TSA  issued  the  Tunnel  Security  Action  Items  in 
2007.  These  recommended  measures  derive  from  the  experience  gained  in  Federal 
security  assessments  and  the  ongoing  work  to  identify  and  prioritize  tunnels  and 
develop  a  strategic  plan  to  mitigate  risk.  The  interagency  group  is  working  closely 
with  the  transit  industry  to  ensure  the  implementation  of  protective  measures  to 
mitigate  risk  in  transit  tunnels.  TSA  security  assessments  of  passenger  rail  and 
mass  transit  agencies  with  tunnel  infrastructure  include  review  of  protective  meas-
ures implemented to mitigate risk. 
Notice of Proposed Rulemaking 

TSA  issued  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  in  December  2006.  Al-
though  it  primarily  focused  on  security  in  transporting  toxic  inhalation  hazard  ma-
terial by freight rail carriers, the NPRM proposes some requirements for passenger 
railroad  carriers,  rail  transit  systems,  and  hosts  of  other  passenger  rail  services. 
The proposed requirements include designation of a primary and at least one alter-
nate Rail Security Coordinator to serve as the point of contact with TSA on security 
matters and communications and to provide oversight to the railroad carrier or rail 
transit system’s compliance with security requirements and implementation of secu-
rity initiatives. Additionally, in recognition of the vital importance of information in-
dicating  terrorist  planning  and  preparation,  the  rule  further  requires  all  passenger 
rail  carriers  and  rail  transit  systems  to  report  potential  threats  or  significant  secu-
rity concerns to TSA. The NPRM also details TSA’s authority concerning inspection 
of  facilities  and  operations  of  covered  entities.  This  NPRM  provided  ample  time  for 
comment by stakeholders and the public at large. A public meeting was held on Feb-
ruary  2,  2007,  to  provide  further  opportunity  for  comment.  TSA  is  reviewing  the 
comments  received  and  making  appropriate  changes,  if  any,  to  the  proposed  rule. 
This  proposed  rule  will  further  facilitate  the  BASE  inspections  and  the  review  and 
monitoring  of  any  future  voluntary  and/or  required  security  standards  TSA  might 
put in place. 
Standards Development 

The Federal Government is engaged with the American Public Transportation As-
sociation  (APTA)  Security  Standards  Policy  and  Planning  Committee  to  develop  se-
curity standards. The security standards development effort brings together security 
professionals  from  the  public  transportation  industry,  business  partner  representa-
tives,  and  the  Federal  Government  in  a  collaborative  effort  to  develop  consensus- 
based standards to enhance security in transit systems. Federal participants consist 
of  the  subject-matter  experts  from  DHS  Office  of  Grants  and  Training,  TSA,  FTA, 
and the Federal Railroad Administration. Public transportation stakeholder partici-
pants  consist  of  members  of  the  APTA  Security  Standards  Policy  and  Planning 
Committee,  officials  from  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  systems  and  industry 
businesses  and  research  organizations.  Working  groups  are  established  to  focus  on 
specific  security  areas  and  concerns,  including  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  sys-
tems, facilities and operations. 

Draft  standards  are  developed  in  a  format  that  is  consistent  with  American  Na-
tional  Standards  Institute  requirements  and  are  posted  for  comment  and  then  ap-
proved by consensus. Federal participation in the consensus-based efforts is effected 
through  the  GCC/SCC  framework  and  Critical  Infrastructure  Partnership  Advisory 
Council  (CIPAC)  process.  The  approved  standards  are  then  put  forth  as  ‘‘rec-
ommended practices’’ and supported by the American Public Transportation Associa-
tion for voluntary adoption by the transit industry. 

GAO  Recommendation  3b:  Set  timelines  for  completing  the  memorandum  of  un-
derstanding modal agreements for rail, mass transit, and research and development, 
which both the Department of Homeland Security and the Department of Transpor-
tation have agreed to pursue. 

In  September  2005,  DHS  and  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  executed 
an annex on public transportation to the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) en-
tered into the prior year by DHS and DOT. Pursuant to this annex, DOT and DHS 
agreed  to  coordinate  their  programs  and  services  (including  risk  assessments, 
grants, training, exercises and technical assistance) to better assist transit agencies 
in  prioritizing  and  addressing  their  current  and  emerging  security-related  needs. 
The  areas  of  coordination  identified  in  the  annex  include  training  courses;  aware-
ness  programs,  i.e.,  the  Transit  Watch;  forums  to  encourage  and  facilitate  commu-
nications  and  information-sharing,  i.e.,  the  Safety  and  Security  Roundtables;  drills 
and  exercises;  emergency  preparedness  and  security  forums,  creating  a  comprehen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

sive  source  for  transit  system  officials  to  turn  for  information  about  available  Fed-
eral  security  and  preparedness  resources  (e.g.,  information  on  grant  funding  avail-
ability,  training,  technical  assistance,  and  effective  practices),  risk  assessment  and 
security  reviews,  and  interoperable  communication.  In  support  of  the  MOU  annex 
implementation,  eight  working  groups  have  been  established  under  an  Executive 
Steering  Committee.  The  annual  plan  for  2007–2008  cooperation  between  the  par-
ties  has  been  drafted  and  is  currently  undergoing  interagency  coordination.  The 
interagency  working  groups  continue  to  facilitate  the  implementation  of  a  unified 
strategic approach to transit security. This approach aims to: 
• Advance focused efforts to mitigate high consequence risk; 
• Expand employment of random, unpredictable deterrence; and 
• Elevate  the  security  baseline  by  building  security  force  multipliers  through 

training, drills and exercises, and public awareness campaigns 

Public and private partners are working together to evaluate technology needs of 
Mass  Transit  and  Passenger  Rail  industry  and  to  develop  and  coordinate  research 
and  development  as  well  as  testing  and  evaluation  of  commercial  off-the-shelf  and 
other  existing  technologies.  Under  the  Public  Transportation  Annex  of  the  DHS/ 
DOT  MOU  discussed  earlier,  TSA  leads  the  Mass  Transit  Technology  Project  Man-
agement Team consisting of representatives from the Office of Grants and Training, 
FTA, and DHS’s Science and Technology Directorate (S&T) (as applicable). This sub-
group allows for coordination and sharing of ongoing work, discussion of stakeholder 
needs  based  on  individual  agency  outreach  through  their  programs,  and  leveraging 
of resources to expand the work done in technology by the agencies. 

Presently, a variety of technologies are on the market or being tested, such as in-
trusion  detection,  video  surveillance,  anomaly  detection,  and  chemical/biological/ra-
diological/nuclear  detection.  TSA,  along  with  its  public  and  private  partners,  is 
working  to  identify  technology  gaps  and  conduct  research  and  development  to  pro-
vide technological solutions. This process between government and industry will aid 
in  ensuring  that  a  collaborative  strategic  process  for  technology  research,  develop-
ment  and  deployment  is  maintained.  The  Federal  partners  are  also  harnessing  the 
information  gained  from  completed  developmental  testing  and  other  use  experience 
to  provide  the  transit  community  a  security  technology  information  resource  to 
guide procurement decisions. 

Through  stakeholder  tours  of  S&T’s  Transportation  Security  Laboratory,  inter-
agency  informational  tours,  and  other  meetings,  TSA  and  its  Federal  partners  ex-
change  information  on  planned  research,  development,  testing,  and  evaluation  ef-
forts,  projects,  and  needs  and  challenges  with  the  stakeholders  and  scientific/tech-
nology  community.  The  results  are  developed  into  broad  requirements  submitted  to 
S&T for research and development. Furthermore, TSA participates in the Integrated 
Project  Teams  (IPT)  held  by  S&T  across  a  variety  of  critical  infrastructure  and  po-
tential  threats.  These  IPTs  provide  a  means  to  submit  technology  requirements  for 
funding  and  coordinate  requirements  with  other  DHS  internal  stakeholders  (i.e. 
Customs and Border Protection, U.S. Coast Guard) to eliminate duplication of effort 
and share experience and knowledge. TSA and industry representatives also partici-
pates  in  bi-  and  multi-lateral  international  meetings  and  working  groups  on  tech-
nology  that  focus  on  sharing  of  information  on  a  specific  technology  or  broad  tech-
nology needs and requirements. TSA and its partners are working on a plan to uti-
lize  Homeland  Security  Information  Network  (HSIN)-Public  Transit  Portal  as  the 
tool to provide government and the industry with a list of available technologies and 
products relating to the protection of mass transit and passenger rail. 

GAO  Recommendation  4:  To  help  strengthen  the  security  of  passenger  rail  sys-
tems in the United States and potentially leverage the knowledge and practices em-
ployed  by  foreign  rail  operators,  we  recommend  that  the  Secretary  of  the  Depart-
ment of Homeland Security, in collaboration with the Department of Transportation 
and the passenger rail industry, take the following two actions: 

• Evaluate  the  feasibility  of  establishing  and  maintaining  an  information  clear-
inghouse  on  existing  and  emergency  security  technologies  and  security  best 
practices  used  in  the  passenger  rail  industry  both  in  the  United  States  and 
abroad. 
• Evaluate the potential benefits and applicability—as risk analyses warrant and 
as  opportunities  permit—of  implementing  covert  testing  processes  to  evaluate 
the effectiveness of rail system security personnel; implementing practices used 
by  foreign  rail  operators  that  integrate  security  into  infrastructure  design;  and 
implementing  random  searches  or  screening  of  passengers  and  their  baggage, 
pending  the  results  of  an  ongoing  joint  Federal  and  industry  review  of  the  im-
pact of random screening on passenger rail operators. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

Effective implementation and use of the HSIN is critical to the success of Federal 
information-sharing  efforts.  DHS  established  HSIN  for  stakeholders  to  use  in  the 
various SCCs. The network includes a Public Transit Portal, intended for use as an 
information-sharing and exchange resource for transit systems throughout the coun-
try.  An  often  expressed  concern  of  transit  system  security  officials  is  the  absence 
of a single source or ‘‘one stop shop’’ for Federal information on transit security. The 
Public Transit Portal on HSIN has been developed to meet this purpose as the gate-
way to Federal information updates and resources for the mode and information and 
material  developed  by  the  Public  Transit  Information  Sharing  and  Analysis  Center 
(ISAC). Feedback from mass transit and passenger rail systems will help ensure in-
formation products meet security needs. A concerted effort to populate the site with 
useful and timely information is ongoing. 

A key component of the portal is the Mass Transit Resource Center. The Resource 
Center  provides  a  comprehensive  database  for  the  transit  industry  to  access  infor-
mation  on  a  broad  spectrum  of  subjects  pertinent  to  transit  security,  material  not 
readily available in a consolidated format elsewhere. TSA uses the Portal to provide 
timely  security  alerts,  advisories,  and  information  bulletins  to  passenger  rail  and 
mass  transit  agencies.  Technology  updates  constitute  an  important  component  of 
this resource. Overall, the Resource Center covers more than 20 subject areas of se-
curity  interest  to  the  public  transportation  community,  reflecting  the  feedback  re-
ceived  from  stakeholders  on  the  type  of  information  they  require  to  meet  the  secu-
rity mission. 

Technology must be fully incorporated into the security operations of mass transit 
and  passenger  rail  agencies.  Presently,  a  variety  of  technologies  are  on  the  market 
or  being  tested,  such  as  intrusion  detection,  video  surveillance,  anomaly  detection, 
and chemical/biological/radiological/nuclear detection. TSA, along with its public and 
private  partners,  is  working  to  identify  technology  gaps  and  conduct  research  and 
development  to  provide  technological  solutions.  The  Federal  partners  are  also  har-
nessing the information gained from completed developmental testing and other use 
experience  to  provide  the  transit  community  a  security  technology  information  re-
source to guide procurement decisions. This resource will be a key component of the 
Public  Transit  Portal  in  the  HSIN,  meeting  a  specific  requirement  of  Executive 
Order 13416, ‘‘Strengthening Surface Transportation Security.’’ 

On the international front, TSA engages extensively with its foreign counterparts 
on  rail  and  transit  security  matters  with  the  aim  of  sharing  and  gleaning  effective 
practices for potential integration in the domestic strategic approach. TSA conducts 
and  maintains  these  efforts  in  collaboration  and  coordination  with  the  Department 
of State, DHS component agencies, and other Federal agencies on projects involving 
transportation security within international and regional organizations. 

Engagement  within  the  Group  of  8  (G8)  and  with  the  European  Union,  the  Asia 
Pacific  Economic  Cooperation,  and  the  Mexican  and  Canadian  governments  fosters 
sharing of effective practices and technologies in mass transit and passenger rail se-
curity. The expanding cooperation in this area has culminated in creating an inter-
national working group on land transport security outside of any preexisting forum 
with  preliminary  focus  on  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  security.  The  United 
States  will  support  this  collaborative  effort  by  providing  information  on  most  effec-
tive security practices and the effectiveness of security technologies. 

TSA also participates in the Rail and Urban Transport Working Group in support 
of  technology  information-sharing  across  five  countries.  The  membership  of  this 
group  consists  of  the  United  States,  United  Kingdom,  Canada,  France,  and  Israel. 
In  this  forum,  technology  and  operational  experts  come  together  to  share  informa-
tion on technology testing and evaluation projects. 

Through the Joint Contact Group, the United States and the United Kingdom en-
gage in a bilateral cooperative effort to develop and promulgate best practices in rail 
and  mass  transit  security,  with  the  objective  of  developing  security  solutions  appli-
cable  on  a  wider  international  basis.  This  group  also  explores  opportunities  to  en-
courage broader private sector involvement in the protection of soft targets, such as 
through training of mass transit employees. 

Another international initiative focuses on vetting suspicious packages detected in 
transit systems. This joint effort, involving TSA STSIs, Los Angeles law enforcement 
representatives,  and  British  security  officials,  will  bring  training,  experience,  and 
lessons learned to the American participants from a British program known as Hid-
den  and  Obviously  Typical  (HOT)  of  suspicious  packages.  This  program  enhances 
the  ability  of  the  trained  personnel  to  identify  indicators  of  security  concerns  with 
packages left unattended in transit and rail facilities and vehicles. 

TSA  will  continue  a  dynamic  effort  to  engage  with  international  counterparts, 
whether through bilateral arrangements or broader forums and working groups, and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

advance  sharing  of  lessons  learned  and  best  practices  to  enhance  security  in  pas-
senger rail and mass transit systems. 

One  of  the  six  Transit  Security  Fundamentals  discussed  earlier  in  this  response 
is  the  implementation  of  emergency  preparedness  drills  and  exercises.  DHS  funds 
transit  agencies’  conduct  of  and  participation  in  drills  and  exercises  as  a  priority 
under the TSGP. Through periodic drills and exercises, transit agencies test the ef-
fectiveness  of  security  and  emergency  management  plans  and  integration  with  re-
gional  security  partners,  such  as  law  enforcement  entities  and  State  and  local  gov-
ernment  agencies.  Covert  testing  has  potential  value  as  part  of  an  overall  security 
engagement approach with particular transit agencies. TSA has developed proposals 
for this activity. Coordination for testing with a particular system is ongoing. 

Question  11.  Why  does  the  TSA  rail  security  proposed  rulemaking  for  hazardous 
materials  rail  shipments  not  include  anhydrous  ammonia  rail  shipments?  The 
freight rail industry considers anhydrous ammonia as a Toxic-by-Inhalation-Hazard 
(TIH) substance, but I understand that TSA decided against including this chemical 
in the proposed rule. 

Answer.  Anhydrous  ammonia  is  covered  by  the  proposed  rule.  In  domestic  trans-
portation, the Hazardous Materials Regulations Table, column 8, Special Provisions, 
lists it as a 13. The 13 designation indicates that it shall be marked as ‘‘inhalation 
hazard’’  on  each  shipping  paper.  The  Department  of  Transportation/Pipeline  and 
Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  considers  anhydrous  ammonia  as  a 
toxic inhalation hazard. 

Question 12. Your agency recently issued the final rule for the implementation of 
the  Transportation  Worker  Identification  Credential  (TWIC)  program  in  the  mari-
time sector. Do you plan to roll this program out to the surface transportation sector 
in  the  future?  If  so,  how  would  the  program  work  for  the  trucking  and  rail  indus-
tries? 

Answer.  All  of  these  components  rely  on  state-of-the-art  technology.  Technology 
programs  always  require  comprehensive  testing,  and  the  Transportation  Worker 
Identification Credential (TWIC) is no different. Therefore, the Transportation Secu-
rity  Administration  (TSA)  is  currently  focused  on  a  rigorous  program  to  test  TWIC 
in  the  maritime  sector  before  it  can  be  considered  for  use  in  other  modes  of  trans-
portation. The TWIC network has five components: 

graphic information and submits the information for security processing. 

• The  Pre-Enrollment  website  component  allows  workers  to  schedule  appoint-
ments  and  provide  biographic  information  ahead  of  time  to  make  enrollment 
easier. 
• The  Enrollment  workstation  component  captures  a  worker’s  biometric  and  bio-
• The TWIC system includes components that route applicant information for Se-
curity processing, store data, conduct data integrity checks, and manage status 
on TWIC cards. 
• The  Screening  Gateway  component  is  a  TSA  enterprise  asset  that  conducts  se-
curity  threat  assessments,  working  with  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation, 
Citizenship  and  Immigration  Services,  and  TSA’s  Colorado  Springs  Operations 
Center.  It  is  important  to  note  that  the  Screening  Gateway  is  used  across  all 
of TSA’s vetting programs. 
• Finally, the Card Production component electronically loads an applicant’s infor-

mation onto a TWIC smart card and then physically produces the card. 

All system components must work together to conduct and complete accurate and 
timely security threat assessments. Rigorous performance testing is the only way to 
ensure that TWIC is ready to be introduced on a large scale. The program must not 
negatively  impact  commerce—or  people’s  livelihoods.  After  we  have  had  an  oppor-
tunity  to  assess  operations  in  the  maritime  sector,  we  can  make  recommendations 
about whether it is appropriate to expand this program into other industries. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question  1.  Why  didn’t  your  agency’s  rail  security  proposal  address  the  many  se-
curity  needs  of  passenger  rail  stations,  and  critical  infrastructure  like  bridges  and 
tunnels? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) has acted on multiple 
fronts to address the security needs of passenger rail stations and critical infrastruc-
ture. TSA and its Federal partners at the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

and  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA)  have  conducted  numerous  assess-
ments in the rail and mass transit modes. 

tion, including 848 for rail systems and 1,778 for mass transit systems. 

• In  the  aftermath  of  the  9/11  attacks,  FTA  completed  vulnerability  assessments 
of  37  of  the  top  50  transit  agencies  in  the  country,  as  measured  by  passenger 
volume. The assessments provided information that enabled transit agencies to 
undertake security enhancement activities with Federal grants and other fund-
ing  sources.  Additionally,  the  assessment  approach  and  the  results  informed 
TSA’s  security  programs,  including  development  of  the  Surface  Transportation 
Security  Inspection  Program  and  the  Baseline  Assessment  for  Security  En-
hancement (BASE) program, discussed in more detail below. 
• DHS Office of Grants and Training required assessments for all grant recipients 
under  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  (TSGP),  covering  more  than  60  of 
the largest transit agencies in the Nation. 
• TSA has completed over 2,600 criticality assessments for systems across the Na-
• 50 Site Assistance Visits have been completed across the Nation’s mass transit, 
• 132 Buffer Zone Protection Plans have also been completed. 
• Through the Office of Grants and Training, the Department has provided tech-
nical  support  to  over  25  major  transit  systems,  as  well  as  Amtrak,  to  assist 
these  agencies  in  developing  risk  management  strategies  to  guide  the  expendi-
ture of scarce security dollars. 
• In  High  Threat  Urban  Area  (HTUA)  rail  corridors,  DHS  components  are  con-
ducting  assessments  where  hazardous  materials  may  pose  significant  risks. 
Thus  far,  assessments  have  been  completed  in  high  Toxic  Inhalation  Hazard 
(TIH)  volume  metropolitan  areas  such  as  Northern  New  Jersey,  Houston,  and 
New Orleans. These assessments review passenger operations in the urban area 
rail corridors. The results lead to initiatives to elevate security for all rail, pas-
senger and freight, operating in the corridors assessed. This program continues 
with  the  objective  of  completing  assessments  of  all  HTUA  rail  corridors 
throughout the country. 

bus, tunnel, and terminal systems. 

Through  the  Surface  Transportation  Security  Inspection  Program  (STSIP),  TSA 
has  deployed  100  inspectors,  assigned  to  19  field  offices  across  the  country,  to  pro-
vide  support  to  our  Nation’s  largest  mass  transit  systems.  These  officials  perform 
frequent inspections of key facilities including stations and terminals for suspicious 
or  unattended  items,  among  other  potential  threats.  Through  the  Baseline  Assess-
ment  and  Security  Enhancement  (BASE)  program,  Surface  Transportation  Security 
Inspectors (STSIs) assess a transit system’s security posture on the 17 Security and 
Emergency  Preparedness  Action  Items,  jointly  developed  and  disseminated  by  TSA 
and  FTA  in  coordination  with  the  Mass  Transit  Sector  Coordinating  Council  and 
Transit  Policing  and  Security  Peer  Advisory  Group.  Particular  emphasis  is  placed 
on the six core Transit Security Fundamentals. The BASE program aims to elevate 
security  generally,  expand  TSA’s  awareness  and  understanding  of  security  posture 
in the passenger rail and mass transit mode, enable more effective targeting of secu-
rity  programs  and  technical  assistance  to  elevate  security,  and  facilitate  sharing  of 
best security practices. 

TSA  and  FTA  have  coordinated  to  offer  STSI  support  to  conduct  the  required  se-
curity  audits  and  reviews  by  State  Safety  Oversight  Agencies  under  title  49,  Code 
of  Federal  Regulations,  part  659.  Through  this  initiative,  which  commenced  in  Au-
gust  2006,  STSIs  have  thus  far  assisted  the  state  oversight  agencies  in  audits  con-
ducted  in  the  BART  system  (San  Francisco-Oakland),  New  Jersey  Transit  (Newark 
subway) and the Port Authority Transit Corporation of Pennsylvania and New Jer-
sey. TSA devoted a full day to discussing further development of this joint effort at 
the annual conference of State Safety Oversight Agencies sponsored by FTA in Sep-
tember  2006.  Coordinating  assessment  activity  to  integrate  BASE  reviews  with 
State Safety Oversight audits prevents ‘‘audit fatigue’’ among affected transit agen-
cies. 

STSIs  also  offer  the  Security  Analysis  and  Action  Program  (SAAP),  which  con-
stitutes  a  systematic  vulnerability  assessment  of  a  mass  transit  or  passenger  rail 
system. The program utilizes several different tools to identify vulnerabilities based 
on  specific  scenarios,  such  as  an  improvised  explosive  device  on  a  passenger  train. 
SAAPs can be conducted on individual critical infrastructure facilities or entire rail 
systems, with particular emphasis on critical control points. 

Finally, inspectors review design plans for systems under construction. STSIs con-
ducted  such  an  assessment  on  the  Phoenix  rail  transit  system  to  assess  the  ade-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

quacy of its security design and recommend improvements that can be accomplished 
during the final stages of construction. 

91 

Question  2.  Your  Department  failed  to  meet  one  of  the  few  trucking  security  re-
quirements  in  last  year’s  SAFE  Port  Act.  That  provision  simply  required  the  DHS 
to check the names of truck drivers with access to secure areas of ports against ter-
ror watch-list and for citizen status. Why wasn’t it done? When will it be done? 

Answer. Section 125 of the Security and Accountability For Every Port Act of 2006 
addresses  a  population  on  which  no  government  entity,  association,  or  industry  or-
ganization maintains information. Generally, each port Terminal Operator has con-
tracts  with  a  number  of  transportation  companies  that  provide  drivers  and  trucks 
to  transport  containers  from  secure  areas  to  staging  areas.  Neither  the  Terminal 
Operator  nor  the  trucking  companies  know  which  drivers  may  enter  a  port  on  any 
given day or at all. Most trucking companies do not have all of the information nec-
essary  for  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  to  successfully  com-
plete the vetting on each of their drivers to submit. There are over 500,000 trucking 
companies,  many  of  which  are  independently  owned  and  operated  and  tend  to  be 
highly transient with no single company affiliation. 

As there is no way to isolate the population covered by section 125, TSA is evalu-
ating other methods of compliance. TSA recently entered into a Memorandum of Un-
derstanding  with  the  Department  of  Transportation’s  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety 
Administration  to  obtain  minimal  biographic  data  on  all  10  million  Commercial 
Drivers  License  holders  in  the  country  to  conduct  name-based  security  threat  as-
sessments  that  are  intended  to  identify  those  who  might  be  on  security  watch  lists 
or in the country unlawfully. We continue to explore various alternatives as to how 
we might best complete these assessments within current resources. 

Question 3. Of the $175 million Congress appropriated for rail and transit security 
grants this year, DHS has only made $8 million available to Amtrak, which carries 
25  million  passengers  a  year.  Has  TSA  performed  an  assessment  of  Amtrak’s  secu-
rity needs? 

Answer. The Transit Security Grant Program (TSGP) employs a risk-based meth-
odology  to  determine  its  funding  priorities.  This  approach  applies  TSGP  resources 
to generate the highest return on investment and, as a result, strengthen the secu-
rity of the Nation’s transit and passenger rail systems in the most effective and effi-
cient manner. Funding priority is given to high-density rail transit systems with sig-
nificant  underground  infrastructure  and  underwater  tunnels.  Based  upon  ongoing 
intelligence  analysis,  extensive  security  reviews,  and  Congressional  direction,  DHS 
has  focused  the  bulk  of  its  available  transit  grant  dollars  on  the  highest-risk  sys-
tems in our country’s largest metropolitan areas. 

TSA  believes  that  the  funds  provided  to  Amtrak  for  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2007  will 
enable Amtrak to create a sustainable, risk-based effort for the protection of critical 
Amtrak  infrastructure,  including  bridges  and  tunnels,  from  terrorism.  A  total  of 
$8,309,537  was  awarded  to  Amtrak  through  the  FY  2007  TSGP:  Amtrak  Security 
Supplemental.  These  funds  will  help  strengthen  security  along  the  major  Amtrak 
corridors  on  the  East  and  West  Coasts,  at  the  company’s  hub  in  Chicago,  Illinois, 
and  throughout  its  southeastern  and  southwestern  service  areas.  In  addition,  risk 
and  vulnerability  assessments  of  the  major  corridors  and  stations  are  being  con-
ducted to identify, prioritize and mitigate specific vulnerabilities. The funds may be 
used by Amtrak for security projects in the Northeast Corridor (the National Capital 
Region,  Philadelphia,  New  York  City/Northern  New  Jersey  and  Boston),  at  its  Chi-
cago,  Illinois,  hub  and  in  certain  jurisdictions  in  the  West  Coast  Service  Area  (Se-
attle,  Portland,  Sacramento,  Oakland,  San  Jose,  Los  Angeles,  and  San  Diego)  and 
the  southeastern  and  southwestern  United  States  (Kansas  City;  St.  Louis;  Denver; 
Charlotte; Norfolk, Virginia, Area; Atlanta; Jacksonville; Ft. Lauderdale; Miami; Or-
lando; Tampa; Memphis; New Orleans; Oklahoma City; Dallas/Fort Worth; San An-
tonio; Houston; El Paso; and Tucson). 

Question 4. What work has TSA done to assess the security needs of the Nation’s 
critical  transportation  infrastructure,  including  bridges  and  tunnels  (both  rail  and 
vehicles)? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration’s (TSA) Highway and Motor 
Carrier  Division  has  ambitiously  pursued  the  security  assessment  of  the  Nation’s 
critical  bridges  and  tunnels  in  a  program  that  began  more  than  3  years  ago.  TSA’s 
Corporate  Security  Review  (CSR)  program  has  conducted  transportation  security 
preparedness  visits  to  State-level  departments  of  transportation  in  37  of  the  50 
states,  both  identifying  critical  structures  and  helping  the  stewards  of  those  struc-
tures  to  identify  and  address  security  vulnerabilities.  In  addition,  TSA’s  Highway 
and  Motor  Carrier  program  office  has  actively  partnered  with  the  U.S.  Department 
of  Transportation’s  (DOT)  Federal  Highway  Administration  (FHWA)  to  assist  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

blast  modeling  on  highway  structures  and  preparation  of  prospective  ‘‘hardening’’ 
standards  for  new  construction.  We  anticipate  that  by  the  close  of  2007,  all  50 
States  will  have  been  subjected  to  the  interactive  CSR  visits.  These  programs  have 
been widely acclaimed by the American Association of State Highway and Transpor-
tation  Officials  (AASHTO)  as  both  helpful  and  popular  with  security  specialists  in 
each state. In 2007, we also anticipate a much closer review of the 11 international 
bridges that link the United States with our Western Hemisphere neighbors. 

In  the  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  mode,  TSA  has  led  a  coordinated  inter-
agency  effort  on  multiple  fronts  to  assess  the  security  needs  of  critical  infrastruc-
ture. The programs and initiatives include the following: 
Surface Transportation Security Inspection Program 

Under the Surface Transportation Security Inspection Program, TSA has deployed 
100 inspectors. Assigned to 19 field offices throughout the United States, the inspec-
tors cover the key rail and mass transit facilities in their regions. The program has 
focused on nationwide outreach and liaison activities with the rail industry and ini-
tiatives  aimed  at  identifying  the  security  needs  of  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit 
systems and enhancing their security posture. These efforts include assessment pro-
grams specifically intended to assist the agencies in identifying and mitigating their 
security gaps and elevating the security baseline throughout the mode. 

Through  the  Baseline  Assessment  and  Security  Enhancement  (BASE)  Program, 
inspectors  review  the  implementation  by  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  systems 
of Security and Emergency Management Action Items, which were recently updated 
by TSA and the Federal Transit Administration. This initiative aims to elevate secu-
rity  posture  throughout  the  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  mode  by  identifying 
gaps in the implementation of baseline security measures adaptable to the operating 
circumstances  of  any  system.  Additionally,  the  STSI  Program  offers  the  Security 
Analysis  and  Action  Program  (SAAP),  which  constitutes  a  systematic  vulnerability 
assessment  of  mass  transit  or  passenger  rail  systems.  The  program  utilizes  several 
different  tools  to  identify  vulnerabilities  based  on  specific  scenarios,  such  as  an  im-
provised  explosive  device  (IED)  on  a  passenger  train.  SAAPs  can  be  conducted  on 
individual critical infrastructure facilities or entire rail systems, with particular em-
phasis on critical control points. 
Targeted Security Training Initiative 

The  BASE  assessment  results  indicate  a  need  for  more  focused  effort  in  security 
training for transit agency employees. Although an extensive Federal security train-
ing  program  has  been  implemented  since  9/11—17  security  courses,  more  than  500 
deliveries, more than 78,000 transit employees trained—the assessment results indi-
cated  wide  variations  in  the  quality  of  transit  agencies’  security  training  programs 
and  an  inadequate  level  of  refresher  or  follow-on  training.  Well-trained  employees 
are  a  security  force  multiplier  for  security  efforts  implemented  by  transit  agencies. 
To elevate the level of training generally, bring greater consistency, and assist agen-
cies in developing and implementing training programs, TSA produced and dissemi-
nated a Mass Transit Security Training Program. 

The  program  identifies  specific  types  of  training  at  basic  and  follow-on  levels  for 
particular  categories  of  transit  employees.  Presented  in  a  readily  understandable 
matrix,  it  provides  effective  guidance  to  transit  agency  officials  in  building  and  im-
plementing  training  programs  for  employees  working  in  their  systems.  To  support 
execution of such training programs, the Transit Security Grant Program offers pre- 
packaged training options agencies may obtain with grant funding. Agencies taking 
advantage  of  this  program  have  their  applications  expedited  for  approval  to  ensure 
funds are delivered within 90 days of submission. This initiative aims to expand sig-
nificantly the volume and quality of training for transit employees during 2007. 
Connecting Communities 

This is another initiative that helps TSA assess the security needs of mass transit 
and passenger rail systems by bringing the Federal transportation security partners 
together with State, local, and tribal government representatives and the local first 
responder  community.  This  provides  a  forum  (2-day  workshops)  to  discuss  security 
prevention and response efforts, identify gaps, and ways to work together effectively 
to  prepare  and  protect  their  communities.  These  forums  enhance  information  and 
intelligence  sharing  among  partners  in  transportation  security  to  facilitate  preven-
tion and ensure the capacity for rapid and flexible response and recovery to all-haz-
ards events. TSA partners with the FTA on Connecting Communities. These forums 
also  help  clarify  the  role  of  Federal,  State  and  local  emergency  management  offices 
to  facilitate  efficient  planning,  preparedness  and  response  coordination.  In  support 
of  this  regional  engagement  effort,  area  National  Joint  Terrorism  Task  Force  rep-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

93 

resentatives  will  provide  presentations  on  their  activities  and  coordination  respon-
sibilities. 
Safety and Security Roundtables 

TSA,  FTA,  and  the  DHS  Office  of  Grants  and  Training  co-sponsored  the  fifth 
Transit  Security  and  Safety  Roundtable  in  December  2006.  The  roundtables  bring 
together  the  security  coordinators  and  safety  directors  from  the  Nation’s  50  largest 
transit  agencies  and  facilitate  dialogue  between  the  government,  police  and  safety 
and security departments, and industry leaders on how best to address current tran-
sit safety, security and emergency management challenges. The roundtables provide 
a  forum  for  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  safety  and  security  officials  to  share 
effective  practices  and  develop  relationships  to  improve  coordination  and  collabora-
tion. Roundtables occur twice each year, generally in late spring and late fall. 
Interagency Tunnel Risk Mitigation Working Group 

This interagency effort brings together subject matter experts from a range of rel-
evant  fields  among  DHS  and  DOT  organizational  elements  to  identify,  assess,  and 
prioritize  the  risk  to  mass  transit  and  passenger  rail  systems  in  the  United  States 
with  underwater  tunnels  and  to  assist  transit  agencies  in  planning  and  imple-
menting protective measures to deter and prevent attacks and blast mitigation and 
emergency  response  strategies  in  the  event  of  a  terrorist  attack  and/or  all  hazards 
incident or event. Through regular meetings, this working group has developed miti-
gation strategies, engaged stakeholders, analyzed and applied the results of risk as-
sessments, prepared statements of work for testing and modeling programs, and in-
tegrating  the  overall  risk  mitigation  effort  for  a  cohesive,  coordinated,  and  effective 
approach. The initiative has: 

1. Identified and assessed risk to underwater tunnels. 
2. Prioritized tunnel risk mitigation based on risk to drive grant funding to the 
most pressing areas. 
3. Developed strategies for funding future technology research and development 
aimed at producing novel approaches to this challenging problem. 
4.  Produced  and  disseminated  recommended  protective  measures  transit  agen-
cies  may  implement  to  enhance  security  with  available  resources  or  through 
targeted grant funding. 

To  advance  this  concerted  effort,  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  has  made 
projects to protect high risk underwater and underground assets and systems a top 
funding priority. 

Question 5. What are the top 10 rail security vulnerabilities which remain on the 

Northeast Corridor rail line? 

Answer.  The  top  rail  security  priorities  in  the  Northeast  Corridor  area,  encom-
passing  the  multiple  means  of  public  transportation  in  operation,  consist  of  the  fol-
lowing: 

• Obtain  concurrence  in  the  Boston,  New  York/New  Jersey,  Philadelphia,  and 
Washington, DC, regions on security priorities for funding under the Transit Se-
curity Grant Program. 

mass transit capital improvement projects. 

• Hardening and security enhancement for passenger rail tunnels. 
• Integration  of  security  into  design  and  construction  in  all  passenger  rail  and 
• Regional coordination of Federal, State, and local authorities and passenger rail 
and  mass  transit  agencies  to  expand  employment  of  the  full  range  of  available 
security resources in random, unpredictable manner for maximum deterrent ef-
fect. 
• Implement  joint  security  enhancement  deployments  of  TSA  Visible  Intermodal 
Prevention  and  Response  teams  on  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  systems 
throughout the Northeast Corridor. 
• Coordination  of  security  and  emergency  response  plan  and  activities  between 
• Expanded  security  training  for  front-line  employees,  consistent  with  the  train-
• Completion Baseline Assessment for Security Enhancement program reviews of 
the  major  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  systems  in  the  Northeast  Corridor. 
• Advance  risk-based  deployment  of  TSA-certified  explosives  detection  canine 

ing program disseminated under the Transit Security Grant Program. 

Amtrak and mass transit and passenger rail providers. 

teams. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

94 

• Assess power grid infrastructure and work with affected passenger rail systems 
to  ensure  security  enhancements  to  minimize  threat  of  intentional  acts  to  cut 
power and shut down operations. 

Question  6.  Will  the  Administration  request  enough  security  funding  for  Amtrak 

in the FY 2008 budget? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  supports  the  Presi-
dent’s Fiscal Year (FY) 2008 budget request. The Administration request for Amtrak 
funding  is  not  under  TSA’s  purview  but  that  of  the  Department  of  Transportation. 
However,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  leverages  targeted  secu-
rity grants to close the gaps at high risk properties. Through the Transportation Se-
curity  Grant  Program  (TSGP),  TSA  is  driving  improvement  in  the  six  security  fun-
damental areas, including training for key personnel, drills and exercises and public 
awareness  and  preparedness.  DHS  has  provided  more  than  $573  million  to  date  to 
60  of  the  country’s  rail  mass  transit,  ferry,  and  intra-city  bus  systems  in  25  states 
and  the  District  of  Columbia.  Through  the  Intercity  and  Passenger  Rail  Security 
System,  Amtrak  is  being  provided  $8.3  million  in  FY  2007  awards  for  security  en-
hancements  to  intercity  passenger  rail  security  initiatives  and  coordination  efforts 
with  local  and  regional  transit  systems.  Prior  to  this  grant  cycle,  Amtrak  has  been 
awarded $13.6 million through this program. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question  1.  Last  year,  Congress  passed  the  Port  Security  Improvement  Act  of 
2006  that  requires  the  Secretary  of  Transportation,  in  conjunction  with  the  Sec-
retary of Homeland Security to issue regulations within 18 months to: (1) verify the 
legal status of licensed commercial drivers in the United States, (2) implement com-
mercial  driver’s  license  and  anti-fraud  program,  and  (3)  for  the  Secretary  of  Home-
land  Security  to  draft  guidelines  to  improve  compliance  with  Federal  immigration 
and  customs  laws  applicable  to  foreign-based  commercial  motor  vehicles  and  their 
operators. 

What is the status of these regulations and guidelines? 
Have you given any thought as to how to accomplish these regulations and guide-
lines  to  reduce  CDL  fraud,  verify  the  legal  status  of  current  CDL  holders,  and  im-
prove compliance with immigration and customs laws for foreign truckers? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  recognizes  that  the 
primary statutory oversight of commercial drivers lies with the U.S. Department of 
Transportation and, as such, we defer to the Secretary of Transportation to address 
the primary issues of this question. TSA and the Department of Homeland Security, 
however,  are  actively  involved  in  assisting  our  Federal  colleagues  with  these  tasks 
in a number of ways. First, TSA issued a rule early in 2003 to satisfy Section 1012 
of the USA PATRIOT Act, which has vetted more than 2.5 million commercial driv-
ers who are authorized to carry hazardous materials. TSA is exploring ways to sub-
ject  the  remaining  10  million  commercial  driver’s  license  (CDL)  records  to  a  name- 
based  vetting  process  by  TSA  that  is  intended  to  identify  those  who  might  be  on 
security  watch  lists  or  in  the  country  unlawfully.  In  addition,  the  Department  of 
Homeland Security has issued a notice of proposed rulemaking to initiate implemen-
tation  of  the  ‘‘Real  ID  Act’’  passed  by  Congress  in  2005  addressing  security  rec-
ommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission.  The  rule,  once  final,  will  lead  to  identity 
verification of drivers in the United States in those States that implement the ‘‘Real 
ID’’  guidelines  and  can  significantly  cut  down  on  license  fraud.  Since  every  CDL 
issued  in  the  Nation  is  an  enhancement  of  the  State’s  base  license,  CDL  security 
will be enhanced as well. 

Question 2. TSA has repeatedly testified that it uses a risk-based methodology for 
allocating  resources.  Yet,  TSA  has  not  completed  a  comprehensive  risk  assessment 
of the Nation’s passenger rail system. Why has this assessment not been completed 
to date, and when can we expect it to be completed? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  looked  across  all 
modes  of  transportation  and  set  risk-based  priorities.  These  priorities  are  used  to 
focus  TSA’s  attention  and  resources  on  the  most  critical  issues.  TSA  has  conducted 
or participated in various risk analyses that compare risks across different transpor-
tation  modes,  including  most  recently  the  DHS  Strategic  Homeland  Infrastructure 
Risk  Assessment  (SHIRA).  Surface  transportation,  transit,  and  rail  are  currently 
high  priorities  for  TSA,  and  TSA  has  been  working  continuously  to  update  and  ex-
pand  its  assessments  of  threats  and  vulnerabilities  in  the  surface  transportation 
sector. TSA uses these assessments in conjunction with our security partners in gov-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

95 

ernment and industry to mitigate risk by operationalizing intelligence and address-
ing vulnerabilities. 
Headquarters Analysis 

TSA’s layered approach to security seeks to identify and deter threats well before 
they  reach  the  Nation’s  airports,  railways,  highways,  mass  transit,  ports  and  pipe-
lines. Transportation-specific intelligence is critical to TSA’s overall risk-based secu-
rity  strategy,  and  its  products  provide  a  threat  framework  to  prioritize  security  re-
sources  and  operationalize  intelligence.  Two  of  TSA’s  operational  programs  have 
field units—the Office of Security Operations, which is responsible for both aviation 
Transportation  Security  Officers  (TSO)  screening  and  surface  inspector  operations, 
and  the  Office  of  Law  Enforcement,  which  is  responsible  for  the  Federal  Air  Mar-
shal  Service  (FAMS).  These  elements  incorporate  intelligence  into  their  operations 
and plans on a daily basis, acting or deploying on the basis of the latest information. 
TSA  also  coordinates  closely  and  shares  information  with  other  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  (DHS)  components,  the  intelligence  and  law  enforcement  com-
munities,  other  government  departments  and  agencies,  such  as  the  Department  of 
Transportation (DOT), and the transportation industry. These security partners pro-
vide 
industry,  are  often  well-positioned  to 
operationalize  transportation-specific  intelligence  by  adjusting  their  business  or  se-
curity operations. 

intelligence  and,  especially 

TSA’s Office of Intelligence has produced classified and unclassified annual threat 
assessments  for  each  transportation  mode  and  the  cargo/supply  chain  sector  since 
2004.  These  reports  are  disseminated  throughout  TSA,  DHS,  and  private  industry. 
Other Office of Intelligence products include: 

in 

• Transportation Intelligence Gazette 
• Special Threat Assessments 
• Weekly Field Intelligence Report 
• Suspicious Incidents Report 
• Intelligence Notes 
• Transportation Situational Awareness Notes 
TSA  is  also  conducting  specific  analyses  related  to  underwater  mass  transit  tun-
nels.  In  October  2006,  an  Underwater  Tunnel  Working  Group  was  established  con-
sisting of members from various DHS and DOT entities. This interagency team has 
taken  significant  steps  to  identify  vulnerabilities  of  underwater  tunnels  and  imple-
mented  aggressive  mitigation  strategies  to  protect  high-risk  and  high-consequence 
tunnel infrastructure in both the short and long term. 
Field Assessments 

At  the  field  level,  TSA  and  its  Federal  partners  at  DHS  and  the  Federal  Transit 
Administration  (FTA)  have  conducted  numerous  assessments  in  the  rail  and  mass 
transit modes, described below: 

• In  the  aftermath  of  the  9/11  attacks,  FTA  completed  vulnerability  assessments 
of  37  of  the  top  50  transit  agencies  in  the  country,  as  measured  by  passenger 
volume. The assessments provided information that enabled transit agencies to 
undertake security enhancement activities with Federal grants and other fund-
ing  sources.  Additionally,  the  assessment  approach  and  the  results  informed 
TSA’s  security  programs,  including  development  of  the  Surface  Transportation 
Security  Inspection  Program  and  the  Baseline  Assessment  for  Security  En-
hancement (BASE) program, discussed in more detail below. 

• DHS Office of Grants and Training required assessments for all grant recipients 
under  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Program  (TSGP),  covering  more  than  60  of 
the largest transit agencies in the Nation. 

• TSA has completed over 2,600 criticality assessments for systems across the Na-

tion, including 848 for rail systems and 1,778 for mass transit systems. 

• 50 Site Assistance Visits have been completed across the Nation’s mass transit, 

bus, tunnel, and terminal systems. 

• 132 Buffer Zone Protection Plans have also been completed. 
• Through the Office of Grants and Training, the Department has provided tech-
nical  support  to  over  25  major  transit  systems,  as  well  as  Amtrak,  to  assist 
these  agencies  in  developing  risk  management  strategies  to  guide  the  expendi-
ture of scarce security dollars. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

96 

TIH Rail Assessments 

TSA  conducts  vulnerability  assessments  of  High  Threat  Urban  Area  (HTUA)  rail 
corridors  where  toxic  inhalation  hazard  (TIH)  shipments  are  transported.  Over  the 
last year, detailed region-wide rail corridor assessments were completed in Houston, 
Buffalo,  and  northern  New  Jersey,  and  a  fourth  assessment  is  in  the  early  stages 
of  completion  for  the  Los  Angeles  area.  The  HTUA  corridor  assessments  provide 
site-specific  mitigation  strategies  and  lessons  learned  as  well  as  tactics  that  can  be 
modified for use at the corporate or national level. HTUA corridor assessments sup-
ported  the  development  of  the  Recommended  Security  Action  Items  (SAI)  issued  by 
DHS  and  DOT  on  June  23,  2006.  These  performance-based  SAIs  were  developed  to 
foster  an  enhanced  security  posture  in  the  freight  rail  mode  in  general  and  specifi-
cally  targeted  the  transport  of  TIH  materials.  These  practices  have  been  agreed  to 
in  binding  commitments  by  the  Nation’s  railways,  and  form  the  basis  for  pending 
regulation. 
Surface Transportation Security Inspectors (STSI) 
BASE Reviews 

TSA  has  deployed  100  inspectors,  assigned  to  19  field  offices  across  the  country, 
to  provide  support  to  our  Nation’s  largest  mass  transit  systems.  Within  the  last 
year,  the  STSI  program  has  conducted  26  BASE  reviews  as  part  of  a  program  to 
conduct security reviews of the 50 largest transit systems nationwide. These officials 
perform  frequent  inspections  of  key  facilities  including  stations  and  terminals  for 
suspicious  or  unattended  items,  among  other  potential  threats.  The  BASE  process 
reviews security procedures put in place by a transit (rail and bus) system to assist 
in evaluating the performance of its security system. 

TSA  and  FTA  have  coordinated  to  offer  STSI  support  to  the  conduct  of  required 
security audits and reviews by State Safety Oversight Agencies under title 49, Code 
of  Federal  Regulations,  part  659.  Through  this  initiative,  which  commenced  in  Au-
gust  2006,  STSIs  have  thus  far  assisted  the  state  oversight  agencies  in  audits  con-
ducted  in  the  BART  system  (San  Francisco-Oakland),  New  Jersey  Transit  (Newark 
subway) and the Port Authority Transit Corporation of Pennsylvania and New Jer-
sey. TSA devoted a full day to discussing further development of this joint effort at 
the annual conference of State Safety Oversight Agencies sponsored by FTA in Sep-
tember  2006.  Coordinating  assessment  activity  to  integrate  BASE  reviews  with 
State Safety Oversight audits prevents ‘‘audit fatigue’’ among affected transit agen-
cies. 

Additionally,  inspectors  review  design  plans  for  systems  under  construction. 
STSIs  conducted  such  an  assessment  on  the  Phoenix  rail  transit  system  to  assess 
the  adequacy  of  its  security  design  and  recommend  improvements  that  can  be  ac-
complished during the final stages of construction. 
Security Action Items (SAI)—Non-Regulatory Inspections 

To gain an understanding of the degree of implementation across the Nation, rail-
road  carriers  of  TIH  materials,  DHS  and  DOT  agreed  to  conduct  SAI  Implementa-
tion  Surveys  (SAIIS)  of  freight  rail  operations.  These  surveys  are  conducted  by 
STSIs. The surveys are not compliance inspections, but rather assessments to deter-
mine the depth and degree of employee security awareness and security action item 
implementation. The results of the SAI Surveys will be reviewed and the data used 
to  guide  future  policy  decisions  regarding  the  security  of  hazardous  material  rail 
shipments. Since October 2006, STSIs have conducted 165 field site visits of freight 
railroad yards and facilities and interviewed 2,600 front-line railroad workers. 
Security Analysis and Action Programs (SAAP)—Risk Assessments 

STSIs  conduct  Security  Analysis  and  recommend  an  Action  Program.  SAAPs  are 
full  risk  assessments  of  transit  and  rail  systems.  They  are  not  compliance  inspec-
tions.  An  SAAP  assessment  rigorously  analyzes  the  likelihood  and  consequence  of 
the threat stream matrix for the rail environment and analyzes the effectiveness of 
countermeasures to manage risk effectively. SAAPs leverage the DHS Vulnerability 
Identification Self Assessment Tool (VISAT). 

The STSI program has completed full SAAP assessments on the following rail sys-

tems: 

• Virginia Railway Express 
• Alaska Railroad 
• Tri-Met (Portland, Oregon) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

97 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN 

Question  1.  Your  agency  and  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA) 
completed  an  annex  to  the  existing  Department  of  Homeland  Security/Department 
of Transportation Memorandum of Understanding in September, 2006. Can you tell 
us how this agreement has changed the relationship between your two agencies? 

Answer.  FRA  and  TSA  have  always  had  an  excellent,  cooperative  working  rela-
tionship. The annex on rail security has simply codified and enhanced that relation-
ship. Prior to executing the rail security annex with TSA, the two agencies have co-
ordinated on a number of projects. Since 2004, FRA has provided technical support 
and expertise to TSA for its ongoing security assessments of rail transportation cor-
ridors in High Threat Urban Areas. In 2006, FRA, TSA and PHMSA together draft-
ed and issued to the rail industry a set of security best practices, known as Security 
Action  Items,  for  the  transportation  of  certain  hazardous  materials.  FRA,  TSA  and 
PHMSA also coordinated closely on the two recently issued notices of proposed rule-
making (NPRM) on rail security, circulating drafts of the proposed rules among the 
three agencies. FRA has added TSA as a member of FRA’s Railroad Safety Advisory 
Committee, the group that assists FRA in developing its safety regulations, in order 
to  ensure  that  FRA’s  regulations  advance  both  rail  safety  and  security.  From  the 
time  that  DHS  was  created,  FRA  and  TSA  realized  that  close  coordination  was  es-
sential  due  to  the  great  overlap  between  safety  and  security,  and  the  two  agencies 
have worked closely together since then. 

Question 2. Are FRA safety inspectors and TSA surface security inspectors under-

taking rail inspections together as the Annex contemplates? 

Answer.  FRA  and  TSA  regularly  consult  on  rail  security  matters  and  continue  to 
leverage  the  skills  and  resources  of  each  agency  as  needed.  For  example,  FRA  in-
spectors provide technical expertise and support to TSA during vulnerability assess-
ments  of  rail  transportation  corridors  in  High  Threat  Urban  Areas.  The  two  agen-
cies,  in  consultation  with  the  rail  industry,  have  also  collaborated  to  issue  a  list  of 
recommended  Security  Action  Items  for  the  rail  transportation  of  toxic  inhalation 
hazard  materials.  FRA  and  TSA  are  currently  working  together  to  assess  the  level 
of implementation of the Security Action Items across the industry. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN 

Question  1.  The  recent  Administration  proposal  to  preempt  states,  localities  and 
towns  from  protecting  themselves  from  the  risk  of  hazardous  materials  shipments 
would  require  rail  carriers  to  evaluate  the  current  routes  they  use,  and  only  ‘‘the 
next most commercially practical’’ routes. Why limit this analysis to only one contin-
gency? 

Answer. On December 21, 2006, the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Ad-
ministration (PHMSA) published a notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM) proposing 
to  require  rail  carriers  to  compile  annual  data  on  specified  shipments  of  hazardous 
materials, use the data to analyze safety and security risks along rail transportation 
routes  where  those  materials  are  transported,  assess  alternative  routing  options, 
and  make  routing  decisions  based  on  those  assessments.  PHMSA  and  FRA  jointly 
drafted  the  NPRM,  and  coordinated  closely  with  TSA  in  its  development.  The  pur-
pose of the proposal is to help minimize transportation system risk and societal risk. 
The  proposal  would  require  rail  carriers  to  identify  and  collect  data  on  all  of  the 
routes  the  carrier  uses  to  transport  certain  high-risk  hazardous  materials.  Specifi-
cally,  each  rail  carrier  would  identify  the  rail  line  segments  over  which  these  com-
modities  are  transported.  As  the  carrier  deems  appropriate,  line  segments  could  be 
aggregated  into  logical  groupings,  such  as  between  major  interchange  points.  The 
rail  carrier  selected  line  segment(s)  are  considered  the  route  used  for  rail  routing 
analysis.  Within  each  route,  the  commodity  data  must  identify  the  route  location 
and  total  number  of  shipments  transported.  The  rail  carrier  must  then  assess  the 
safety  and  security  risks  associated  with  those  routes.  Rail  carriers  would  also  be 
required  to  identify  and  analyze  the  next  most  practicable  alternative  route,  if  any 
is  available,  over  which  they  have  authority  to  operate,  for  each  of  the  primary 
routes identified. 

Unlike  truck  routing,  with  its  web  of  interstate  highways,  toll  roads,  bypasses, 
and two-lane rural roads crisscrossing the country, within the rail system there are 
only  a  limited  number  of  alternatives.  The  NPRM  proposes  to  require  rail  carriers 
to  analyze  only  the  next  most  commercially  practicable  route  because  commercial 
and  operating  factors  limit  the  number  of  routes  available  to  a  rail  carrier.  Even 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

98 

the largest rail carriers will have, at most, two or three possible routes between any 
two  given  points.  As  used  in  this  proposal,  ‘‘commercially  practicable’’  means  that 
the  route  may  be  utilized  by  the  railroad  within  the  limits  of  the  railroad’s  par-
ticular  operating  constraints  and,  further,  that  the  route  is  economically  viable 
given  the  economics  of  the  commodity,  route,  and  customer  relationship.  The  ques-
tion  of  commercial  practicability  must  be  reasonably  evaluated  by  each  rail  carrier 
as  a  part  of  its  analysis  based  on  the  specific  circumstances  of  the  route  and  pro-
posed  traffic.  The  NPRM  also  contains  provisions  requiring  DOT  access  to  data, 
route  analysis,  and  route  selection.  This  will  provide  DOT  with  basic  oversight  of, 
and  insight  into,  route  analysis  performed  by  carriers.  If  the  chosen  route  is  found 
not to be the safest and most secure, commercially practical route, FRA may require 
use of an alternative route. 

Question  2.  As  the  Secretary’s  representative  on  the  Amtrak  Board  of  Directors, 
will you ensure that the Administration requests sufficient funding for Amtrak’s se-
curity needs in the FY 2008 budget? 

Answer.  The  FY  2008  budget  request  for  Amtrak  includes  $800  million  in  direct 
subsidies  and  $100  million  to  fund  a  program  of  matching  grants  to  the  States  to 
undertake capital investment projects for passenger rail services that States believe 
important. This direct subsidy amount includes $300 million for Amtrak’s operating 
costs and $500 million for Amtrak’s capital investments. This level of support is ap-
propriate  in  providing  Amtrak  with  the  incentive  to  reduce  costs,  rationalize  serv-
ices  and  pursue  innovations  to  make  its  services  more  efficient  and  effective.  By 
making  the  hard  choices  necessary  to  reform  its  operations,  Amtrak  will  be  able  to 
fund  essential  rail  passenger  service  needs  including  the  railroad’s  security  needs. 
Question  3.  Does  the  US  DOT  intend  to  fund  Amtrak’s  security  needs  from  the 

railroad’s operating grant? 

Answer. Amtrak receives a grant for security enhancements from the Department 
of  Homeland  Security  under  the  Infrastructure  Protection  Program  grants.  Amtrak 
will  need  to  fund  its  highest-priority  security  needs  from  the  resources  available  to 
the  corporation,  including  the  operating  and  capital  grants  from  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment, revenues and other funding available to it. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. JOHN H. HILL 

Question  1.  Your  agency  has  yet  to  sign  a  security  annex  with  the  TSA  covering 
your  respective  roles  for  truck  security.  Are  you  working  on  such  an  annex  now? 
If so, when will it be completed? 

Answer.  No.  Currently,  there  is  no  effort  ongoing  to  develop  such  annex.  Based 
on  the  Department-level  Memorandum  of  Understanding  (MOU),  FMCSA  and  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  continue  to  have  a  clear  under-
standing  of  the  security-related  roles  and  responsibilities  of  each  agency.  This  has 
been  proven  with  the  coordination  of  several  security-related  initiatives  that  have 
been developed over the last several years. 

Question 2. Is FMCSA involved with TSA’s truck tracking pilot project to test the 
feasibility  of  a  centralized  truck  tracking  center  and  the  Missouri  pilot  program  to 
gather  information  on  companies’  ability  to  protect  surface  transportation  assets? 
Can  you  give  us  a  progress  report  on  these  pilot  programs  and  describe  your  agen-
cy’s involvement? 

Answer.  FMCSA  is  involved  in  TSA’s  truck  tracking  pilot  by  providing  subject 
matter expertise in the areas of examining existing and emerging technologies. With 
respect  to  the  Missouri  pilot,  FMCSA  coordinated  with  TSA’s  Highway  Motor  Car-
rier  Programs  office  to  facilitate  the  initiation  of  TSA’s  Corporate  Security  Reviews 
(CSRs). The specific progress on these pilot programs should be obtained from TSA’s 
Highway Motor Carrier Programs. 

Question 3. In your testimony, you state that FMCSA has assessed over 400 civil 
penalties  for  failure  to  comply  with  the  hazardous  materials  security  regulations. 
Can  you  tell  us  what  type  of  non-compliance  you  have  found  and  what  more  needs 
to be done to ensure motor carrier compliance with these important regulations? 

Answer. Carriers not in compliance with the hazardous materials security regula-
tions  generally  have  security  plans  in  place  but  the  plans  are  missing  one  or  more 
of the components specified in the regulations (personnel security, unauthorized ac-
cess,  or  en  route  security).  Others  fail  to  follow  the  actions  in  their  security  plan. 
Smaller  carriers  found  to  be  in  non-compliance  are  more  likely  than  larger  carriers 
to  have  no  security  plans  in  place.  FMCSA  has  discovered  security  training  as  an 
area that requires more attention by motor carriers to reduce non-compliance. Civil 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

99 

penalties  have  been  assessed  for  lack  of  security  training  as  well  as  deficiencies  in 
security  plans.  FMCSA  minimizes  non-compliance  by  providing  recommendations 
and outreach materials. 

Question  4.  Has  adding  security  contract  reviews  and  the  other  FMCSA  security 
initiatives  to  your  agency’s  list  of  responsibilities  taken  away  from  your  resources 
for truck safety? Do you feel that TSA needs to take over some of the motor carrier 
security  work,  or  perhaps  reimburse  your  agency  for  the  work  it  is  now  doing  to 
ensure that your primary safety mission is accomplished? 

Answer.  Following  the  tragic  events  of  September  11,  2001,  FMCSA  shifted  re-
sources away from strictly truck safety activities to address security issues, particu-
larly  with  respect  to  hazardous  materials.  FMCSA  activities  included  conducting 
over 30,000 educational visits with hazardous materials carriers to raise their secu-
rity awareness, developing security outreach for law enforcement, carriers and driv-
ers, and investigating technologies that had the potential to improve security in the 
trucking  industry.  The  agency  also  trained  our  field  investigators  on  the  security 
plan  regulations  for  hazardous  materials  carriers  and  began  conducting  security 
compliance visits, called Security Contact Reviews. 

As  the  TSA  has  increased  the  scope  of  its  activities  with  respect  to  commercial 
vehicle  safety,  FMCSA  has  transitioned  to  the  role  of  providing  TSA  with  our  sub-
ject matter expertise regarding the truck and bus industries. While the agency does 
still  devote  resources  to  Security  Contact  Reviews,  this  is  now  done  in  conjunction 
with  our  safety  visits,  resulting  in  efficiencies  for  the  agency  and  the  motor  carrier 
industry through fewer on-sight visits. 

RESPONSE TO QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

HON. JOHN H. HILL 

Question  1.  Last  year,  Congress  passed  the  Port  Security  Improvement  Act  of 
2006  that  requires  the  Secretary  of  Transportation,  in  conjunction  with  the  Sec-
retary of Homeland Security to issue regulations within 18 months to: (1) verify the 
legal status of licensed commercial drivers in the United States, (2) implement com-
mercial  driver’s  license  and  anti-fraud  program,  and  (3)  for  the  Secretary  of  Home-
land  Security  to  draft  guidelines  to  improve  compliance  with  Federal  immigration 
and  customs  laws  applicable  to  foreign-based  commercial  motor  vehicles  and  their 
operators. What is the status of these regulations and guidelines? 

Answer.  FMCSA  plans  to  publish  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  ad-

dressing the SAFE Port Act provisions assigned to the agency by August 2007. 

Question  1a.  Have  you  given  any  thought  as  to  how  to  accomplish  these  regula-
tions  and  guidelines  to  reduce  CDL  fraud,  verify  the  legal  status  of  current  CDL 
holders,  and  improve  compliance  with  immigration  and  customs  laws  for  foreign 
truckers? 

Answer. The Security and Accountability For Every Port (SAFE Port) Act of 2006 
requires  FMCSA  to  issue  regulations  to  implement  the  recommendations  in  the 
June  4,  2004,  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  Office  of  the  Inspector  General 
(OIG) memorandum regarding legal status verification for CDL drivers. The Act also 
requires the agency to issue regulations to implement recommendations in the Feb-
ruary  7,  2006,  OIG  report  Oversight  of  the  Commercial  Driver’s  License  Program. 
The  Act  requires  the  completion  of  rulemaking  within  18  months  of  the  date  of  en-
actment. 

The June 4, 2004, OIG memorandum entitled ‘‘Need to Establish a Legal Presence 
Requirement for Obtaining a Commercial Driver’s License’’ (Control No. 2004–054), 
recommended  that  FMCSA  establish  a  legal  presence  requirement  for  obtaining  a 
CDL. The report said that all CDL applicants should demonstrate either citizenship 
or lawful permanent residence in the U.S. before a State may issue a CDL. The Feb-
ruary  7,  2006,  ‘‘Report  on  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  Oversight 
of  Commercial  Driver’s  License  Program’’  (Report  Number  MH–2006–037)  contains 
the following three broad recommendations to detect and prevent fraudulent testing 
and licensing activity in the CDL program: 

1. Direct the States to report on the final disposition of all suspect drivers iden-
tified  by  the  States.  These  disposition  reports  should  emphasize  but  not  nec-
essarily  be  limited  to  instances  where  there  is  specific  or  direct  evidence  that 
the driver participated in a fraudulent activity to obtain the CDL; 
2.  Determine  that  State  CDL  programs  are  out  of  compliance,  under  Federal 
regulations,  if  the  State  fails  to  impose  adequate  internal  controls  to  prevent 
fraud or fails to take or propose necessary corrective action; and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

100 

3.  Impose  sanctions,  under  Federal  regulations,  against  those  States  that  fail 
to establish adequate fraud control measures for their CDL programs. 

Prior to the enactment of the SAFE Port Act and in response to earlier statutory 
mandates  (TEA–21  and  SAFETEA–LU),  previous  OIG  recommendations,  and  in 
order to increase uniformity in the CDL program, FMCSA had begun drafting a No-
tice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  on  Commercial  Driver’s  License  Testing  and 
Commercial  Learner’s  Permit  Standards  to  address  sixteen  distinct  issues  in  the 
CDL  program.  To  effectively  address  the  new  SAFE  Port  Act  provisions  within  the 
established  statutory  timetable,  FMCSA  will  incorporate  the  requirements  in  this 
rulemaking. 

Question  2.  I  also  understand  that  FMCSA  is  considering  a  ‘‘pilot  program’’  to 
allow  some  long-haul  Mexico-domiciled  motor  carriers  to  operate  with  full  access 
throughout  the  United  States.  Under  what  authority  can  the  Department  propose 
and implement such a pilot program? 

Answer.  The  North  American  Free  Trade  Agreement  (NAFTA),  as  implemented 
by  Congress,  requires  the  United  States  to  allow  Mexican  trucks  to  operate  on  our 
highways.  This  is  the  Department’s  authority  for  implementing  the  cross-border 
commercial motor vehicle transportation pilot program. 

Prior to NAFTA’s ratification, Congress imposed a moratorium on the issuance of 
new  grants  of  operating  authority  to  motor  carriers  domiciled  in  a  contiguous  for-
eign country or owned or controlled by persons of a contiguous foreign country (Sec-
tion  6,  Public  Law  97–261).  The  legislation  authorized  the  President  to  remove  or 
modify  the  moratorium  upon  a  determination  that  such  action  was  in  the  national 
interest.  The  terms  of  NAFTA,  Annex  I,  provide  that  the  moratorium  on  licensing 
Mexican  motor  carriers  to  operate  within  the  United  States  will  be  lifted  by  the 
President in phases. The President lifted the moratorium in 2002. 

Section 350 of the Fiscal Year 2002 DOT Appropriations Act (Public Law 107–87) 
prohibited  the  expenditure  of  appropriated  funds  for  reviewing  or  processing  appli-
cations by Mexico-domiciled carriers to operate beyond U.S. municipalities and com-
mercial  zones  on  the  U.S.-Mexico  border  until  FMCSA  undertook  several  specified 
actions. As the requirements of Section 350 have been addressed, FMCSA may proc-
ess the applications of long-haul Mexico-domiciled carriers pursuant to FMCSA’s au-
thority to register motor carriers in 49 U.S.C. § 13902(a). 

With the understanding of the Government of Mexico, FMCSA will initially proc-
ess  a  limited  number  of  applications  to  allow  the  agency  to  thoroughly  and  delib-
erately evaluate agency procedures and oversight plans. 

Question 2a. What are the specific features of this pilot program to allow Mexican 

trucks to conduct long-haul operations in the U.S.? 

Answer. 

1. A one-year pilot program. 
2. Up to 100 Mexican motor carriers will participate. 
3. Up to 100 U.S. carriers may also participate in the pilot program. 
4.  All  Mexican  participants  must  have  basic  safety  management  controls  in 
place. 
5.  FMCSA  will  conduct  safety  audits  and  compliance  in  reviews  in  Mexico  to 
comply  with  Section  350  of  the  2002  Appropriations  Act.  All  other  Section  350 
requirements will also be met. 
6. Participating Mexican motor carriers, commercial motor vehicles, and drivers 
will  be  subject  to  all  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Regulations  requirements 
while operating in the United States. 
7.  Participation  is  limited  to  non-hazardous  property  motor  carriers.  No  haz-
ardous materials or passenger transportation is authorized under the pilot pro-
gram. 
8. Participating Mexican motor carriers will be monitored throughout the dura-
tion of the project. 
9.  FMCSA  will  have  the  ability  to  revoke  or  suspend  provisional  operating  au-
thority during the program if Mexican carriers are not operating safely. 
10.  The  Department  is  working  closely  with  the  Government  of  Mexico  on  the 
program. 
11.  After  completion  of  the  program,  DOT  will  evaluate  the  pilot  program  and 
make recommendations to the Secretary on next steps. 

Question  2b.  Do  you  see  foreign  (particularly  Mexico)  domiciled  trucks  and  truck 

drivers as a greater security risk than U.S. carriers? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

101 

Answer.  FMCSA  has  no  information  that  would  indicate  Mexican  motor  carriers 
or drivers will pose a greater security risk than U.S. motor carriers or drivers. Mexi-
can  commercial  motor  vehicles  are  more  likely  than  their  U.S.  counterparts  to  re-
ceive  an  inspection  from  FMCSA  or  State  inspectors.  In  addition,  Mexican  carriers 
crossing into the U.S. are required to undergo an examination by U.S. Customs and 
Border Protection. 

Question  2c.  If  foreign-based  trucking  companies  are  allowed  to  enter  U.S.  mar-
kets, will they be required to pay the same apportioned fuel taxes, registration fees, 
and other user fees that U.S. trucking companies are required to pay? 

Answer. Yes. 
Question  2d.  Would  these  foreign  carriers  be  required  to  register  with  the  Inter-
national  Registration  Plan  (IRP)  and  the  Internal  Fuel  Tax  Agreement  (IFTA)  as 
U.S.  carriers  do  to  ensure  their  payment  of  state  fuel  taxes  and  registration  fees? 
Answer.  Yes.  FMCSA  has  worked  with  the  States  and  the  IRP  and  IFTA  pro-

grams to ensure their systems can accommodate Mexican motor carriers. 

Question 3. S. 184 requires TSA and DOT to develop a program to encourage the 
motor carriers transporting hazardous materials to equip their trucks with wireless 
communications  technology  that  provides  continuous  communications,  vehicle  posi-
tion  and  location  and  tracking  capabilities,  and  an  emergency  broadcast  capability. 
In  Arkansas,  we  have  J.B.  Hunt  Transport  Services,  one  of  the  leading  innovators 
in  the  use  of  information  technology  in  the  transportation  sector.  While  I  applaud 
J.B.  Hunt  for  their  leadership  in  this  area,  nationally  there  are  still  many  small 
motor  carriers  that  may  not  be  able  to  afford  this  equipment.  What  are  your  views 
on these technologies and how would you envision these technologies working to im-
prove security? 

Answer. FMCSA became aware of many technologies that could improve the safe-
ty,  security,  and  efficiency  of  hazardous  materials  (HM)  transportation  after  Sep-
tember  11,  2001.  FMCSA  completed  an  operational  test  (HM  Op  Test)  that  applied 
these  technologies  in  the  highway  transportation  of  HM  and  documented  the  costs 
and  benefits  of  these  technologies.  The  HM  Op  Test  demonstrated  that  deploying 
technologies  such  as  wireless  communications  results  in  some  security  benefits  for 
motor  carriers.  Further  we  were  able  to  measure  safety  and  efficiency  benefits  for 
the motor carriers employing these technologies. The results of the test were trans-
mitted  to  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  in  January  2005.  Since  the 
HM  Op  Test,  FMCSA  has  been  encouraging  the  industry  to  use  these  technologies. 
Question  3a.  Do  you  consider  requiring  the  installation  of  this  wireless  commu-

nications technology to be necessary? 

Answer.  While  FMCSA  has  examined  these  technologies  in  real-world  environ-
ment, our test was limited and it is difficult to conclude the necessity to require the 
installation  of  the  wireless  communications.  FMCSA  believes  that  TSA’s  Hazmat 
Truck  Security  Pilot  Program  will  yield  additional  information  to  guide  this  deci-
sion, but would defer to the Department of Homeland Security to determine if regu-
latory action is warranted. 

Question 3b. How should DOT encourage motor carriers to install this equipment? 
Answer.  DOT  has  been  encouraging  the  use  of  this  equipment  by  presenting  the 
results  of  our  HM  Op  Test  at  a  wide  variety  of  industry  and  transportation  re-
search-related forums. We believe that calling attention to the efficiency benefits ex-
perienced  through  the  use  of  technologies  such  as  wireless  communications  will  re-
sult  in  wider  use  of  security  technology,  in  addition  to  safety  and  security  benefits. 
Question  3c.  How  will  DOT  address  the  interoperability  of  their  equipment  and 

the motor carriers’ equipment? 

Answer.  DOT  will  work  with  DHS  to  ensure  any  security  technology  required  is 
compatible  with  the  safety  equipment  already  installed  on  commercial  motor  vehi-
cles. 

Question 4. Commercial Drivers License holders are being required to go through 
multiple  security  screening  programs.  Drivers  applying  for  a  Hazardous  Materials 
Endorsement  (HME)  must  undergo  a  Security  Threat  Assessment.  TSA  issued  a 
final rule implementing the Transportation Worker Identification Credential (TWIC) 
for  maritime  facilities  and  there  is  another  screening  process  for  truckers  trans-
porting  air  cargo.  Each  of  these  security  requirements  costs  money.Do  you  plan  to 
roll the TWIC program out to the surface transportation sector in the future? If so, 
how would the program work for the rail and trucking industries? 

Question  4a.  How  does  the  security  screening  for  HME  certification  differ  from 

TWIC? 

Question  4b.  Can  Commercial  Drivers  get  one  security  certification  that  covers 

them all for intermodal transportation? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

102 

Answer 4–4b. The security screening or background check requirements are a re-
sponsibility  of  the  TSA.  Therefore,  TSA  is  uniquely  qualified  to  respond  to  the  spe-
cific  questions  and  explain  the  relationship  of  its  security  screening  requirements. 
Question  5.  FMCSA’s  primary  mission  is  to  prevent  truck  accidents  and  improve 
truck  and  bus  safety.  FMCSA  is  additionally  involved  with  truck  security,  under-
taking  what  are  known  as  Security  Contract  Reviews  to  assess  truck  security  pro-
grams,  and  other  security  outreach  and  training  activities.  There  is  some  concern 
that  these  additional  security  responsibilities  take  away  from  FMCSA’s  available 
truck safety resources. 

Has  adding  Security  Contract  Reviews  and  the  other  FMCSA  security  initiatives 
to  your  agency’s  list  of  responsibilities  taken  away  from  your  resources  for  truck 
safety?  Do  you  feel  that  TSA  needs  to  take  over  some  of  the  motor  carrier  security 
work, or perhaps reimburse your agency for the work it is now doing, to ensure that 
your primary safety mission is accomplished? 

Answer.  Following  the  tragic  events  of  September  11,  2001,  FMCSA  did  shift  re-
sources away from strictly truck safety activities to address security issues, particu-
larly  with  respect  to  hazardous  materials.  FMCSA  activities  included  conducting 
over 30,000 educational visits with hazardous materials carriers to raise their secu-
rity awareness, developing security outreach for law enforcement, carriers and driv-
ers, and investigating technologies that had the potential to improve security in the 
trucking  industry.  The  agency  also  trained  our  field  investigators  on  the  security 
plan  regulations  for  hazardous  materials  carriers  and  began  conducting  security 
compliance visits, called Security Contact Reviews. 

As TSA has increased the scope of its activities with respect to commercial vehicle 
safety,  FMCSA  has  been  transitioning  to  a  role  of  providing  TSA  with  our  subject 
matter expertise regarding the truck and bus industries. While the agency does still 
devote  resources  to  Security  Contact  Reviews,  this  is  now  done  in  conjunction  with 
our safety visits, resulting in efficiencies for the agency and the motor carrier indus-
try. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

VADM THOMAS J. BARRETT 

Question 1. Admiral Barrett, can you tell us how well carriers are complying with 
the  security  plan  requirement  of  your  HM–232  rule?  Is  your  agency,  or  other  DOT 
modal  agencies,  taking  enforcement  actions  against  carriers  who  do  not  have  plans 
or whose plans are insufficient? 

Answer.  Yes.  The  largest  hazardous  materials  carriers  have  developed  security 
plans  in  accordance  with  the  HM–232  requirements.  The  rate  of  compliance  among 
smaller carriers is improving as companies understand and gain experience with the 
regulations.  The  HM–232  regulations  establish  a  general  baseline  for  the  develop-
ment  and  scope  of  plans,  rather  than  mandating  a  prescriptive  set  of  specific  secu-
rity  measures,  that  must  be  followed  by  companies  that  transport  hazardous  mate-
rials  (hazmat)  or  offer  hazmat  for  transportation  in  commerce.  Each  security  plan 
must  reflect  an  individualized  risk  assessment  and,  at  a  minimum,  address  per-
sonnel  security,  unauthorized  access,  and  en  route  security  risks.  These  rules  were 
promulgated in 2003 and are enforced by PHMSA, the Federal Motor Carrier Safety 
Administration (FMCSA), and the Federal Railroad Administration (FRA). All three 
agencies  address  security  plans  in  their  inspections  and  take  enforcement  actions 
against  hazmat  carriers  and  offerors  that  have  not  developed  plans  or  whose  plans 
are  insufficient.  Most  inspection  and  enforcement  activity  involving  rail  and  motor 
carriers is conducted by FRA and FMCSA, respectively. 

Question  2.  Your  agency  recently  announced  a  proposed  rule  that  would  reduce 
the  list  of  hazardous  material  of  which  carriers  are  required  to  develop  security 
plans.  If  such  a  change  was  made,  would  this  also  impact  the  truck  driver’s  haz-
ardous  materials  endorsement  or  other  hazardous  materials  safety  processes  re-
quired by the Department? 

Answer. No. We are not considering reducing the list of materials that are subject 
to  the  Department’s  general  safety  rules  for  hazardous  materials  transportation. 
Specifically,  we  are  not  considering  relaxing  the  requirements  (established  under 
regulations promulgated and enforced by FMCSA) that truck drivers who transport 
placarded  quantities  of  hazardous  materials  obtain  a  hazmat  endorsement  (HME) 
on  their  commercial  driver’s  licenses.  The  HME  requirement  ensures  that  these  in-
dividuals have the knowledge and training necessary to protect themselves, the pub-
lic,  and  the  environment  from  exposure  to  hazardous  materials  during  transpor-
tation and in emergencies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

103 

Because of its scientific basis and wide acceptance in the transportation industry, 
the  list  of  materials  triggering  the  HME  requirement  provided  a  logical  starting 
point for regulations intended to protect against transportation security risks posed 
by the intentional release of hazardous substances. The same triggering list was in-
corporated  into  the  security  plan  rules  adopted  in  2003  and,  by  operation  of  law, 
as implemented in regulations issued by the Transportation Security Administration 
(TSA), is linked to the security background check requirement for truck drivers. 

As  we  have  gained  more  experience  with  these  new  requirements,  we  believe  it 
is  time  to  consider  narrowing  the  list  of  materials  and  quantities  that  trigger  addi-
tional security-specific requirements, without changing the scope of our basic safety 
rules. Last fall, PHMSA issued an Advanced Notice of Proposed Rulemaking, in re-
sponse  to  two  industry  petitions  for  rulemaking  suggesting  that  the  regulations 
should  create  a  distinction  between  hazardous  materials  that  ‘‘present  a  significant 
security  risk  while  in  transportation  and  the  vast  majority  of  hazardous  materials 
that  pose  no  significant  security  risk  in  transportation.’’  If  adopted,  such  a  change 
would  apply  only  to  the  security  plan  requirements  in  49  CFR  Part  172,  Subpart 
I. It would not change the HME regulations, and it would not affect other hazardous 
materials safety requirements in the HMR. 

PHMSA also has been working with FMCSA and TSA to evaluate the list of mate-
rials  for  which  a  driver  security  background  check  is  required  under  existing  law 
and  regulations.  As  with  the  security  plan  requirement,  we  understand  concerns 
that  the  triggering  list  may  be  broader  than  necessary  to  address  security-specific 
risks. Because we are not considering any change in the scope of the HME require-
ment  (which  is  incorporated  by  reference  into  the  existing  statutory  mandate),  any 
proposal  to  narrow  the  list  of  materials  that  require  a  background  check  would  re-
quire legislative action. 

Question  3.  Have  you  discussed  the  possible  implications  of  further  stratifying 
hazardous  materials  regulations  based  on  security  risk  with  the  other  DOT  modal 
agencies? 

Answer.  Yes.  On  transportation  security  issues  we  work  very  closely  with  the 
other  modal  agencies  that  enforce  the  HMR—FRA,  FMCSA,  and  the  Federal  Avia-
tion Administration (FAA)—in addition to TSA. Given their enforcement responsibil-
ities  and  modal  expertise,  FRA,  FMCSA,  and  FAA  have  an  important  voice  in  any 
decision  about  the  scope  of  the  HMR,  including  the  current  proposals  to  more  nar-
rowly target security-specific risks. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

VADM THOMAS J. BARRETT 

Question 1. How well are motor carriers complying with the security plan require-

ment of your hazardous materials rule HM–232? 

Answer.  Generally  speaking,  we  believe  the  rate  of  compliance  is  good  and  im-
proving.  Overall,  we  find  that  most  motor  carriers,  including  the  largest  trucking 
companies, have plans in place that comply with the HM–232 rules. Where we find 
violations,  these  increasingly  involve  plans  that  do  not  contain  all  of  the  elements 
required  under  the  rules,  as  opposed  to  situations  in  which  the  carrier  has  no  plan 
in place. 

Question  2.  What  enforcement  action  is  being  taken  involving  this  requirement? 
What  actions  have  been  taken  against  carriers  who  do  not  have  plans  or  whose 
plans are insufficient? 

Answer.  Where  appropriate,  PHMSA  and  FMCSA  assess  civil  penalties  against 
carriers  and  offerors  that  have  not  complied  with  the  HM–232  rules,  whether  by 
failing  to  adopt  a  plan  altogether  or  by  failing  to  address  mandatory  subjects  in 
their  security  plans.  Both  agencies  target  civil  enforcement  based  on  risk  and  use 
inspections and other means to assist motor carriers in developing appropriate secu-
rity  plans.  For  example,  during  2006  PHMSA  cited  244  security  violations  in  ap-
proximately 1,750 inspections for all activity types (shipper’s, retesters, manufactur-
ers,  carriers  and  rebuilders);  FMCSA  cited  1,051  security  violations  in  approxi-
mately 6,000 inspections of motor carriers and shippers. 

Question  3.  Your  agency’s  recent  proposal  to  preempt  states,  localities  and  towns 
from  protecting  themselves  from  the  risk  of  hazardous  materials  shipments  would 
require rail carriers to evaluate the current routes they use, and only ‘‘the next most 
commercially practical’’ routes. Why limit this analysis to only one contingency? 

Answer.  In  this  rulemaking  (Docket  HM–232E),  we  have  proposed  a  requirement 
that we believe will reduce the overall risks posed by the movement of certain haz-
ardous materials by rail, without imposing an undue burden on transportation. Our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

104 

proposed  rule  would  require  rail  carriers  that  move  certain  high  hazard  materials 
to  conduct  a  thorough  analysis  of  the  comparative  risks  of  particular  commodity 
movements  via  the  carrier’s  selected  routes  and,  in  each  case,  the  next  most  prac-
ticable  alternative  route  over  which  it  has  authority  to  operate.  This  limitation  on 
the required route analysis reflects a proposed balancing of interests and the inher-
ent  limitations  on  routing  alternatives  in  the  railroad  industry.  Unlike  truck  rout-
ing,  with  its  web  of  interstate  highways,  toll  roads,  bypasses,  and  two-lane  rural 
roads crisscrossing the country, within the rail system there are only a limited num-
ber  of  route  alternatives.  In  addition  to  requiring  carriers  to  identify  and  analyze 
routing  alternatives,  the  NPRM  also  proposes  to  require  rail  carriers  to  grant  DOT 
access  to  data,  route  analyses,  and  route  selection.  This  would  provide  DOT  with 
basic oversight of and insight into route analyses performed by carriers. If a chosen 
route  is  found  not  to  be  the  safest  and  most  secure  commercially  practicable  route, 
DOT would be authorized to require use of an alternative route. As with all aspects 
of  the  proposal  outlined  in  the  NPRM,  we  will  consider  all  comments  in  evaluating 
the adequacy of our proposal to limit the required route analysis to one comparative 
route. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

VADM THOMAS J. BARRETT 

Question  1.  PHMSA  is  responsible  for  the  safe  and  secure  transportation  of  haz-
ardous  materials  by  all  modes  of  transportation.  Under  the  Hazardous  Materials 
Emergency  Preparedness  Grant  Program,  PHMSA  issues  grants  to  first  responders 
to  become  better  prepared  to  deal  with  hazardous  material  accidents.  How  much 
money does PHMSA grant for first responder preparedness? 

Answer. PHMSA is authorized under existing law to distribute approximately $27 
million  in  Hazardous  Materials  Emergency  Preparedness  (HMEP)  grants  in  FY 
2007, and the Administration’s budget proposed full funding of this program ($28.4, 
including  administrative  expenses).  Under  the  FY  2007  continuing  resolution,  how-
ever,  PHMSA  is  required  to  hold  spending  for  this  program  at  the  level  authorized 
and appropriated for FY 2006 ($14.3 million). 

The HMEP grants program provides Federal financial and technical assistance to 
states and Indian tribes to ‘‘develop, improve, and carry out emergency plans’’ with-
in  the  National  Response  System  and  the  Emergency  Planning  and  Community 
Right-To-Know  Act  of  1986  (Title  III),  42  U.S.C.  11001  et  seq.  The  grants  are  used 
to  develop,  improve,  and  implement  emergency  plans;  to  train  public  sector  haz-
ardous  materials  emergency  response  employees  to  respond  to  accidents  and  inci-
dents involving hazardous materials; to determine flow patterns of hazardous mate-
rials  within  a  state  and  between  states;  and  to  determine  the  need  within  a  state 
for regional hazardous materials emergency response teams. 

Since  1993,  PHMSA  has  awarded  all  states  and  territories  and  45  Native  Amer-
ican tribes planning and training grants totaling $125 million. These grants helped 
to: (1) train 1,843,000 hazardous materials responders; (2) conduct 7,545 commodity 
flow  studies;  (3)  write  or  update  more  than  41,344  emergency  plans;  (4)  conduct 
9,452 emergency response exercises; and (5) assist 18,907 local emergency planning 
committees. HMEP grants are funded through registration fees paid by hazmat car-
riers and offerors. 

Congress reauthorized the HMEP grant program in 2005 through the ‘‘Hazardous 
Materials  Transportation  Safety  and  Security  Reauthorization  Act  of  2005’’  (Title 
VII  of  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act—A  Leg-
acy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU),  P.L.  109–59,  119  Stat.  1144,  August  10,  2005).  Rec-
ognizing  the  need  for  increased  attention  and  funding  for  the  HMEP  program,  the 
Act increased the authorization level for this program from $14.3 million to approxi-
mately $28.4 million, beginning in FY 2007. 

Question 1a. Is this a critical need that needs additional attention or is the right 

amount of funding available? 

Answer.  HMEP  grants  serve  a  critical  need  in  preparing  communities  and  first 
responders  for  emergencies  involving  hazardous  materials  transportation.  PHMSA 
believes  the  funding  level  authorized  by  the  Congress  in  2005—which  would  have 
doubled the size of the program to $28.4 million this year—was warranted. The Ad-
ministration proposed to fund the program at its full authorized level this year; but 
the  continuing  resolution  limits  our  spending  to  the  FY  2006  program  level  ($14.3 
million). 

The  HMEP  training  grants  are  essential  for  providing  adequate  training  of  per-
sons  throughout  the  Nation  who  are  responsible  for  responding  to  emergencies  in-
volving the release of hazardous materials. An estimated 800,000 shipments of haz-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

105 

ardous  materials  make  their  way  through  the  national  transportation  system  each 
day. It is impossible to predict when and where a hazardous materials incident may 
occur or what the nature of the incident may be. This potential threat requires state 
and  local  agencies  to  develop  emergency  plans  and  train  emergency  responders  on 
the broadest possible scale. 

There  are  over  2  million  emergency  responders  requiring  initial  training  or  peri-
odic  recertification  training,  including  250,000  paid  firefighters,  850,000  volunteer 
firefighters, 725,000 law enforcement officers, and 500,000 emergency medical serv-
ices  providers.  Due  to  the  high  turnover  rates  of  emergency  response  personnel, 
there  is  a  continuing  need  to  train  a  considerable  number  of  recently  recruited  re-
sponders  at  the  most  basic  level.  Volunteer  fire  fighters,  the  backbone  of  the  Na-
tion’s  rural  hazmat  response  capability,  typically  have  less  than  a  3-year  service- 
turnover rate, making the need for hazmat response training among this group even 
greater.  In  addition,  training  at  more  advanced  levels  is  essential  to  ensure  emer-
gency response personnel are capable of effectively and safely responding to serious 
releases of hazardous materials. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

CATHLEEN A. BERRICK 

Question 1. Director Berrick, do you believe the Federal Government is providing 
sufficient  resources,  personnel,  and  regulations  to  adequately  protect  our  Nation’s 
surface transportation and rail systems? 

Answer.  As  we  have  reported,  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT),  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS),  and  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA)  have  all  taken  actions  to  strengthen  the  security  of  the  Nation’s  passenger 
rail  system  and  other  surface  transportation  modes,  including  providing  Federal 
grant  funding  to  industry  stakeholders  to  strengthen  security.  However,  there  are 
two  critical  steps  that  DHS  and  TSA  need  to  complete  before  they  or  others  can 
make a sound assessment of whether resources devoted to surface and rail transpor-
tation  systems  are  sufficient—or  more  appropriately,  are  allocated  to  rail  and  sur-
face transportation modes in a risk-based manner, recognizing that there is limited 
Federal funding to be allocated across many sectors and not any one sector or area 
can be made completely secure. First, until TSA completes a comprehensive risk as-
sessment  of  the  U.S.  passenger  rail  system  and  other  surface  modes  of  transpor-
tation, it will be limited in its ability to determine whether the resources, personnel, 
and  security  efforts  it  directs  toward  these  systems  are  appropriate  given  the  rel-
ative risks. Second, until TSA issues the Transportation Sector Specific Plan (TSSP), 
as  required  by  DHS’  National  Infrastructures  Protection  Plan  and  Executive  Order 
13416,  and  issues  supporting  plans  for  each  mode  of  transportation  based  of  these 
risk  assessments,  the  agency  lacks  a  clearly  communicated  strategy  with  goals  and 
objectives  for  securing  the  overall  transportation  sector,  including  passenger  rail 
and other surface modes. Such a strategy is important so that transportation opera-
tors know what the Federal Government’s role and strategy is with respect to secu-
rity,  as  well  as  the  role  and  actions  expected  of  them.  A  strategy  is  also  important 
so that Congress and others can review this strategy, raise any questions they may 
have with it, and ultimately hold DHS and TSA accountable for its implementation. 
Question 2. Director Berrick, do you have any ideas that you could share with the 
Committee regarding why it has taken so long for the DHS and the TSA to develop 
their  ‘‘transportation  sector-specific  plans’’?  Has  this  delay  significantly  held  back 
these agencies’ ability to prioritize and address rail and surface transportation secu-
rity vulnerabilities and risks? 

Answer.  We  have  not  assessed  the  reasons  for,  or  impact  of,  TSA’s  delay  in 
issuing the TSSP, so we cannot comment on whether the delay has significantly af-
fected TSA and other Federal efforts to prioritize and address rail and surface trans-
portation  security  needs.  According  to  TSA,  the  work  that  is  needed  to  support  the 
development  of  the  plan  has  been  conducted,  and  the  plan  is  currently  undergoing 
review before it can be issued. TSA also stated that it is moving forward with secu-
rity efforts for surface transportation systems despite the lack of an issued plan. We 
will assess potential impacts that the lack of the TSSP has had on efforts to secure 
surface  transportation  systems  during  our  ongoing  reviews  of  commercial  vehicle 
and  freight  rail  security,  as  well  as  our  planned  follow-on  review  of  passenger  rail 
security.  Although  we  haven’t  assessed  the  reasons  for  or  impact  of  TSA’s  delay  in 
issuing  the  TSSP,  as  mentioned  in  response  to  Question  1  above,  such  a  strategy 
is important so that transportation operators know what the Federal Government’s 
role and strategy—or ‘‘end-state’’—is with respect to security, as well as the role and 
actions  expected  of  them.  A  strategy  is  also  important  so  that  Congress  and  others 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

106 

can review this strategy, raise any questions they may have with it, and ultimately 
hold DHS and TSA accountable for its implementation. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

RICHARD L. CAN˜ AS 

Question  1.  As  the  head  of  our  State’s  homeland  security  efforts,  how  would  you 
rate  the  support  and  cooperation  you  receive  from  the  Transportation  Security  Ad-
ministration and the Department of Homeland Security? 

Answer.  As  I  know  firsthand  from  my  experience  in  N.J.,  establishing  a  new  De-
partment  does  not  come  without  growing  pains,  and  I  believe  this  is  the  case  with 
both DHS and the TSA. Our experience has been mixed. We’ve had some very expe-
ditious  and  helpful  responses  for  technical  assistance  and  also  had  helpful  answers 
from the Office of Grants and Training to help unravel the very complex grant proc-
ess.  On  the  other  hand,  sometimes  DHS  and  TSA  don’t  understand  what  state  and 
local needs are. For example, at one point early on, DHS did not include NJ TRAN-
SIT  in  Philadelphia’s  mass  transit  working  group,  because  they  were  unaware  that 
NJT ran trains and buses into Philadelphia. This had an impact on funding alloca-
tions within the region. Thankfully, this has been corrected. 

But  there  has  been  maturation.  For  instance,  I  was  very  encouraged  by  the  re-
gional  approach  that  the  Secretary  and  Department  announced  earlier  this  month 
regarding the Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) grant program—in which they 
treated  northern  New  Jersey  and  New  York  City  as  a  contiguous  region.  Addition-
ally,  when  we  think  these  agencies  may  be  off-base,  we  are  not  shy  about  making 
our  needs  known.  And,  though  they  may  not  always  give  us  the  answers  we  want, 
they are responsive. 

Question  2.  Do  you  believe  the  Federal  Government  needs  to  do  more  to  protect 
the surface transportation system from potential terrorist attack? If so, what would 
you specifically recommend? 

pipelines; and 

Answer. The surface transportation system is a large and diverse community and 
is  not  all  at  the  same  level  of  risk.  You  have  roadways,  bridges,  tunnels,  trucks, 
trains (passenger and freight), pipelines, motor coach and school buses. 

national register; 

In New Jersey, for example, we have: 
• 6,337 roadways, bridges and tunnels; 
• 20,000  independent  trucking  companies  that  call  N.J.  home  through  the  inter-
• 723 members of the New Jersey Motor Truck Association; 
• About 1,000 miles of interstate and 400 intrastate high-consequence natural gas 
• More than 100 motor coach companies. 
We have been working with DHS/TSA in each of these areas. 
The key, however, is risk. We strongly support DHS when its attention and fund-
ing are based on risk. To his credit, Secretary Chertoff has indicated repeatedly that 
addressing the highest risks is his priority. 

One of the things I would recommend to improve transportation security is to en-
sure that the private sector remains engaged and becomes a real partner—not from 
a regulatory standpoint—but from the ability to leverage homeland security invest-
ments. The private sector holds most of the critical infrastructure and they are mak-
ing  investments.  But  DHS  must  do  a  better  job  of  including  the  private  sector  and 
leveraging their investments to maximize all of our security efforts. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:59 Oct 01, 2010 Jkt 038932 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\38932.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

